Volume 4 Chapter 8


Regin Banton was a strong man, rumored to be the next Chief of the Banton tribe; one of the Bearman tribes. He idolized one of the current Elders; Jin Banton, and became his right hand.

Not only Regin, it could be said Jin was popular in the Banton tribe as a whole, especially the younger ones. The reasons for that being Jin’s character was broad minded, containing deep patriotism, and above all, his strength, which allowed him to be considered as one of the highest class among the demi-human race.

That’s why, when the Bearman tribe heard the news, they thought it was a bad joke. They couldn’t believe their beloved Elder had been incapacitated by a human. However, the merciless reality was proven. Jin, who was lying powerless in medical facility showed them the truth .

Regin was dumbfounded having seen Jin’s current appearance. Next, his anger and hatred surfaced. While bearing these feelings inside his heart, he pressed to determine the circumstances from the Elders. As the result, Regin who had learned everything, disregarded the Elders and told the Bearman tribe everything. And thus they embarked for revenge.

Because of the persuasion from the Elders and other tribes, not all of the Bearman tribe followed him, only the youngsters from Banton tribe who admired Jin had left to defeat that hated human. They numbered around 50 people. Regin and the others who knew their enemy’s objective thought it best to attack when their enemy was in front of the Great Tree as revenge. They thought, “To perish right before the goal is the best (revenge)”.

After all, their enemies only consists of humans and the RabbitMan tribe. Even though Jin was defeated, they thought it was because something cowardly, like a surprise attack. They thought there was nothing to fear of humans who would go mad without a sense of direction deep inside the Sea of Trees’ fog, even more so for the weak RabbitMan tribe. Regin was an outstanding person. Normally, he wouldn’t interpret the situation like that. However, currently his eyes were clouded by anger.

However, no matter what, even if his eyes were clouded…

“This is wrong!?”

Regin screamed in disbelief. The reason; before his very eyes an impossible spectacle was displayed. The RabbitMan tribe, which was placed at the bottom among other demi-humans, was cornering the Bearman tribe, which was known as one of the strongest in combat.

“Come on come on come on! Show your fighting spirit! Or else, I will cut you!”

“AHAHAHAHAHA, scream like the pig you are!”

“It’s time to clean this filth! HYAHAHAHAHA HA!”

While the Haulia tribe swung countless fatal, murderous attacks, their loud laughter resounded. There was no appearance of the RabbitMan tribe which was gentle, peaceful, and above all, weak in combat. Screams came from the Bearman tribe that desperately try to fight back.

“Shit! The heck is this! Just who the hell are you!!”

“They must not be the RabbitMan tribe!”

“Uwaaaa! Stay away! Stay awaaaay!”

They were ambushed by the enemies they wanted to ambush, the RabbitMan tribe that laid in ambush showed unbelievable power, even among other demi-human races. Arrows and stones that fly accurately out of nowhere, added to their excellent teamwork. The glee with which they swung their blades, wearing lunatic expressions, and laughing loudly all the while! All of it gave birth to violent commotion. In that situation, their specs even exceed the Bearman tribe.

Actually, the RabbitMan tribe wouldn’t be able to compete in a one on one fight against the Bearman tribe. However, in these past ten days, the Haulia tribe was able to make up the difference, thanks to the hell-like training.

Originally, the RabbitMan tribe’s specs were lower than the other demi-human races. However, to survive and avoid battle, they had polished their stealth ability and danger perception. After all, they could only survive that way.

As a result, they were able to promptly perceive their enemies’ presences to the point they could ambush their enemies. It could be said that they are a race with abilities suited for assassination. However, their innate nature had crushed these advantages.

It could be said, Hajime’s training woke their combat instincts. He single-handedly abused and cornered them by letting them swing weapons, cut their enemies, and letting them experience how to evade, without rest. By remembering the speech from senior sergeant Hart**n, as a result of ten days of severe training, their minds completely became combat oriented. Although he did feel like it was too much…

They, who had acquired the aggressiveness to attack without any hesitation, demonstrated promising combat prowess. Because they thought of the whole tribe as members of one family, their level of teamwork was high from the get go. With their skillful adjustment of presence, it demonstrated tremendous effect, along with their teamwork.

In addition, one of the reasons for the Haulia tribe’s high combat prowess was the weapons made by Hajime, which increased their incompetent attack power.

Each of them wielded two Kodachis, produced with a precise and practiced process, such that their ultra-thin blades were able to split a grass just by touching it. They were made of Taur ore, so they were durable. The Haulia tribe also carried disposable throwing knives.

There were also the powerful Slingshots and Crossbows that were made using string with great elasticity gathered from spider-like demonic beasts in the Abyss. They were made for the children of the Haulia tribe, since close range battles were still too hard for them. Even children are able to shoot enemies from the other side of fog, using their search ability while they instinctively looked up to Hajime.

Even Pal… … Baltoferd of Certain Death, was completely charmed when shooting his Crossbow, while showing a sniper-like nature.

“One shot of certain death! ‘DO’ your was head blown off. In the name of “Certain Death””

Pal… .. Baltoferd of Certain Death recently gained the habit of saying such things. By the way, he called himself “Certain Death”. His first habitual saying was “Aim and Shoot!” but it was stopped by Hajime. He looked so displeased.

Back on topic, the Bearman tribe who fell into a panic were easily defeated without much resistance by the current Haulia tribe and their numbers fell in no time. Currently half of them had been killed in the vicinity.

“Regin-dono! If this keeps up-”

“Retreat!”

“Let me take care of the re-KUPE!?”

“Tontoo!?”

Having heard his subordinate advise him to retreat, Regin was hesitating because of anger from the incapacitated Jin and his killed subordinates. That hesitation wasn’t missed by the Haulia’s sniper. To the subordinate called Tonto that tried to advise his lord to retreat once again, an arrow accurately penetrated his temple.

Because of this Regin and his subordinates were shaken and fell into disorder. Kam and the others who thought it was a chance, attacked at once.

Arrows came flying from the fog and accurately aimed at their ankles. While distracted by that, a sharp attack came to reap the head. With an exquisite timing, the person who wanted to kill the one that shot arrows from the back ran into protruding spikes.

However, perhaps it was because that was their favorite move, a presence suddenly came from behind, and brought with it a fatal blow. Haulia tribe utilized their presence and teamwork to make fun of Regin and his subordinates. Regin and his subordinates shuddered at this. They thought, “Are they really that hetare and weak RabbitMan tribe!?”

The battle dragged on for a while, Regin and his subordinates were finally able to recover from their confusion while covered in wounds. They were somehow able to stand using their weapons as support. When the waves of attacks using the exquisite covering fire and teamwork subsided, all of them were panting. Regin and his subordinates were surrounded by Kam and the others, after being cornered with a gigantic tree to their backs.

“What happened, you “bleep”?! Is that all?! Wuss!”

“I heard you were the strongest tribe! You “bleep”! Even so you were “bleep”!

“Poise your weapons quickly! Are you “bleep”‘s already weak in the knees?!”

They thought it was not the RabbitMan tribe, with how they bombarded the other tribe with insults. The Bearman tribe which trembled in fear could only think, “What had happened to these guys!?” With broken spirits, some of them trembled while holding their heads. A big hairy man said, “Can you let us go?” with teary eyes… … truly a surreal spectacle.

“KU KU KU, did you have anything else to say? O strongest tribe?”

Kam let out that sarcasm with a truly evil expression. They who had awoken to their fighting spirit seemed to have thought about their circumstances when they were looked down upon. It was a speech that couldn’t be heard from the Kam of the past.

“Nuguu…”

Having heard Kam’s objection, Regin’s expression distorted in regret. He somehow recovered from the confusion and reasoning came back to his eyes. Even though he had been doused with cold water by Haulia tribe’s strong assault, because of the incapacitated Jin, the flame of anger still burnt inside of him. But, because he felt a sense of responsibility to bring his surviving subordinates back alive, he regained his mind. He consciously knew it was his fault that they fell into such a predicament because he was the one that spurred them on.

“… … you can do anything to me. Boil me or burn me, just do whatever you like. However, I was the one who forcibly brought my subordinates. I want you to let them go”

“Wh-, Regin-dono!?”

“Regin-dono! That was…”

Having heard Regin’s words, his subordinates started to make a commotion. It was because he tried to save his subordinates in exchange for his own life. To these subordinates, Regin scolded.

“Silence! … … it was my responsibility because of the blood that surged to my head clouded my eyes. RabbitMan… … no, Chief of Haulia tribe. I know it is selfish of me. However, I want to save their lives! That’s all.”

Regin released his weapon then started to kneel while bowing his head. His subordinates knew of Regin’s great pride as a warrior, so they understood how much resolution he had to bow his head to the enemy. That’s why they couldn’t obey his order to stay silent.

Kam’s answer to Regin who was still bowing was…

“I refuse”

While throwing his knife.

“Uo!?”

Regin was able to dodge by a hairs-breadth. However, starting with Kam’s attack, Regin and his subordinates were attacked from the surrounding with arrows and stones fired at high velocity, at once. Using their big axes as shields, Regin and subordinates desperately tried to defend themselves, and then from the Haulia tribe came laughter from the bottom of their heart, completing their attacks.

“Why!?”

Regin squeezed a voice as he groaned to ask them for the reason they attacked.

“Why? Aren’t you our enemies? Are other reasons necessary to kill you?”

Kam’s answer was a simple fact.

“Guh, but!”

“Above all… .. it’s enjoyable to crush and make fun of your arrogance! HA HA HA!”

“W-Wh-!? Bastards! To these guys-!”

Just as Kam said, Haulia tribe looked like they truly enjoyed it. Using Slingshots and Crossbows, they made fun of them by shooting from a safe area. Their appearances were those of people drunk on power. It looks like their heart’s didn’t mind killing people for the first time, even if it was their demi-human brethren. In short, they’ve become completely berserk.

With increasing severity in their attacks, Regin and his subordinates who had stayed close together, and desperately tried to defend were… … finally reaching their limit. Although they avoided fatal attacks, they were covered in wounds. They won’t be able to endure the next volley.

Kam, with a warped grin, ‘sutto’ raise his hand. Haulia tribe with frenzied eyes start to aim with arrows and stones at the ready. Regin who thought this wasn’t an appropriate place to die, gathered his power, and inside his mind he apologized to his subordinates.

Kam’s hand, like a death god’s scythe that hunted the lives of Regin and his subordinates, was lowered. Arrows and stones immediately shot. In slow motion, Regin continued to watch this without looking away, until…

“Stop it already!!!”

Zudooooon!!

A spectacle where a white hammer blew everything away could be seen.

“Ha?”

Regin who was dumbfounded by it unintentionally let out that voice. However, that can’t be helped. Immediately after they accepted their death, a rabbit-eared girl with pallid hair along with a giant hammer fell from the sky, then the hammer struck the ground. It resulted in the shockwave that blew away all the incoming arrows and stones. When they saw that, the surrounding Bearman tribe could only give a blank stare.

Shaking anger! That was the feeling that could be felt, of course it came from Shia. The Sledgehammer made using the compression method had extraordinary mass. As if she didn’t feel the weight, it was brandished with a ‘Buonn’ then generated a gust. ‘Bishi’ it was pointed toward Kam.

“Aghh! Seriously arghh! Father and everyone, please come to your sense already!”

Looking at Shia, Kam and the others who were initially stunned in astonishment, with ‘ha’ regained themselves while look toward her blaming.

“Shia, though I don’t know why you did this, but please move from there. Or else we won’t be able to kill the ones behind you, you know?”

“No, I won’t move. I won’t allow anymore than this!”

Having heard Shia’s words, Kam and the others narrowed their eyes.

“Won’t allow? Shia, don’t tell me you wanted to be together with our enemy? According to your answer…”

“No, I don’t care if these guys died”

“””” Is that okay!? “”””

The Bearman tribe that thought she came to stop her tribe, unintentionally let out a remark to Shia.

“Of course. If I took it easy against enemies that came with killing intent, I wouldn’t be able to endure Yue-san’s training. Even I don’t have that naive thought anymore”

“Fumu, then why did you stop us”

Kam asked her. Haulia tribe also have inquiring expressions.

“Isn’t that obvious! Father and the others will be broken at this rate! And become more degenerated!”

“Broken? Degenerate?”

Having heard Shia’s word, Kam and the others can only put ‘I don’t understand” expressions.

“That’s right! Please remember it. Hajime-san was merciless against enemies, no talking was necessary, even more merciless, he enjoyed killing demonic beasts and people (…) things like that! Even during training, if you were told to kill the enemies, you shouldn’t have enjoyed it!”

“W-well, it’s not like we enjoy…”

“Just now, did father and the others know what kind of faces you made?

“Face? Well, even if you said that…”

Having heard Shia’s words, the Haulia tribe started to look at each others faces. Shia let out a calm breath, however, her voice clearly informed them.

“… … it was just like those Empire’s Soldiers that attacked us”

“Kh!?”

It shocked them, enough to blow off their frenzy. Their mood was as if they were doused with cold water. To have the same expressions as those who scorned their family with pleasure and caught them… … having actually witnessed that they understood the ugliness of their action. To be the same as those who snacthed their family away… … was an unbearable fact.

“Sh-Shia… I was…”

“Fuu, it looks like you have calmed down. Thank god. At worst, I thought I might have to beat you all down”

With ‘furifuri’, Shia swung the Sledgehammer around. Having heard Shia point that out, immediately Haulia tribe was trembling in front of the Sledgehammer while Shia loosened her cheeks a little.

“Well, it was your first battle, if you realized that now then it’ll be okay! It was Hajime-san’s fault after all! Although I understand the importance of fighting spirit, that was too much! Rather than fighting spirit, it was more like you became berserkers!”

This time, Shia was ‘puripuri’ angry at Hajime. A small voice of Shia muttering can be heard, “Just why did I fall for that kind of person”.

And at that time, a gunshot can be heard.

From Shia’s back, “Guwa!?” a groan could be heard, along with sound of something collapsing. Now that they think about it, while in a panic Shia and the others remember the existences that they’d forgotten about, then looked behind their back, there laid Regin who writhed in pain while holding his forehead.

“Why the heck are you trying to run away while their attention was diverted? Until their talk is over sit in seiza now!”

Hajime accompanied by Yue appeared from inside the fog. It seems while Shia and the others were immersed in their talk, Regin and his subordinates tried to run away, only to get shot. However, it wasn’t known why he used the non-lethal rubber bullet.

Although they heard Hajime’s words, the Bearman tribe tried to vigilantly examine their surroundings to keep running away, but Hajime silenced them with “Pressure”. While casting glances at them, Hajime and Yue looked at Shia and the others.

When Hajime saw Kam and the others, some of them felt awkward and looked the other way. However, immediately after words of apology came to Kam and the others.

“A, well, what to say, sorry. Because I was fine with it, I’d completely forgotten the shock of murder. It was my mistake. Un, I am sorry”

Shia and the others can only ‘pokan’ blankly stare at him with opened mouths. That was because they heard an unexpected but honest apology.

“Bo-boss!? Are you okay!? Did you hit your head!?”

“Medic! Medic! There is a person with serious injury here!”

“Boss! Please steady yourself!”

That’s why it became such reactions. With veins popping on his head, his mouth twitched.

This time, Hajime himself truly thought it was his mistake. Because he didn’t feel anything when he kills, he didn’t consider the shock that was supposed to occur with it. No matter how much stronger he had become, he didn’t have any experience in teaching, as a result, he almost broke the Haulia tribe’s minds. Indeed, he thought it was dangerous, that’s why he said those words of apology… … but their reaction was to doubt his sanity. Hajime thought, “Should I be angry?”, he was hesitating while getting back into his usual attitude.

Hajime put this matter aside for now, approached Regin then put Donner’s muzzle at his forehead.

“Well then, will it be a brave death or to survive and live in shame, which will it be?”

Having heard Hajime’s words, the Bearman and Haulia tribe looked at him with surprised eyes. By his speech just now, they heard that he’d overlook the Bearman tribe depending on the situation. It was a serious proposal from Hajime who had no mercy and was unreserved against his enemies. Kam and the others looked at Hajime in sorrow while thinking, “As expected his head was…”. Even though more veins popped on Hajime’s head, but because there’d be no progress otherwise, he let it through(go) temporarily.

Regin looked at Hajime with a surprised expression. It was the man who had brought about the complete change in the Haulia tribe, he thought this man wouldn’t show any mercy.

“… what does it mean, do you want to let us go?”

“Aa, you can return if you want, you know?”

“Conditions?”

To easily say that they could return, aside from Regin, the others were in commotion. From behind it could be heard, “If I hit his head now maybe it can help…”, was what Shia said with serious expression while alternating her gaze between her Sledgehammer and Hajime’s head. Voices of agreement could be heard from Kam and the others.

It was about the time that Hajime seriously thought of punishing them while more veins popped out. However, he worked harder to let that through(go).

“Aa, condition huh. When you reached Faea Belgaen I want you to say something to the Elders”

“… … A message?”

While he nervously thought about what kind of conditions he might demand, it turned out he only needed to be a messenger, and that took him aback. However, he was frozen when the content was spoken.

“”You owe me one””

“… … Kh!? That’s!”

“Well? What will you do? Will you accept it?”

Because he knew what that meant, Regin unintentionally let out a shout. Hajime was, with wind blowing from somewhere, waiting for Regin’s choice. “You owe me one” means, by letting the attacker return alive, there will be a time they must pay back their debt.

With the loss of one of the Elders, as well as how they agonized over ignoring the decision made by the Elders Conference to not intervene with him, if this message was passed on then they must unconditionally answer Hajime’s request.

If everything were to be seen objectively, in Jin’s situation and in Regin’s situation, where he one-sidedly tried to take revenge, coupled with the fact that they were allowed to live, the Elders Conference’s prestige will surely take a fall. They were outlaws because they disregarded the Elders. And can’t be said Hajime won’t one day turn his fang towards the Elders.

In other words, for Regin and his subordinates to survive meant that they’d brought back a weakness to their home country. Even after disregarding the decision from Elders Conference, they carried back a debt on their shoulders. Moreover, to return with half of their members dead after boasting about themselves as the strongest tribe… … just as Hajime had said they’d lived in shame.

Hajime choose to further his attack against Regin who wore a distorted expression.

“Add to that, you must remember that your subordinates’ deaths were your own responsibility, along with your crushing defeat against the Haulia”

“Guu”

There was a reason for Hajime to make such a condition. Of course it wasn’t out of benevolence. It was because there are details of the Seven Great Dungeons that he doesn’t know yet, so even though Faea Belgaen was an isolated country, there might be something else he must do in this country. There was also the tradition inherited from its founder after all. Hajime thought there might be little failures that will come along the way, for that sake, he thought that insurance was necessary.

To the worrying Regin, Hajime was ‘Gorik’ further pressing the muzzle.

“Decide it in five seconds. Once that’s over I’ll kill you one by one. “Quick judgement”. Isn’t that the basics (of a leader)?”

After that, Hajime began to count o~ne, two~ and Regin was panicking, however nothing comes to his mind.

“I, I understand. I wish for us to return!”

“I see. Then, go quickly. Don’t forget the message. If when the time comes for me to call for that and discover that you tried to fool me…”

A strong killing intent overflowed from Hajime’s whole body, accompanied with physical pressure. ‘Gulp’ the sound of gulp-ing resounded clearly.

“That day will be the end of Faea Belgaen”

No matter who looked at him, he had the touch of a bad debt collector, no, it’s more like a terrorist in this case. From behind, he could hear, “Thank goodness. It was the usual Hajime-san” and “Boss finally regained his mind!”, that kind of strange talk mixed with a relieved tone, well for now he’ll let it through(slide). He didn’t want to break the atmosphere that he made with so much effort. However, harsh punishment will follow.

With their pride broken by Haulia tribe and having heard how Regin desperately begged for his subordinates’ lives, they didn’t have the strength to protest and started to return home dejectedly. It might be because they are centered around a young one, they obediently accepted their defeat. But, for Regin, his influence in Faea Belgaen would likely disappear. There is also the possibility of being treated as fugitive. However, it was a mild punishment, after all he’d tried to take someone else’s life unjustly.

The Bearman tribe disappeared into the other side of the fog. After confirming that, Hajime turned around toward Shia and the others. At first, they were unable to see his expression because he looked down, then somehow the atmosphere became strange. Kam and the others who felt dishonored to have fallen into such frenzy and madness, started to become engrossed in speaking to Hajime about a lot of things, while not noticing the atmosphere. Only Shia , “Huh? Isn’t this bad?”, said that while drenched in cold sweat.

Hajime started to look up while swaying. There was a big smile on his face. However, his narrowed eyes weren’t smiling at all. Finally, because he thought Hajime’s appearance was strange, Kam timidly asked him.

“Bo-Boss?”

“Yes, isn’t it a serious thing? I thought this time, it was my fault. To say you’ve reached the standard just like this, I must have thought of it as a brake”

“N-no, even if you say that… … it was because of our own immaturity…”

“Nono, it’s okay, you know? I admit it myself after all. That’s why, that’s why I thought to honestly apologize… … but you had quite the reaction, didn’t you? Well, I understand. After all my usual attitude was like that… … however, however… … this out of place feeling I have, I must let it out… … you understand what that means, right?”

“N-no. We were a little…”

Kam also thought, “Ah, this is bad. He is angry now”, with cold sweat rapidly pouring out of him, step by step he tried to retreat. Maybe because some of the Haulia remember the training, they suddenly stood still while crying and whimpering.

And at that time, “Now is my chance!”, was what Shia thought then she instantly started to turn her feet to escape. She didn’t forget to make a man nearby as a shield.

However…

DOPANn!!

One bullet passed through between that man’s leg, hit the ground and ricocheted when it struck a tree’s root finally hitting Shia in the butt.

“Hakyun!”

It was one of Hajime’s gun skills “Polygonal Shot”. That’s how he aimed his shot at Shia’s butt. It was a useless gun skill, that could be thought as not that useless, that he’d uselessly practiced. Because of the impact from the bullet Shia raised a scream and ‘pyon’ jumped, only to collapse on the ground with her butt in the air. ‘Shuu-‘ Smoke rose from her butt. Shia was twitching in pain.

Having seen Shia convulsing and Hajime’s gun skill, Kam and the others were trembling in fear. The man who had a bullet pass between his leg covered his groin with both hands while teary eyed. He patted his groin, because when the bullet passed, it caught the shockwave from the bullet.

Without doing anything else, Hajime put back Donner into its holster, then his hanya-like smile returned. Finally, he yelled out with angry tone.

“For now, everyone will be hit once!”

Waaaaaa—!!

All of Haulia members immediately scattered trying to escape just like newborn spiders. For a while, screams and an angry roar could be heard resounding inside the Sea of Trees.

The only one who remained in her place was Shia with smoke rising from her butt, and

“… … when will we go to the Great Tree?”

The mutters from Yue who wasn’t involved with all the commotion.

Volume 4 Chapter 9


Deep inside the fog, Hajime and his party advanced toward the Great Tree. They left the fighting to Kam, while the other Haulia members scattered into their surroundings, looking for enemies as part of their training. Because the fact that unpreparedness is one’s greatest foe already is carved into their flesh, all members wore serious expressions. Most of all, the blue bruises on their bodies made it so it couldn’t be helped…

“Uu~, it’s still tingling~”

Shia was whining while rubbing her butt. Since before, she looked at Hajime with resentful eyes.

“Stop looking at me like that, it’s annoying.”

“To say that it’s annoying was too much. It’s not common sense to shoot at a girl’s butt. Moreover, using that useless high skill-”

“That can also be said to you. You seriously thought to hit my head and use another person as a shield to run away… … that was not something a normal person would do.”

Near them, a man from the Haulia tribe nodded his head.

“Uu, it was the result of education by Yue-san…”

“… … I was the one that raised Shia.”

“… … I can’t comment on that.”

While boasting that, Yue looked at Hajime as if saying “Praise me.” Hajime was averting his gaze making good use of “Let it through skill”.

After they advanced for 15 minutes while chatting harmoniously, their party finally arrived at the Great Tree.

Hajime’s first opinion when he looked at the Great Tree was,

“… … the heck this is”

, while half-surprised and half-doubting. Yue also wore the slight expression of someone who had her expectations crumbling. The two of them were imagining it using the scale and a larger version of the trees in Faea Belgaen.

However, the real Great Tree was… … splendidly withered.

Its size was not that far off from their imagination. Its diameter alone could be estimated around 50 meters. There is also the bizarre difference from the surrounding trees. While the surrounding trees had the ever expanding green leaves, only the Great Tree was withered.

“The Great Tree was already withered even before the founding of Faea Belgaen. However, it didn’t rot. Ever the never changing withered tree. With the surrounding fog’s nature and the forever-withered-without-rotting Great Tree, this place became a sacred place. Well, even with that said, although it could be called a tourist spot…”

Kam explained to Hajime and Yue making inquiring faces. While hearing the explanation, Hajime looked around the Great Tree’s roots. Just as Alfrerick had said, there was a lithograph built.

“This is… … just like Orcus’ door’s…”

“… … Nn, the same crest”

On the lithograph there were seven system-like squares with seven crests engraved on top of it. It was completely the same as the one on Orcus’ room’s door. To prove it, Hajime took out Orcus’ ring. The pattern on the ring was completely the same as one of the patterns on the Lithograph after all.

“It was the entrance to the Great Dungeon after all… but… … what should we do about this?”

Hajime approached the Great Tree and started to ‘thud thud’ hit it and of course there was no change, when he tried to ask Kam and the others if they know something about this tree, they only had No as an answer. Although he already heard all of the traditions from Alfrerick, there wasn’t any concerning the entrance. There was a possibility that he hid it so Hajime started to think, “Should I collect the debt?”,

At that time, Yue who was observing the lithograph raised her voice.

“Hajime… … look at this.”

“Nn? Is something there?”

What Yue noticed was on the other side of the lithograph. There were empty dents that corresponded with the seven crests on the other side.

“This is…”

Hajime put the Orcus ring in his hand to the dent that he saw corresponded to Orcus’ crest.

Then… … the lithograph began to faintly shine.

Wondering what happened, the surrounding Haulia tribe that were on lookout began to gather. For a while, they looked at the shining lithograph which lights gradually faded and somehow characters appeared in its place. Something was written there.

Four proofs.

Power of Rebirth.

Guidepost of Spun Bond.

A new trial will be opened to the one who has those proof.

“… … What does it mean?”

“… … Rhe four proofs… … maybe, wasn’t it referring to the other Dungeons’ proofs?”

“… … Then, what does the Power of Rebirth and Guidepost of Spun Bond mean?”

Shia answered to Hajime who puzzled over it.

“U~n, Guidepost of Spun Bond, wasn’t that it? Whether you got demi-human race as guides or not. Only demi-humans are able to move around easily in the Sea of Trees, and to gain the demi-humans as guides in the Sea of Tree was an exception among exception”

“… … I see. It was something like that”

“… … Next was regeneration… … Me?”

Yue pointed at herself who owns the special magic, “Auto Regeneration”. To test it, she thinly gave a cut to her finger to activate “Auto Regeneration” while moving to touch the Great Tree… … but there was no change at all.

“Muu… … it looks like that was wrong.”

“… … nn~, to the withered tree… … Power of Rebirth… … along with four proofs… … it’s possible that the four proofs meant we have to conquer half of the Seven Great Dungeons, then we might obtain the age of gods magic concerning rebirth, was it something like that?”

Hajime was wondering whether they must use that to restore the withered tree. Yue also gave a consenting face.

“Haa~, damn. So it was impossible to conquer it right now… … even though it was troublesome, there is nothing else we can do but to go to the other dungeons…”

“Nn…”

Hajime could only grind his teeth having come this far. Yue also regretted it. However, because they couldn’t enter the Great Dungeon now, although it worried them, it couldn’t be helped. They switched their target to obtaining three more proofs for now.

Hajime then gathered the Haulia tribe.

“As you’ve heard, we are aiming to conquer the other Great Dungeons now. The promise that you kept to guide us to the Great Tree is over now. If it’s the current you, even without Faea Belgaen’s protection, you’ll be able to survive inside the Sea of Trees. That means, this is good bye”

Then, he took a peek at Shia. His eyes asked her if she wanted to leave behind some words, and Shia understood perfectly that now was the time to voice her intentions. Even though she’ll be back, conquering three of the Great Dungeons would take much time. She wouldn’t be able to meet her family during that time.

Shia nodded, then took a step forward to talk to Kam and the others”

“Fath- “Boss! I have something to say!” … … huuh, father? This is my turn…”Kam took a step forward while ignoring Shia. ‘Bishi’, then stood at attention. On his side, “Father? Wait, father?”, Shia’s words could be heard and as if he was a British guardsman he just looked ahead while standing upright.

“A~, what is it?”

For the time being Shia called out, father? father?, but was ignored, while Hajime asked Kam. Kam, while not looking at Shia and ignoring her, started to tell the consensus from the Haulia tribe.

“Boss, please take us along!”

“Eh! Everyone also wanted to go with Hajime-san!?”

Shia was surprised at Kam’s words. In the discussion ten days ago, what happened with that mood when you were sending me off!?, were the words she said.

“We are Haulia but at the same time not Haulia! We are Boss’s subordinates! By all means, take us along! This is our tribe’s consensus!”

“Wait a sec, father! I’ve never heard of that! Rather, for what purpose did I have to go through those hardships…”

“I admit, we are jealous of Shia!”

“He admits that! He really said that! Really, what happened in those ten days!”

While Kam said the tribe’s consensus, he ignored Shia’s remark. What is this situation?, was what Hajime thought then frankly answered.

“I refuse.”

“Why!?”

Kam tried to ask the reason for Hajime’s quick reply. The other Haulia tribe members also approached Hajime in impatience.

“Of course it’s because you will only be hindrances, you idiot-”

“But!”

“Don’t get caught up in the moment. For our journey, even 180 days is too fast!”

“Is that true!?”

In addition to Kam and the others holding on to him, they started to think, “Even if it was not permitted, we will follow!” It seems because of the General Hartman-like( … )’s training, a strange sense of trust and reverence was born. If this keeps up, they’ll really follow Hajime into town. Because he didn’t want any to riot, he reluctantly gave them a condition.

“Then, that is. I want you to stay here to keep training. The next time I come to the Sea of Trees, if I can use you then I’ll make you my subordinates”

“… … Is there any falsehood in those words?”

“None at all.”

“If you lied, we’ll continue to call Boss’ name in the humans’ towns, as if we are creating a new religion, okay?”

“Y-you have quite the bad sense…”

“Well, that is because we have pride as Boss’ subordinates.”

What a bold subordinate that made Hajime’s cheeks twitch. Yue was ‘pon pom’ patting Hajime’s arm to comfort him. Hajime let out a sigh, next he looked up at the sky thinking the next time he came to the Sea of Trees will be troublesome.

“Sob, no one looked at me… … even though it’s the day I set off…”

Shia who was thrown to the side wrote the character ? on the ground, while no one minded her as expected.

* * *

Hajime, Yue, and Shia were escorted by Kam and the others to the boundary of the Sea of Trees, and once again they got on the magic-driven two-wheeler and dashed into the plain. The order of seating was Yue, Hajime, then Shia. Since he noticed Shia’s degree of clingy-ness had increased from the time in the Raisen Grand Canyon, Hajime tried ignoring that. Although, his reaction was immediately discovered by Yue who sat in front of him.

On his shoulder, Shia asked a question.

“Hajime-san. Now that I remember I’ve never heard about it, where was our next destination?”

“Ah? I never said it?”

“I never heard anything.”

“… … I already knew”

To the elated Yue, Shia let out a groan in protest.

“I-I am your comrade now, so please tell me something like that! Communication is important!”

“My bad. Our next destination is Raisen Grand Canyon”

“Raisen Grand Canyon?”

Having heard Hajime’s words, Shia put on a questioning expression. Currently, the Seven Great Dungeons that are already confirmed, excluding “Haltina Sea of Trees”, were “Guryuen Great Desert’s Volcanic Mountain” and “Shune Snowfield’s Ice Cave”. Because it was certainly there, doesn’t that make it the best destination?, was what she thought. Maybe because he guessed her question, Hajime started to say his intent.

“For now, I don’t even know if there was a Great Dungeon in Raisen Grand Canyon. Shune Snowfield is in the demon’s country so it’d be troublesome. Although it’s better to go to the Big Volcanic Mountain for now, if we go while passing Raisen that spreads from east to west, we’ll get there anyway. Maybe we’ll find a dungeon along the way, right?”

“T-to cross over the Raisen Grand Canyon…”

Instinctively, Shia’s cheeks twitched. Raisen Grand Canyon was popular as an execution ground. Recently, it was also the place where her family was almost annihilated. To have thought of that place as a highway shook her mind.

Hajime, who knew Shia was shaken because she was glued to him, revealed an amazed expression.

“You know, believe in your own power a little. For the current you, the demonic beasts inside the canyon aren’t that different from the demonic beasts in the boundary. Didn’t you know we can’t use magic inside Raisen? For you who specialized in body strengthening, it’s possible to move around without any hindrance. Rather, it’d be the stage for you”

“… … I am ashamed as your master”

“Uu~, I am ashamed~”

Yue looked at Shia with amazed eyes. Shia tried to change the topic.

“Th-then, because we are going to Raisen Grand Canyon, are we going to camp today? Or, are we going to the nearest village or town?”

“If possible, I wanted to arrange some seasoning for food, for the sake of the future it’d be great to get some material from the town. According to the map I’ve seen, there will be a town somewhere along here”

For extra measure, Hajime wanted to eat real food << .. >>. Also, in the future, he needed money to buy things in town. He wanted to exchange the materials he had with money before it rotted. One more thing, he wanted to try to settle in a place before setting off to the Raisen Grand Canyon.

“Haa~ is that so… … thank god”

Having heard Hajime’s words, Shia somehow showed a relieved expression. Hajime who was dumbfounded by it, “What is it”, asked her.

“Well~, from Hajime-san’s story, I thought you’d be satisfied by eating Raisen Grand Canyon’s demonic beasts’ meat… … Yue-san only needs Hajime-san’s blood so she wouldn’t have any problem… … I was thinking how I should persuade you for my personal food~, I am glad it was just my imagination. So Hajime-san also eats normal food!”

“Of course! Who likes to eat demonic beasts! … you, what did you think I am…”

“A new kind of demonic beast called Predator?”

“OK, you, I’ll tie you up until we reach the town”

“Wa-, stop, from where did you pull that out, that collar! Really, stop~ don’t put that on me~, Yue-san don’t just look, help me!”

“… … you reap what you sow”

In a sense, the three who advanced on the plain made a commotion that showed their good relationship.

After driving for several hours, finally the day grew dark and the town was finally seen in front of them. Hajime was glad, ever since he saw the sky after getting out of the Abyss, he finally got the feeling that “I am back”. Yue also looked somewhat excited. Yue turned her head slightly then their eyes met, and smiles floated on their faces.

“Umm~, although it was such a good atmosphere, this collar, can you release it? For some reason I couldn’t remove it… … umm, did you hear? Hajime-san? Yue-san? Wait, please don’t ignore me~ I am going to cry now! I am going to cry so hard that you’ll be depressed by it!”

Hajime and Yue only replied with their smiles.

Volume 4 Chapter 10


They can see a town in the distance. It was a small town enclosed with a surrounding moat and hedges. There was a gate facing the highway, with a hut by its side. It might be the guards’ post. Even though it was a small town, there was the arrangement for guards. Because of that, Hajime who thought they’d be able to do quality shopping, loosened his cheeks.

“… … If you are in a good mood, can you take off the collar already?”

Shia with a disappointed expression earnestly asked Hajime who smiled while looking at the town. Fixed on Shia’s neck was a collar with a black body embedded with a small inconspicuous crystal. It was something sturdy that Hajime used as punishment for Shia’s verbal slip. Because for some reason she couldn’t take it off, Shia asked Hajime to remove it only to have her words pass through Hajime’s ears.

Slowly, Hajime and his party could clearly see the town, so he put the magic-driven two-wheeler into the “Treasure Box”, and switched to walking on foot. It was because it’d cause a commotion to arrive with a jet black bike, after all.

Along the way, Shia kept ‘bla bla’ complaining. As expected, that just went through his ears and they finally arrived at the town’s gate. As he thought, the hut beside the gate was a guard’s post, with an armed man coming out of it. He was equipped with leather armor and a long sword on his waist, rather than a soldier he looked more like an adventurer. That adventurer-like man called Hajime and his party to stop.

“Please halt. Show your status plate. Also, what are your objectives coming to this town?”

It might be something like a regulation, because he somehow looked unmotivated. Hajime pulled out his status plate while answering the guard’s question.

“Our main objective is to secure rations. They’re to be used for our journey”

An indifferent voice, ‘Hu~m’, can be heard from the guard while he checked Hajime’s status plate. After that, he blinked his eyes, held the plate a little farther, then rubbed his eyes. Having seen the guardsman done that, Hajime with cold sweat thought, “Ah, this is bad, I forgot to hide that”.

Inside status plate, there is a function to hide the numerical value and skills’ column. Even for adventurer and mercenary, the leak of combat ability proved to be fatal. Hajime immediately tried to deceive the guard by telling him a lie.

“A while before, I was attacked by demonic beasts. It looks like it broke at that time”

“I-it broke? That was, well…”

The guard was perplexed. It was no wonder. After all, Hajime’s status plate didn’t display the level, and the numerical value of his stats, as well as his skills column were all over the place. Even though he sometimes heard of people losing the status plate, for it to be broken (in sense of it being bugged) was something he had never heard of. Normally he would just laugh it off, but something unbelievable was displayed after all, so he didn’t understand how to judge it.

To further his attack, Hajime shrugged his shoulders with a manner of someone totally bothered by it.

“If it wasn’t broken, isn’t that display too strange? It’s as if I am a monster. Mr. Guard, do I look like a monster that could destroy a town with just the tip of my finger?”?

To Hajime who used a joking gesture by opening both of his hand, the guard only gave out a wry smile. If what the status plate displayed was correct, then he would be a monster that easily surpassed even the demon kings and heroes. Even without hearing that explanation, he already considered the plate to be broken.

If he know he was truly a monster, surely, this guard would have fainted. Hajime who boldly told that lie, looked at Shia and Yue who had amazed expressions.

“Haha, well, of course I don’t see that. Even though I have never heard of any bug in the display, well, there is always a first for everything… … and those two…”

Turning his gaze to Yue and Shia, the guard asked to see their status plate. Only to be stunned. With his face dyed red, he looked alternately at Yue and Shia with a blank and unfocused look. Even though it was said before, Yue is a beautiful girl with a bisque doll-like appearance. Shia, while quiet, was also a beautiful girl that gave off a mysterious feeling. In other words, the guardsman was truly charmed by them.

Hajime unnaturally cleared his throat, then ‘Hah’, the guard turned his gaze to Hajime in panic.

“While we were attacked by the demonic beasts, this girl lost her plate. About this Rabbitman… … you understand, right?”

Maybe because he accepted that, the guard nodded in consent then gave back Hajime’s status plate.

“Even so, just where did you get your hands on such a beauty. Aren’t gray-haired members of the Rabbitman tribe rare? Are you actually a rich person?”

The guard asked Hajime with envy and jealousy mixed into his voice, while continuously taking peeks at the two. Hajime only shrugged his shoulders without giving any answer.

“Well whatever. You may pass.”

“Aa, thanks. Oops, wait a sec. Where can I sell raw materials?”

“Ang? If it’s that, there is the adventurer guild if you go straight through the central road. If you want to personally bring it to the store, just ask the guild. They will give you a simple map of this town.”

“Ooh, you’ve been so kind to us. Thanks”

After receiving the information from the guard, Hajime and his party passed through the gate and entered the town. From the gate it seems that this town’s name was Brook. Inside the town was a lively atmosphere. Even though it wasn’t at the level of Hol-ad town which he’d seen at the outskirts of Orcus, there are quite a lot of stalls along with voices advertising their wares, and sounds of people haggling could be heard.

With such liveliness, it somehow lifted one’s feeling. Not just Hajime, Yue’s eyes began to look happy. However, since before, Shia was trembling and staring at Hajime with teary eyes.

Without saying anything, she only stared at him with teary eyes and because it made him anxious he let out a sigh. “To interrupt my happy mood” , was what Hajime complained in his mind while giving a glance at Shia.

“What is it? Even though we’re finally inside a town, for you to make a face similar to a gorilla demonic beast that desperately tried to block a massive rock that fell from above”

“Who’s a gorilla! Rather, how do you know what kind of defeated form that is! If it’s Hajime-san, then it’d be blown in one move! It’s somehow pitiful just by imagining it!”

“… … that’s something like poking your side with teary eyes”

“Is that a follow-up attack!? That’s too cruel! Uh, that isn’t it!”

Shia was busily rebutting while angry. She tried to appeal, “I am unhappy!”, with her whole body while flailing her hands. By the way, the episode with the gorilla-like demonic beast was a story from the time he experimented to polish the mass compression method. By no means did he not enjoy the bullying. Yue was happily poking at that time. Also, this demonic beast was the one who owned the “Great Arm” special magic.

“It’s this! This collar! Because of this I was misunderstood as a slave! Hajime-san, if you understand then remove it! Uu, it’s cruel~, aren’t we companions~”

It seems that was what Shia was angry about. Even though they are travel companions, she was shocked to have received the same treatment as a slave. Naturally, the collar that Hajime put on her wasn’t a slave’s collar, and it didn’t have the power to restrain Shia. Even Shia understood that. But, whatever is said, a shock is a shock.

Having seen that Shia, Hajime scratched his head then looked into Shia’s eyes.

“You know, for a non-slave demi-human, moreover a popular and high-in-demand rabbitman wouldn’t be able to walk freely inside a town, right? Added to that, a gray-haired one like you would attract attention along with your outstanding figure and style. If you declared that you weren’t someone’s slave, you’d be instantly marked down when we entered the town. After that, there would be a storm of kidnappers coming. It’ll be trouble-… … why are you being giddy for?”

While explaining things, Hajime suddenly glared at Shia, who became embarrassed with blushing cheeks when she heard the explanation. Yue also coldly looked at Shia.

“Mo-mou, Hajime-san. To start saying something like that in front of everyone. To say, I have an outstanding figure and style, the cutest in the world and charming, mou! It was embarras–bugera!?”

Yue’s golden right straight found its way into the cheek of Shia who was caught up in the moment. With a love filled mind, Shia raised a scream then collapsed. Without using body strengthening, she got up while rubbing her cheek that was reddened in a different way from before.

“… … Don’t get carried away”

“… … I’b sobby, Yue-zan”

Having heard Yue’s cold words, Shia’s body trembled. While amazed by their appearance, Hajime continued his explanation.

“A~ I will say the conclusion. Inside human territory, I am protecting you by saying you’re a slave. If I didn’t do it, there’d be a lot of troubles and it’ll be all because of you”

“That is… … although I understand it…”

She understood the reason and merit. But, Shia had an unhappy expression, felt it hard to accept that after all. Because she had a strong yearning to be called their companion, she was unable to simply accept it. This time it was Yue who told Shia.

“… … Don’t care what the small fries think of you”

“Yue-san?”

“… … The most important thing is it was enough if the ones important to you understand you. … … isn’t it?”

“… … … … Th-that’s right. That’s right.”

“… … Nn, even though I am reluctant… … Shia is someone I recognize as a companion… … Don’t mind the small things”

“… … Yue-san… … ehehe. Thank you very much”

She was a vampire princess who wielded her power and listened to the masses. Even though she was betrayed, she found a new answer that even little words were able to carry a massive weight. That’s why, her words were able to break the stone inside Shia’s heart. All members of the Haulia tribe, even Hajime and Yue, understood that Shia has become important to Hajime and Yue. It was unnecessary to go through the trouble of getting 1,000 people to understand it. Of course, even if they could do it, there was no need to do that…

Having heard Yue’s words, Shia shyly smiled while taking a peek at Hajime. She was expecting him to say something.

Hajime who felt it can’t be helped, reluctantly started to spin his words.

“Well, I won’t abandon you if you were attacked because they found out you’re not a slave”

“Even if it will make everyone in this town your enemies?”

“You know, didn’t I already do that with the Empire’s soldiers?”

“Then, you’ll do it even if the enemy was a country! Fufu!”

“What did you say? No matter even if it was the world or the gods it won’t change anything. If it was an enemy, no matter who it is, I will fight”

“Kufufu, did you hear that? Yue-san. Did you hear what Hajime-san just said? We are important to him, right?”

“… … Hajime’s only important person is me”

“Wa-, please read the mood! At this time, you should honestly say the usual “… … Nn”!”

Shia was happy and enjoying it, despite her complaints. Hearing that, when the time comes, he will even fight against the world. As expected it is something that’d make a woman happy. Especially if the other person was the one you’re in love with.

Hajime who narrowed his eyes looked at the two playing with each other (or so it looks like to him), started to explain Shia’s collar.

“One more thing, because that collar incorporates telepathy ore and a special ore, use it if you deem it necessary. It’s able to be used by directly pouring magic into it”

“Telepathy ore and a special ore?”

Telepathy ore is a mineral that’s able to transfer thoughts. It was an ore created by Creation magic that gave the user the skill “Telepathy”, the amount of magic usage is proportional to the distance. Most of all, currently in this age there was nothing like telepathy or the telephone, so everyone who has the same ore within the range will be able to hear the secret talk.

The special ore itself was created using Creation magic to give the user the skill “Presence Perception”+ Specific Perception””. When Specific Perception was used, it is possible to catch only a specific presence among a crowd, and identify a presence among many. When it was used, it’d take the role as a beacon by pouring magic into it. The strength of the beacon is proportional to the amount of magic used.

Having heard Hajime’s explanation, Shia raised a praising voice.

“By the way, that collar can be removed by giving it a certain amount of magic, you know?”

“I see~, in other words… … because you wanted to always hear my voice, and know my whereabouts, is that what Hajime-san felt? Mou, do you like me that much? As expected, it was a little too-, rather, ah, it’s not like I hate i-Bbaberun!?”

“… … Don’t get carried away”

“‘Sob’, I’b sobby”

With a beautiful picturesque curve, Yue’s kick came flying into the back of Shia’s head, who collapsed after yelling a strange scream. A cold voice could be heard from Yue. Even though she was weak at close combat… … Yue delivered a splendid high kick, then Shia apologized with tears in her eyes. Even if she recognized her as a journey companion, it seems she won’t forgive her if Shia tried to approach Hajime. Most of all, it was questionable whether Shia’s behaviour and speech could be called an approach.

With such a happy(?) mood, they continued walking on the main street until they discovered a signboard with a large sword drawn on it. It was the same signboard as the one seen in Hol-ad town’s adventurer guild, although the scale was two sizes smaller than the one in Hol-ad.

After confirming the signboard, Hajime stepped inside by opening the door with composure.

Volume 5 Chapter 1


Because guilds have the image of a place where rough people gather, Hajime thought it’d be a dirty place, but it was unexpectedly clean. There was a counter in front of the entrance, and a restaurant to the left. There were some people that seemed to be adventurers, eating and chatting. Judging from how no one ordered sake, it might be because they didn’t serve it. For those who wanted to drink, they had to go to a bar.

When Hajime and his party entered the guild, naturally the adventurers turned their gazes toward them. At first, because it was just three unknown people they only paid a little attention to them, but when their gazes turned toward Yue and Shia, the curiosity in their eyes increased. There were those who, “Hou”, raised voices of admiration, there were those who stared blankly in admiration just like the guard, and then there were those that were beaten by their girlfriends. It was just like adventurers to not stop at a slap.

It was a favorable template, even though there were some people that tried to mess with them, it seemed that they logically held back and simply observed. Because there was no need to keep standing still, Hajime happily went toward the counter.

In the counter was a charming… … smiling auntie. Her build was good. Her width about twice Yue’s. Apparently a beautiful woman as a receptionist was just a fantasy. It was like how the real and professional maids on Earth were aunties. No matter which world you’re in the harsh reality is the same. By the way, Hajime was just normal, he didn’t expect to see a beautiful woman as the receptionist. If he said he didn’t then he didn’t. That’s why, Hajime wanted Yue and Shia to stop their icy glares. From a little while ago, their glares had been pierced into him.

Maybe because she knew what was going on in the mind of Hajime and his party, the auntie kept giving them a charming.

“Even though you have a flower in both hands, is that still insufficient? It is regrettable that I am not a beautiful receptionist”

… … The auntie probably didn’t use special magic for mindreading. Hajime, with twitching cheeks was somehow able to give an answer.

“No, I have never thought about that”

“Ahahahaha, are you underestimating a woman’s intuition? I am simply able to understand a man’s simplicity. Don’t try to avert your eyes too much, it’ll reduce your credibility, you know?”

“… … I am deeply impressed”

Hajime’s answer was, “Oh my, to be old and suddenly giving out a sermon, because it was our first meeting, can you forgive me?”, an unapology-like apology to the auntie, after all it’s not like he hated her. The adventurers who were eating, took a peek at Hajime while saying, “Ah~ he also got preached to by the auntie~”. It seemed the adventurers were behaving because of this auntie.

“Well then, once more, welcome to adventurer guild, Brook’s branch. What is your business?”

“Aa, I want to know where to sell raw materials”

“Selling raw materials it is. Then, can you show me your status plate first?”

“Nn? Is it necessary to show your status plate for purchasing something?”

To Hajime’s question, the auntie was, “Oh my?”, showing that kind of expression.

“Aren’t you an adventurer? Certainly, the status plate isn’t necessary to purchase something, but if you are confirmed as an adventurer there will be a 10% increase in the price of the things you sell”

“I see”

Just as auntie said, there were various privileges as an adventurer. It was because the adventurers were the ones that collected raw materials such as magic stones and recovery medicine that’s necessary for everyday lives. Also, it wasn’t known when the town would be attacked by demonic beasts, so no amateur tried to collect those raw materials. It was natural to give out privileges corresponding to the dangers.

“There are other benefits, such as 10-20% discount for hotels and shops associated with the guild, and it’s possible to freely use carriages for people with a high rank. What will you do? Do you want to register? The fee is 1,000 ruta.”

Ruta is this world’s common currency that’s used in the northern continent, Tortoise. Zagaruta ore is the special ore used to make this currency, the difference in colours are made by mixing it with different minerals using a special method along with the carved seal. Blue, red, yellow, purple, green, white, black, silver, and gold were the colours, from the left the values are 1, 5, 10, 50,100, 500, 1.000, 5.000, and 10.000 ruta respectively. Surprisingly, its value was the same as Japan’s.

“U~n, I see. Even though it was explained with great effort, I can’t register now. I am sorry, I don’t have any money at all. Is it possible for me to sell it first? Of course, the first sale value is good as it is.”

“Don’t say that in front of these two cuties. I will help, it’s not like it’ll inconvenience me, you know?”

Auntie was so cool. Hajime decided to accept her goodwill, and showed his status plate.

He made sure to conceal it this time, it only displayed name, age, sex and job. Although auntie also asked for Yue and Shia’s, but was cut off. Although these two didn’t have plates to begin with, it was possible to ask for it. However, their status’s numerical value and skills column would be seen by auntie.

Although Hajime wanted to see their statuses, he thought their special magic would be described on the skills column for sure. If these three existences were publicized it’d only be troublesome, so they decided to put it on hold.

New information was written on the returned status plate. There was an occupation column beside the job column, what was written there was “adventurer” along with a blue mark at its side.

This blue mark was the adventurer’s rank. It continued with red, yellow, purple, green, white, black, silver, and gold. … you might have noticed it. That’s right, adventurer ranks are the same as currency. In other words, blue ranked adventurers were, “Your value is only 1 ruta, ptchoe”, or something along that line. It was painful. Surely, the previous guild master who thought of this system was someone twisted.

By the way, the limitations for someone with a non-combat profession was black. It seems because the black rank barely reached four digits, you’d be applauded to make it that far. Someone who reached gold rank would be the object of admiration, you should be able to understand how the colours stand for adventurers now.

“If you’re a man, then work hard to reach black, okay? Don’t show any uncool sides to these girls.”

“Aa, I’ll do that. Then, is it okay to sell them now?”

“No problem. I have the qualifications for appraisal, so show it to me.”

It seemed auntie was not only a receptionist but also able to appraise sold items. She was an excellent auntie. Hajime already took out the raw materials from the “Treasure Box” and placed it in a bag beforehand. Those items were demonic beasts’ furs, nails, fangs and magic stones. When the container was put on the counter and the raw materials were seen, auntie displayed an astonished expression.

“Th-these are-!”

She timidly took it, then ascertained the items inside-out. After holding her breath in nervousness, auntie finally looked up, then she gave out a sigh and looked at Hajime.

“You’ve brought something unexpected. Aren’t these… … from the Sea of Trees’ demonic beasts?”

“Aa, that’s right.”

Hajime also wanted to remove the template here, that was why the raw materials from Abyss’s demonic beasts couldn’t be taken out here. If unknown materials were taken out, it’d immediately cause a big commotion. Even though he was hesitating because the raw materials from the Sea of Trees’ demonic beasts were also unusual, he didn’t have any other raw materials, so he sold that. Having seen auntie’s reaction, it was unusual after all.

If he took out raw materials from the Abyss, it’d be like, the Guild head appeared! Sudden raise in rank! The Receptionist lady’s eyes became hearts!, it’d be that kind of template… … it was a good thing he didn’t do that. That’s why, Hajime wanted Yue and Shia to stop looking at him with icy glares, because it made his body tremble.

“… … You are also unexpected” Auntie looked at Hajime in amazement.

“I don’t understand what you mean.”

Even though he had changed, his otaku soul couldn’t be erased… … somehow it became like this. Hajime who pretend to not know anything, looked away from reality.

“Because there are a lot of good quality raw materials from the Sea of Trees, thanks for selling them.”

Auntie, even though she didn’t know anything, continued to speak. It seemed she was capable of reading the mood. She truly was a pleasant and excellent auntie.

“Are these unusual after all?”

“You know. A human’s sense of direction would be driven out of control inside the Sea of Trees, because once you get lost there would be no second time. It’s a place with high risk. That’s why no one tries to go there. Although it’s possible to buy demi-human slaves to enter it, it’s more profitable to sell them at central. They will sell at a high price, and it’ll make it easier to raise one’s name.”

Auntie took a peek at Shia. She probably guessed that they received Shia’s help to go around the Sea of Trees. It seems, thanks to Shia, she didn’t become suspicious of the raw materials from the Sea of Trees.

After auntie assessed all of the raw materials, she presented the money. The value of the sold items were 487,000 ruta. It was an excellent amount.

“Is this much okay? I think it’ll sell for more at central.”

“Well, I don’t mind this much.”

Hajime received 51 pieces of the Ruta currency. This money, maybe because of an ore characteristic was strangely light, that’s why it wasn’t bothersome to carry more than 50 pieces ruta currency. After all, if it was a bother, Hajime could just put it inside the “Treasure Box.”

“By the way, I heard from the guardsman that I can get a simple map of this town…”

“Aa, please wait a moment… … here, this is it. Please refer to it because the recommended inn and stores are written there.”

On the given map, there was elaborate useful information and descriptions written with simplicity that made it a wonderful item. He felt it was rather unbelievable for this to be free of charge.

“Oi oi, is this okay? For such a splendid map to be free of charge. I thought it’d need some money to make something of this level…”

“I don’t mind, I only do it as a hobby. For those that have the job to make it, that’s just like a scribble.”

Auntie truly an excellent person. Just why did this person become the receptionist of the guild?, was the the level he wanted to rebut. Surely, there might be a sublime drama behind it.

“I see. Well, it helps.”

“That’s a good word. Moreover, because you have money, please just stay here for a while. Although this town’s public order isn’t bad, there might be some reckless men out there, because of these two.”

Auntie who paid attention until the last minute, truly was a good person. Hajime answered, “I’ll do that”, while grinning, then turned his feet toward the entrance. Yue and Shia followed suit after bowing their head. Some adventurers in the restaurant were sneakily whispering, while their eyes were glued to Yue and Shia to the end.

“Fumu, in a lot of ways, they are interesting people…”

Auntie happily muttered toward their backs.

* * *

Hajime and his party, more than a map calling it a guidebook, then decided on an inn called “Masaka Inn.” According to the description, it served delicious food with good security, it also had a bath. The last description was what decided it. Although the price was rather expensive, there were no problems because they had the money for it. Slightly, they thought what followed was that “Masaka”…

On the inn’s first floor, there was a dining room filled with some people having their meal. When Hajime and his party entered, gazes were focused on Yue and Shia as promised. They ignored that, when they arrived at the counter-like place, what appeared was a girl around 15 that cheerfully greeted them.

“Welcome-, welcome to “Masaka Inn”! Today, are you here for lodging? Or are you only here to eat?”

“Lodging. Although I’ve seen in the guidebook, is this place as good as described?”

The girl nodded when Hajime showed auntie’s special map.

“Aa, it’s the introduction from Catherine-san. Yes, it was as written. How many nights do you wish to stay?”

Although the girl tried to promptly continue the staying procedure, Hajime was thinking of something else. Hajime was shocked that the auntie’s name was Catherine. The girl called out to him with, “Umm~ mr. costumer?”

“Ah, aa, sorry. Only for one night. The one with meals and bath.”

“Yes. The bath will be 100 ruta per 15 minutes. Currently, it’s empty at this time”

The girl showed him the time table. Because he wanted to enjoy it, he wanted to book the men’s and women’s side for two hours. When he said that, “Eh, for two hours!?”, the girl was surprised just like that. It couldn’t be helped, Hajime was Japanese after all.

“Then, um~, what about the rooms? Although there are double and triple rooms…”

The girl looked at Hajime and his party with curiosity. She was in her puberty after all. However, Hajime could feel the other customers who were eating their meals perk their ears up. Although he knew Yue and Shia were beautiful, it looked like they stood out more than he expected. Because there are lots of people they don’t know here, Hajime was slightly paralyzed.

“Aa, the triple room please.”

Hajime said that without any hesitation. Their surroundings became noisy, and the girls’ cheeks were blushing in slight red. However, there was a person who objected Hajime’s words.

“… … It’s no good. Two double rooms”

It was Yue. The surrounding customers, especially the males looking toward Hajime with expressions that said, “Serves you right!”. They interpreted Yue’s words as to divide them between men and women. However, Yue’s next words put them in despair.

“… … One for me and Hajime. Shia in the other room.”

“Wa-, what’s with that! I don’t want to be left out! The triple room is better, you know!”

To the fiercely protesting Shia, Yue only said one thing.

“… … It’ll be distracting if Shia was there”

“Distracting… … what do you mean”

“… … What is… … What?”

“Bu!? Wa-, don’t say that in this place! That’s vulgar!”

Having heard Yue’s words, the men who fell into despair begin to turn their eyes filled with flames of envy toward Hajime. The inn’s girl, with a reddened face looked alternatively between Hajime and Yue. Hajime who thought it’d make him ashamed if this keeps up, tried to stop it but his plan was a little too slow.

“Th-then, Yue-san please stay in the other room! Hajime-san and I will stay in the same room!”

“… … Hou, then?”

Yue’s cold and piercing gaze turned toward Shia who pointed her finger. Because of its power, Shia who remembered her training days trembled, “Eei, woman’s courage”, said that, then returned to the gaze while loudly declaring.

“Th-then, I’ll give my virginity to Hajime-san!”

Silence came. No one, not even one word was said, not even noise was heard. Now, everyone in the inn were focused on Hajime and his party, and stared at them. From the kitchen, the girl’s parent were, “Ara ara, maa maa” and “Youth is good”, said something along those lines.

Yue was swaying with eyes of absolute zero.

“… … Today is your death anniversary”

“Uh, I, I won’t lose! I will defeat Yue-san and become the main heroine from now on!”

“… … I’ll show you, no disciples were stronger than their master.”

“I’ll usurp it!”

An abnormal pressure gushed out from Yue, and Shia who was trembling shouldered her Sledgehammer. It was truly pandemonium, everyone was nervous and gulped in this critical atmosphere.

Then…

GOCHINn! GOCHINn!

“Hiu!?”

“Hakyu!?”

The sound of fists hitting the girls came followed by their screams. Yue and Shia, with teary eyes, crouched while covering their heads with both hands. The one who hit the two’s heads were of course Hajime.

“Geez, you’re troubling everyone, and above all it shamed me.”

“… … Uu, Hajime’s love is painful…”

“J-just a little more, just a little more time then… … with body strengthening the pain would be…”

“You reap what you sow, idiot-”

Hajime turned his cold gaze toward the two, then returned to face the girl. The girl corrected her posture when Hajime looked at her.

“I am sorry for the commotion. Triple room, please”

“… … Tr-triple room with this situation… … i-in other words, three person? A-amazing… … hah, don’t tell me booking the bath for two hours is also for that!? Washing each others’ body! Then… … d-doing this and that… … how abnormal!”

The girl’s mind had gone for a trip. The landlady who couldn’t stand it any longer dragged the girl into the interior. The man who seemed to be her parent continued to finish the procedure. When he gave the key he apologized, “I am sorry about my girl”, and in his eyes were, “You’re a man after all, right? I know how you feel”, that kind of unwelcomed misunderstanding. Surely, he was the type that would say, “Did you enjoy the night?”, when tomorrow arrived.

Because no matter what he says it would be misunderstood, along with the other customers who blankly sent skeptical gazes, with Yue and Shia who were still crouched on the floor shoulder to shoulder, Hajime ran away straight to the third floor where his room was located. After a while, the stopped time moved and it became noisy again downstairs, and Hajime who felt strangely tired decided to ignore that. When Yue and Shia entered the room, they moved their bed, while Hajime who had dived into the bed already shut down his consciousness.

After sleeping for several hours, Hajime was woken up by Yue when it was time for supper, then the three went down to the dining room. Somehow, the customers who were there when they checked in were still there.

For a moment, Hajime felt his cheeks twitch, then he assumed his calm and sat down on the seat. Immediately, the inn girl from before came as the waitress and said with a reddened face, “I am sorry for before” Although she apologized, she couldn’t hide the curiosity in her eyes. The food he ordered was delicious and it was the normal food he finally got to eat after a long time, so he wanted to slowly eat it, but he couldn’t help but to secretly sigh.

Inside the bath, although the time for male and female were different, Yue and Shia trespassed, then once again pandemonium was raised only to be punished by Hajime with hits on the head, and the silhouette of the inn girl could be seen moving around sneakily, when it was found out she was peeping by the landlady, she got spanked on the butt…

Even at the time for sleep, Yue and Shia naturally came into Hajime’s bed, while his right arm was clung to, Shia who clung on to his left arm cried because of the coldness of the artificial arm. He could feel Shia through the pseudo-nerves, especially the direct feeling of that lethal weapon, and it disturbed his mind. When that was discovered, Yue stared closely at him with dead-like eyes, it continued for all night long…

The next morning, Hajime vowed. Next time he would just order a double room for Yue and him without anymore questioning. It didn’t matter if Shia sulked because of it. After all, Yue’s silence was not very good for his mental health.

After eating breakfast, Hajime handed some money to Yue and Shia, to ask them to help buy the necessary items for travel. There’s some time until the time for checking out came. So, while Yue and Shia does the errand, he’ll finish his tasks inside the room.

“What tasks?”

Shia honestly questioned him. However, Hajime was,

“There is something I wanted to make. Because it was already planned, I am sure it only needs a few hours to finish. Although I seriously thought to finish it last night… … somehow I was strangely feeling tired yesterday”

“… … Th-that’s so. Yue-san. I-is it okay for me to look for clothes?”

“… … Nn, no problem. I wanted to look around the stalls”

“Ah, that’s good! Yesterday we only saw it for a moment, after we’re done shopping let’s go eat”

While averting their gazes, Yue and Shia began to noisily talk about shopping. Although they knew they were the cause, they didn’t want to admit it, so they changed the topic calmly.

“… … You guys, in truth you’re getting along well.”

Hajime’s mutters only go through their ears.

Volume 5 Chapter 2


Currently, Yue and Shia had gone out to town. Because it was only several hours before noon, they must move as planned. Their objectives were food(groceries) and clothes for Shia, as well as some medicine. Weapons and armor were unnecessary because they have Hajime.

The town was already wrapped up in it’s day to day hustle and bustle. The stall keepers vigorously called out to customers, there are housewives and adventurers haggling intensively. There are also food stalls that made you think, ‘Isn’t it too crowded in the morning?’, while the smell of burning meat and sauce drifted around.

Because tool shops and groceries would be too crowded at this time, these two decided to look for Shia’s clothes first.

From auntie; Catherine-san’s map, it mentioned the stores for everyday wear, specialty stores for high-class dresses, and the recommended stores for adventurers and travelers. As expected, au… … Catherine-san was someone with good abilities. She could accomplish anything as long as she wished for it.

These two immediately visited a certain shop for adventurers. They decided to buy everyday clothes for when they went back.

Inside the shop, as expected of something Catherine-san recommended, there were a lot of items. The quality was good, they were practical and functional, it was a store that wouldn’t betray your expectations.

However, inside was…

“Oh my~, welcome ? What lovely girls. To have you coming here, it makes onee-san happy~, I will sure~ly give a go~od service ? ”

There was a monster. With a height of 2 meters, cladded with armor made of muscles, face thick with make-up, on top of its bald head, ‘chokon’, long hair grew in only one place, and that was made into a three-knit braid and tied with a pink ribbon. When it moved, its muscles were twitching and ‘gishimishi’ sound could be heard from it, with both hands on its cheeks, it twisted its body. Its clothes were… … no, it couldn’t be said as that. At the very least, ‘gon’ thick limbs, with a garment that made its stomach muscles completely visible.

Yue and Shia stiffened. Shia already passed out, while Yue steeled herself, having seen a monster that surpassed the Abyss’ demonic beasts.

“My oh my~? What happened to the two of you? Cute girls shou~ldn’t make that face. Come on, smile smile?”

“No matter what, everything was your fault, it was your fault that I couldn’t smile!” The grand rebuttal that Yue and Shia were somehow able to resist making. Even though these two have the level of highest potential out of all of humanity, they didn’t think they could win against this monster.

However, because the monster approached them with a big smile, Yue could not to bear it and inadvertently muttered.

“… … Human?”

At that moment, the monster raised an angered voice.

“Who~ could make a legendary class demonic beast run away? As you can see, credibility behind that is zero, or rather it’s minus. How could you call me a monster!!”

“I-I am sorry…”

Yue trembled with teary eyes. Shia, had long since… … been chilled in her lower body. After Yue apologized, the monster smiled(?) once again and continued its service.

“It’s o~kay. Then? For today, what kind of item do you want to bu~y?”

Shia stayed still even now, while Yue steeled herself to look for Shia’s clothes. Maybe it was because she already wanted to go home, Shia gripped Yue’s skirt and shook both the skirt and her head. However when, smilingly, the monster said, “Leave it to me~”, it carried Shia on its shoulder into the store. At that time, Yue looking at Shia’s eyes the expression of saw a pig that got sold for meat.

In conclusion, the monster that was called manager Crystabel-san could be considered a splendid manager. Shia who was taken inside the store also realized it, that’s why when it offered her the dressing room, she was undeniably grateful.

Yue and Shia expressed their gratitude to manager Crystabel. When they did that, they could feel the charm from the manager’s smile, it was a woman’s(?) virtue.

“Well~, at first I wondered what might happened to me, but it was an unexpectedly good person. That manager-san”

“Nn… … we can’t judge people from their appearances”

“Right~”

While chatting that way, they wandered around as their destination was the tool shop. However, these two stood out. On their way, when they noticed it, they were already surrounded by ten men. Most of them looked like adventurers, but among them there was also someone with an apron from the shop from somewhere.

One of the men came forward. Although Yue didn’t remember it, this man was one of the adventurers inside the guild when Hajime and his party talked to Catherine.

“Your names are Yue-chan and Shia-chan, right?”

“? … … that’s right”

Yue who didn’t know what he wanted squinted her eyes. Shia, because she was a demi-human, was surprised to be called by “chan”.

The man who heard Yue answer, looked back at the other men behind him and nodded, Yue could see they steeled their minds. The other men also moved forward to the front of Yue or Shia.

Then…

“””””” Yue-chan, please go out with me!!””””””

“””””” Shia-chan! Become my slave!!””””””

In other words, well, something like that. The pick-up lines for Yue and Shia were different because Shia was a demi-human. Even though they needed the master’s permission to transfer the rights of a slave, they must already know how intimate the relationship between Hajime and his party was from their talk at the inn yesterday. So to persuade Hajime they must get Shia first… … or so they thought.

By the way, maybe because the impact from the talk at the inn was too strong, they fact that the slave pact made it so that the slave was unable to oppose its master, somehow escaped their minds. If not so, they should have discovered that Shia wasn’t a slave. Although the strength of the pact could be lowered, no one actually did that.

Well, Yue and Shia who got confessed to were…

“… … Shia, the tool shop is over here”

“Ah, yes. It’s good if we can buy everything at once”

They continued their walk as if nothing had happened.

“Wa-, please wait! Your answer!? Tell us your ans- “”I refuse”” … … guu…”

Because their attitude seemed to think nothing about it, the man let out a groan, some men bent their knees and crumbled on the spot (orz). However, there were also some that didn’t give up. That just goes to show how far above normal Yue and Shia’s level of beauty was. As a result, it couldn’t be helped if they became reckless because of it.

“Then, I’ll make you mine by force!”

The reckless man shouted that, then ‘ginn’ light came from the other men’s eyes. They surrounded the two so they could catch them, then impatiently drew near them.

Finally, the man who talked to them first, jumped out to catch Yue. When the Japanese see that they’d surely shout, “Ah, Lupi* Dive”, something like that.

Yue coldly muttered one thing.

“”Ice Coffin””

Immediately, the man was confined inside a coffin of ice except his head, pulled by gravity and fell. “Gupe!?”, was the miserable scream the man who did the Lu**n Dive raised when he reached the ground.

The other men knew that Ice Coffin was classified as advanced water system magic and were shocked that Yue invoked it just by saying its name. They interpreted it on their own and in their whispers, “She said the incantation beforehand” and “The magic circle must be hidden inside her clothes”, or something along those lines could be heard.

Yue was, walking up determined to the man who was wrapped in ice. Although surrounding them was a shocked air, having seen Yue’s prowess, there was already the second **pin!, among them. That’s why, Yue showed them a warning.

Yue melted the ice that wrapped the man little by little. The man was glad because he might get out of it. In addition, he watched Yue with feverish eyes.

“Y-Yue-chan. I am sorry to do it suddenly! But, I truly think of you as…”

Even though the man wrapped in ice tried to get his feelings across, his words stopped. If you ask why, it was because he noticed the small place where the ice melted. It was…

“U-umm, Yue-chan? Why, umm, why… … is it only the part between my groin?”

That’s right, Yue only melted the ice between the man’s groin. The man was still perfectly restrained. Because he felt something bad would happen, the man with cold sweat said, “Surely, that can’t be, right? Right? Right?”, when he saw Yue’s expression.

Yue curved her mouth slightly to the man.

“… … Aim and shoot”

Then, volleys of gravel continuously hit the man’s nether region.

—— Agh ——!!

—— Stop already-

—— moth~er!

The man’s scream resounded in the morning street. The sound of Mao collecting coins could be heard (To refresh your memory of the sound, please imagine the old **rio) from the man’s groin that was continuously aimed at. Surely the inside was like something that received a boxer’s Demey Roll.

The surrounding men, not only the one that surrounded them, but also the unrelated onlookers, and stall keepers nearby, all crumbled while covering their groin with both hands.

The barrage that seemed to continue for eternity, finally stopped in consideration of the man who already lost his consciousness. Even though it was impossible to lose consciousness with only one blow, it could be done by accumulated damage along with wind magic. As if it was a miracle, Yue who ‘fuu’ blew her forefinger, left her words as a parting gift.

“… … Good, you’ve become a otomen « Maiden »”

On this day, a man died, and became the second Crystabel, and Mariabel-chan was born. This person, under training from manager Crystabel, became the manager of the branch store, and although it was able to increase its fame… … that’s a story for another time.

Yue got her second name, “Crotch Smasher”, that name caused uproars in the adventurer guild and even reached the capital, it was capable of making male adventurers shudder, but this was also a story for another time.

Yue and Shia ignored the frightened gazes of men and continued their shopping. On their way, they could hear girls say, “Yue-oneesama…”, but ignored that and continued their shopping.

* * *

When Yue and Shia went back to the inn, Hajime already finished his work.

“Good work, somehow, there seems to be a fuss inside town, did something happen?”

It seemed he noticed their commotion.

“… … There is no problem.”

“A~, un, that’s right. There’s no problem at all.”

To see a monster as the dress store manager, and had heaven call for a man, the two said it was nothing. Although Hajime felt a little suspicious of them, he shrugged his shoulders and let it go.

“Did you buy all the necessary things?”

“… … Nn, don’t worry.”

“That’s right. There’s also a lot of food, but it was okay. It truly is convenient to have Treasure Box.”

For shopping, Hajime entrusted the “Treasure Box” to them. Having seen Shia look at the ring enviously, Hajime could only reveal a wry smile. With his current proficiency, he was still unable to make “Treasure Box”. It surely would be convenient, when he is capable of crafting it, he would definitely give it to them.

“Well then, Shia. This is yours”

While saying that, Hajime passed Shia a cylindrical object with 40 cm in diameter and 50 cm in length. A silver cylindrical object with a handle installed on its side.

Shia who received the gift from Hajime, was immediately confused when she felt the weight and activated her body strengthening.

“Wh-what is this? It’s really heavy…”

“Well, it’s because that’s your new Sledgehammer. It is good for it to be heavy”

“Heh, this… … is?”

Shia’s doubt was justifiable. The cylindrical object did not look like a hammer at all, and the handle was also too short. No matter what was said, it was unbalanced.

“Aa, that’s the standby state. For now, try to pour some magic into it”

“Umm, like this? kh!?”

As he said, she poured magic into the hammer-like thing, ‘kashun! kasun!’, sounds of machinery emitted from the hammer and the handle extended, it became the right length for a swing mallet.This Sledgehammer was an artifact : Doryukken (named by Hajime). It was equipped with some gimmicks that could be used by Shia. It operates by transforming the parts of the weapon that have magic poured into.

What Hajime wanted to finish was this weapon. When Yue and Shia went shopping in the morning, he was making Shia’s new weapon.

“This is the limit of the current me, I’ll revise it again when my ability improves, because we don’t know what will happen from now on. Although you received Yue’s training, it was only for ten days. It’s still dangerous for you. That’s why that weapon was made while thinking of how to make use of your power to the maximum. Please master it, okay? Because you have become our companion, don’t die without my permission, understand?”

“Hajime-san… … fufu, your speech is all over the place~. It’s okay. Although I am still not strong enough, I’ll follow you anywhere!”

Shia was so happy while embracing Doryukken. Because she was so happy, Yue who felt a little ill-humored by it, thought to herself that it couldn’t be helped, and shrugged her shoulders. Hajime only showed a wry smile. Although he didn’t say it, to witnessed a scene where a beautiful girl was happy because she got a Sledgehammer as a present, he felt it was surreal.

With the joyous Shia in their company, they finished checking out from the inn. Even now, they ignored the inn girl who looked at them with blushing cheeks.

When they got outside, the sun was already at its zenith, and its brilliant shine fell on and warmed them. With his arms spread, Hajime took a deep breath. When he turned around, Hajime could see Yue and Shia were also smiling.

Hajime nodded to the two, and started to advance, followed by Yue and Shia.

It was time to travel again.

Volume 5 Chapter 3


A heap of corpses.

Those words fit the current spectacle inside the Raisen Grand Canyon’s ravine. Some demonic beasts had their heads smashed, along with the ground. While some demonic beasts had theirs pulverized, furthermore some demonic beasts had their body carbonized, although there were various killing methods, all of them died in one attack.

Naturally, inside this hell, the place that was feared as an execution ground by people, there were…

“One hit certain kill~!”

ZUGANn!!

“… … Hindrance”

GOBANn!!

“Shut up”

DOPANn!!

It was the trio of Hajime, Yue, and Shia. After Hajime and his party got out from the town of Brook (with Yue and Shia’s fans seeing them off), using the magic-driven two-wheeler, they passed through the entrance of “Raisen Grand Canyon”. Currently, after advancing further and camping along the way, they had already passed through the cave concealing the path to “Orcus Great Dungeon”, furthermore two days had passed since then.

Inside “Raisen Grand Canyon”, the demonic beasts kept attacking them just as usual.

Shia’s Sledgehammer, swung with immense force smashed demonic beasts, it was literally a one hit certain kill. The demonic beasts were crushed to death with a normal attack that far exceed their defense. Even the mochi pounding moon rabbit’s destructive power paled in comparison to this.

Yue closed in on the demonic beasts, then slaughtered them with magic that she instantly invoked with magical power from her equipment. Although Yue herself has enormous magical power, equipped with magical power stored inside the accessories called magic crystallization stone series, it became even more enormous. Her attack could be compared to endless bombing. Even if magical power was disintegrated in the ravine, thus the time to invoke magic became longer and the distance became shorter, she invoked ultra high temperature flames in no time and demonic beasts were killed while being carbonized without exception.

Hajime, needless to say, was sniping the heads with Donner while driving the magic-driven two-wheeler. Although it was consuming his magic to use “Lightning-clad” and driving the magic-driven two-wheeler at the same time, there is no sign of magic depletion.

The hell beasts that dominate the ravine were completely treated as small fish. The annihilation was treated as a side job while they searched for a sign of the Great Dungeon. The demonic beasts’ corpses overflowed on their way.

“Haa~, even though it should be somewhere inside the Raisen, it was too vast after all”

They moved while examining if there were caves. Even though they made thorough observations, not even one was found. Hajime could only inadvertently complain.

“Well, because no matter what happens we’ll reach the Big Volcanic Mountain, it’s okay to not find it at all. There might be some clues in the Big Volcanic Mountain after all”

“Well, even if that’s so…”

“Nn… … but, those demonic beasts made it gloomy”

“A~, Yue-san also dislikes this place~”

While complaining and being disgusted by the demonic beasts that keep coming, they had kept traveling for three days. There are no results today and the dark had already set in. The beautiful shine of the crescent moon could be seen if you looked up, therefore Hajime and his party started to prepare their camp. After taking out the tent, they prepared dinner with ingredients and seasoning bought in the town. The tent and cooking utensils were artifacts Hajime made.

The tent was created using Creation magic, with “heating stone” and “cooling stone” installed, it’s always kept at a comfortable temperature. It’s also equipped with “refrigerator” and “freezer” made with cooling stone. Furthermore, the metal frame was imbued with “sign interception” from the “mind-severing stone” so that it wouldn’t be found easily by enemies.

For cooking utensils, there was a frying pan and kettle with an adjustable flame that was proportionate with the amount of magic used, and a kitchen knife endowed with “wind claw” in its sharp edge that could be activated by pouring in magic. There was also a steam cleaner-like thing. They were Hajime’s beloved children that help provide the meals on their travel. Moreover, because it could only be used using direct magic manipulation, it could be said that there was a crime prevention system.

“Age of gods magic is truly a convenient one”

Those were the words that Hajime said when he made the cooking utensil artifacts and the tent installed with a heating and cooling system. It’s just like a useless technology, that wasn’t that useless, that he uselessly refined.

By the way, today’s dinner was kururu chicken simmered in tomato. Kururu chicken was a chicken that was capable of flying in the sky. Its meat’s quality and taste was just like chicken, a popular type of chicken meat of this world. It was a dish where the meat was cut into bite size pieces and floured. after that it was sautéd, then boiled along with various vegetables in a tomato soup. It has the right flavor of butter and meat juice inside the meat, you could feel the tomato’s sourness permeate in your nose when you smell it, when you put it into your mouth, the flavors will spread through. The meat will ‘horohoro’, crumble inside your mouth, ‘hokuhoku’ the potato(fake) that’s completely soaked inside the tomato soup, while carrot(fake)’s and onion(fake)’s sweetness transmitted to your tongue. To have bread melt and soften after dipping it inside the delicious soup truly made it more delicious.

Dinner was finished with full satisfaction. and while immersed in the lingering taste, Hajime and his party chatted just like they always do. Inside the tent, they could leisurely chat because the mind-severing stone was activate, which made it so that demonic beasts do not approach them. Although sometimes there were demonic beasts that came near, Hajime only needed to stick his hand out the window that installed, and shoot it. Moreover, when time for sleep, the three rotated the lookout duty until morning came.

Today, it was about time for Yue and Shia to start preparing to sleep. The first on look out was Hajime. Because there were fluffy futons inside the tent, they could sleep comfortably despite it being a camp. Also, Shia went outside the tent before getting into the futon.

To Hajime who was dubious of what happened, Shia said with a calm face.

“For a while, I wanted to pick flowers”

“There are no flowers inside the ravine, you know?”

“Ha-ji-me-sa~n!”

Hajime’s words that lacked delicacy destroyed Shia’s calm face, she angrily stared at him. Hajime who obviously knew what those words meant said, “My bad my bad”, with a wryly smiling face that didn’t show any remorse. Shia hurriedly went to the tent’s side in anger, after a while…

“Ha-Hajime-sa~n! Yue-sa~n! It’s an emergency! Please come he~re!”

Was what Shia shouted out, forgetting the possibility of demonic beasts hearing it. Wondering what happened, Hajime and Yue, who came from the tent, looked at each other then dashed out at the same time.

When they arrived at the origin of Shia’s voice, they saw that there was a huge monolith that leaned on the ravine’s wall after it fell, and a space was revealed between the monolith and the wall. Shia was inside that space seeing something unbelievable! Being colored in excitement all the while.

“Here, over here! I found it!”

“I understand, for the time being get out of there. It looks like you used full body strengthening. Aren’t you too excited?”

“… … annoying”

The frolicking Shia was pulled out by Hajime and Yue’s hands, when Hajime pulled her he got a feel, while Yue gloomily frowned because of that. Guided by Shia into the crevice between the rocks, when they entered the wall’s side had a hollow interior, and it was wider than expected. Having entered that space, Shia silently, with a proud expression ‘bishi’, pointed her finger at the wall.

Hajime and Yue looked at the place pointed by that finger, then they inadvertently let out “Ha?”, while blinking their eyes in surprise.

In front of the two, in that place, there was a splendid rectangular signboard that was made with cuts in the wall, and strangely woman-like characters were carved there.

“Please come in! Into Miledi Raisen’s thrilling Great Dungeon?”

The mark “!” and “?” felt strangely irritating.

“… … the heck is this”

“… … what is this”

Hajime and Yue’s voice came out in succession. “I am seeing something unbelievable right now!”, were the exact presentations of their expressions. The two of them, blankly looked at the signboard inside the hellish ravine.

“To ask what, it is the entrance! Great Dungeon’s! It was found by chance when I went to-… …cough, to pick flowers. Well~, it was real, there is a Great Dungeon inside Raisen Grand Canyon”

While Shia’s slaphappy voice resounded, maybe because Hajime and Yue was finally able to get out of their surprise, they wore indescribable expressions, then looked at each other in perplexion.

“… … Yue. Do you think it’s real?”

“… … … … … … … … … … Nn”

“That’s a long pause there. Your basis?”

“… … Miledi( …)”

“It was that after all…”

“Miledi”, it was the first name of Raisen that appeared on Oscar’s memorandum. Although the name Raisen was conveyed and known by the world, the first name was unknown. Therefore, the chance that a place with its name signed in was the Great Dungeon of Raisen is very high.

But, no matter what, what they were honestly unable to believe was…

“Why must it be this character…”

There was a reason for saying that. Hajime was considering the desperate fights that happened inside the Orcus Great Dungeon, and surely the other dungeons would also be along that line, that’s why the light-heartedness of this made him lose his strength. Yue also understood well the severity of a Great Dungeon, that’s why, her expression said that she still thought maybe it was someone’s prank.

“But, the entrance-like place couldn’t be seen, right? The interior was a dead end…”

Not noticing what happened in Hajime and Yue’s minds, Shia thought, I wonder where the entrance is? And was looking around the surrounding, then she ‘peshipeshi’, hit the hollow part of the wall.

“Oi, Shia. Don’t…”

GAKONn!

“Fukya!?”

“Don’t carelessly move around,” were the words Hajime was unable to finish when part of the wall that Shia touched ‘GURUNn’, suddenly rotated, and Shia disappeared to the other side of the wall. It was like a door mechanism inside a ninja’s house.

“”… …””

The credibility of that signboard miraculously increased with the finding of the entrance of the Great Dungeon. The Great Dungeon of Raisen was here after all. Even though they had a mountain of complaints such as, “Is this really okay for a Great Dungeon?” and “Give me my seriousness from Orcus back”, something like that after seeing that amusement-like invitation. Hajime and Yue who saw Shia silently disappear behind the rotating door, once more, looked at each other then let out sighs, and put their hands onto the rotating door just like Shia.

Having activated the door, Hajime and Yue were sent to the other side just like Shia. The inside was pitch black, and the door was ‘gururi’, rotated back to its former position. And, at that time,

Hyu Hyu Hyu!

Sounds of something coming flying at them resounded, while they couldn’t see anything inside the darkness. Hajime immediately used “Night Vision” and discovered what they were. They were arrows. Countless arrows painted jet black so as to not reflect light, and they came flying to remove any intruders that entered.

Hajime, with Donner in his right hand, used his left hand to beat down those flying jet black arrows. ‘Kan Kan Kan’, the sound of metal knocking metal came out, without missing even one arrow.

When counted, there were 20 arrows. Jet black arrows made of metal and didn’t reflect any light scattered on the ground, when the last arrow was knocked down, silence returned.

At the same time, the surrounding walls began to shine. The area Hajime and his party were in was a room with a length of 10 meters in every direction, and straight ahead, a passage into the interior appeared. In addition, there was a lithograph inside the room with words with the same characters as the signboard carved on it.

“Did you get scared? Hey, did this scare you? Then you’re a kid, Niya Niya”

“Or, were you injured? Or did someone die? … … bufu—”

“” … …””

Hajime and Yue couldn’t think of anything but one thing. That was “How annoying~”. Also, the “Niya Niya” and “bufu-” part that were carved with emphasis as if to provoke them, made them even more irritated. Especially, if someone in their party truly died, then surely the survivor would curse the heaven.

Hajime and Yue were so irritated that many veins popped out on their heads. Then, suddenly, Yue muttered something she just remembered.

“… … Shia?”

“Ah.”

Having heard Yue’s mutter, Hajime finally remembered, then looked back at the rotating door in panic. Because the door only did one rotation at a time, for her to not be here means the possibility that she got out at the same time Hajime and Yue entered were high. It made him feel something unpleasant because even though a lot of time had passed she didn’t enter, so Hajime immediately activated the rotating door.

Shia was… … there as expected. Her form sewn on the rotating door.

“Uu, sob, Hajime-san… … please don’t look~, but, I want you to take these out. Hic, please do it without looking at me~”

It truly was a pitiful appearance. Shia, although unable to see the arrows that came flying, she probably used her natural search ability to somehow manage to dodge them from the sound. However it seemed it was truly last second, with her clothes pierced here and there, she made a pictogram similar to those that were drawn on emergency exits. Her rabbit ears bent into something similar to a lightning bolt to avoid the arrows, because she knew that she had done something impossible, her body still twitched even now. Most of all, Shia didn’t cry out of fear of death. The cause was… … her feet were magnificently wet.

“Now that I remember, you are going to pick some flowers… … well, what to say. You only did the necessary…”

“Wrong! Uu~, just why didn’t you finish that, the past me~!!”

It was an appearance that you’d never want to show as a woman, even more so for Shia who cried because she had shown it to the man she fell for. Her rabbit ears completely hung down. First of all, even if it was a chance to encounter love after 100 years, Hajime thought it was already too late. That’s why, without looking away he stared at her in amazement. And, that hollowed Shia’s heart even more.

“… … Don’t move”

Maybe because she was also a woman, Yue’s expressionlessness contained sympathy and she released Shia from the crucifixion.

“… … I’ll do something about it. You’re still a novice”

“I am ashamed~. Sob”

“… … Hajime, change of clothes”

“Here”

Shia’s change of clothes were pulled out from the “Treasure Box”, then she did a quick change while blushing.

Finally, Shia’s preparations are finished, “It’s time to conquer the Dungeon!”, was the enthusiastic shout that she let out, only to notice the lithograph.

She looked down and her hair concealed her expression. Shia was silent for a while, then she slowly took out Doryukken, and struck the lithograph with all of her might. ‘Gogya’, was the sound that resounded accompanied with the destruction of the lithograph.

Maybe because she was unable to endure it anymore, she magnificently swung Doryukken many many times as if attacking the enemy of her parents.

Then, in the place of the broken lithograph, characters were carved on the ground, it said…

“Sorr~y? This lithograph will automatically be repaired after some time~ Pu-kusukusu!!”

“Mukii— —!!”

Shia was truly enraged and started to swing Doryukken more intensely. The small room was shaken as if a small earthquake happened, the sound of extraordinary impacts were resounding many times.

Watching Shia with a skeptical gaze, Hajime frankly muttered.

“Miledi Raisen, rather than a member of the “Liberators,” she is unquestionably the enemy of humanity”

“… … I absolutely agree on that”

Apparently, the Great Dungeon of Raisen would be a difficult place in a different way than the Orcus Great Dungeon.

Volume 5 Chapter 4


Raisen’s Great Dungeon was a lot more troublesome than they expected.

First, magic couldn’t be used at all. It was because the strength of magic disintegration was far stronger than inside the ravine. For Yue who specialized in magic, this place puts a heavy burden on her. She was unable to use high-ranked magic and her magic’s range of the magic she could use were shortened to their limits here. The farthest she could use them was only five meters. Somehow, the current level of magic she used was enough for combat. However, right now she was incapable of using magic strong enough to deliver a one-hit kill.

In addition, although the amount of magic stored inside the magic crystallization series didn’t decrease much, it couldn’t be used. The consumption rate was too severe after all. Yue was only able to use middle-ranked magic because she was a genius, most people would be unable to do anything.

Even Hajime was greatly affected by it. Special magic that worked by emitting magic outside of the body such as “Aerodynamic” and “Wind Claw” couldn’t be used, Even the output of “Lightning Clad” is greatly decreased. Donner-Schlag’s power also fell below half of the usual, while Schlagen’s maximum power was at the usual level of Donner-Schlag.

Therefore, body strengthening became the most important magic in this Great Dungeon. In Hajime’s party, Shia had become the main star in this stage.

So, the reliable rabbit ears of Hajime’s party…

“I’ll do it, you know… …absolutely, when I reach the dwelling I’ll mess it up so much it’ll be as if a storm had gone through”

With Doryukken on her shoulder, she examined her surroundings as if she was trying to find her prey. Her anger was obvious. It was a deep deep anger. Even her words’ intonation had become strange. The cause was, you could imagine it came from Miledi Raisen’s mischievousness.

Because they understood Shia’s feelings well, Hajime and Yue couldn’t say anything about it. It was because if there was someone who was seriously agitated, by her side there would be someone calm in reverse of her. It was the current psychological state of Hajime and Yue. Currently, while Hajime and his party continued their advance, they had encountered various traps and annoying carved words. That’s why, with Shia who was truly enraged by it, Hajime and Yue also felt irritated.

Finally, “Fuhihi”, strange laughter came from Shia’s side, and Hajime recalled the extremely malicious things they encountered to get here.

* * *

After Shia destroyed the annoying lithograph, Hajime and his party continued their advance into the passage, and came into a certain vast space.

Inside, there were staircases and passages, the passageway that continued from the entrance was a mess without any regularity, it was as if this place was made by casually combining lego blocks. The staircase from the first floor was connected to a passage on the third floor, and the passage on the third floor gradually became a slope that connected to the first floor’s passageway. While the staircase that was erected on the second floor was connected to nothing but wall, it was truly a mess.

“Once again, in a way it was truly a dungeon-like place.”

“… … Nn, it is confusing.”

“Fun, as expected of a dungeon made by a rotten person. This mess is an expression of her mind’s contents.”

“… … because we understand what you feel, it’s about time for you to calm down.”

Shia was enraged even now. Hajime, half-sympathized and half-amazed, said, “Well then, how should we advance now”, while thinking about it.

“… … Hajime. Even if you think about it, there’s no other method.”

“Nn~, well, you’re right. For now, let’s advance while marking and mapping the way.”

“Nn…”

Hajime nodded at Yue’s words. Mapping was the basic thing for exploring a dungeon. However, Hajime unconsciously frowned when he thought how troublesome it’d be to accurately map out a complex dungeon like this.

Also, what Hajime meant by “marking” was using a special magic called “Tracking.” This special magic operated by leaving a “mark” made of magical power on the places that he touched. When the “mark” was used on living things, Hajime was able to track where they moved. In case of this place, Hajime put his “mark” on the wall. Because the “mark” could be made visible, Yue and Shia were able to understand it. Maybe because the magic power was applied directly, the disintegration didn’t seem to take effect.

Hajime immediately put a “mark” on side of the passageway on the nearest place to the entrance and continued to advance.

The passageway was two meters wide, and made from countless blocks that looked like bricks. Because the walls emitted a faint light, there was no problem with their vision. Maybe it was made of a different material from the green-light stone because it gave off bluish lights.

When Hajime tried to see it using “Mineral Appraisal,” he found that it was called “phosphorous ore.” Apparently it gave off light when it came in contact air. The first room didn’t give off light probably because it was the first room. The image that came out of the cave was lapu** where the levit

*** stone appeared. There was an old man’s voice that came out of the stone. After all, the phosphorous ore would keep radiating light as long as it was in contact with air.

It was the masterpiece anime of Japan that Hajime unintentionally thought of while advancing in the long passageway. Suddenly,

GAKONn

The sound came out of one of the blocks that Hajime stepped on. That block sunk into the floor due to Hajime’s weight. Hajime and his party instinctively let out, “Eh?”, and looked at their feet.

At that moment,

Shaaaaa!!

The sound of gliding blades resounded, and in the space between blocks on the wall, giant saw-toothed blades come out rotated in high speed while vibrating. The blades approached them with height of the neck from the right, the one from the left wall at the height of the waist.

“Evade it!”

Hajime immediately shouted, and evaded it by leaning his back just like the protagonist from the matr**, while the two behind him also tried to evade. Yue was small in the first place so she only needed to squat down to evade. Shia also seemed to be able to evade it. From his back, “Hawawa, hawawawa”, a shaken voice could be heard. Because there was no pain in her voice, Hajime guessed she must be unharmed. Although it was truly at a hair’s breadth that the tip of the fur of her rabbit ear was cut… … it was not a problem at all.

The two blades that were filled with murderous intent and malice were unable do anything to Hajime and his party, and disappeared into the walls. Being vigilant of a possible second wave, for a while Hajime watched his surroundings carefully. However, apparently that was the end. Having felt relieved, Hajime let out a sigh then looked at his back only to feel a chill.

He dashed out instinctively, to retreat and using the momentum recovered Yue and Shia. Immediately, countless blades fell onto the place where Hajime and his party were in just like a guillotine, and cut the ground as if it was made of butter. As expected, it was rotating in high speed and vibrating just like the blades from before.

Hajime looked at the blades that dropped just a few centimeters ahead with cold sweat. Yue and Shia also stiffened because of it.

“… … it was a completely physical trap. I couldn’t sense it with my Magic Eye.”

Until now, Hajime was able to avoid traps perfectly because they were magic traps. Of all the traps in the Great Dungeon that he had seen, all of them contained magic. That’s why, if it was a magic trap, Hajime’s Magic Eye was able to see through it. Therefore, he had the preconception that it was okay as long as the Magic Eye didn’t react to something. In short, he overestimated his power.

“Hau~, I-I thought I was dead~. Rather, Hajime-san! Please stop it if it was just that much! Isn’t that why you have the artificial arm?!”

“Well, don’t you think those blades were sharp? Even if it won’t be able to cut it, there might be scratches. After all, I can’t use Vajra now.”

“S-scratches… … between equipment and me, which is more important!?”

“… … well, you’re safe after all. Isn’t that good.”

“Wa-, what’s with that topic evasion! That was a lie, right? I am the one that’s more important, right? Right?”

Shia tried to ask Hajime, who played her for a fool, and Yue added verbal abuse to the current Shia.

“… …Keaking rabbit. You’re dying because of your own inexperience.”

“Le-leaking, please take that back, Yue-san! No matter what, that was a disgrace for me!”

A new disgraceful title added to Shia’s ”

*** rabbit” series, while Shia endured it with protest. Having entered this dungeon, although she almost died twice in short succession Shia was unexpectedly energetic. As expected, Shia’s forte was taking hits. Even though the person herself won’t admit it.

It was as Shia complained, there were other choices to evade the surprise attack, after all Hajime should be able to stop those blades from a while ago with his artificial arm. His coat’s also made from the leather of a demonic beast that boasted defense, and there were protectors underneath to guard the vital points, that’s right he wouldn’t have died from something like that.

However, the trap just now was nothing but overkill if it was against normal humans. If it were a normal protector, it’d be easily cut in two. After all, if you didn’t have the equipment that Hajime made from the materials that he’d gotten from the Abyss, there was no other way to survive than to avoid it.

“Well, there is no problem if it was that much”

While watching Yue and Shia’s quarrel with skeptical eyes, Hajime told that to himself. No matter how powerful, if it was just physical traps then it wouldn’t be able to kill Hajime. Yue also had her “Auto Regeneration.” She wouldn’t die over a trap. In other words… …Shia was the only one in danger. Even though he didn’t know if Shia had noticed that, it was probably because Shia’s stress level had reached the heavens.

“Huh? Hajime-san, what’s with those pitying eyes…”

“Please live strongly, Shia…”

“Eh, ee? What are you suddenly saying? Although I could felt something very unpleasant from it…”

* * *

Hajime and his party advanced while being wary of traps.

Even now, they hadn’t seen even one demonic beast. Although they considered the possibility that this dungeon didn’t have demonic beasts in it, that was just optimism. It wouldn’t be strange if they suddenly appeared, because that’s also a form of a trap.

Hajime and his party reached an open space after exiting the passageway. The roads were split into three inside the room. For now, Hajime put down the “mark”, then Hajime and his party chose the leftmost passage that lead to a staircase that went down.

“Uu~. somehow I got a bad feeling about this. Look, my rabbit ears restlessly move from left to right.”

Having advanced a few step on the stairs, suddenly, Shia blurted that out. Just as she said, Shia’s rabbit ears stood upright, then began to move left and right.

“You, don’t raise any strange flags now. If you say something like that, usually, something will immediately “GAKON“… see!

“I-It’s not my fault!?”

“… …Flag rabbit!”

While Hajime and Shia talked, an unpleasant sound resounded, and suddenly the stair’s steps disappeared. It was a considerably inclined staircase, and with the disappearance of the steps it became a slope. Moreover, tar-like slippery liquid began to overflow from the countless small holes on the surface.

“Kuh, this—!”

When the steps became a slope, Hajime immediately transmutated the minerals on the bottom of his shoes into spikes, his artificial arm’s fingers were also made into spikes so that he wouldn’t slip down. Yue immediately jumped to Hajime before she started to slip. Hajime who read that also braced himself. As expected, they were harmonized even in this place.

However, there was still one more person who was unable to do that kind of cooperation. It goes without saying that it was Shia.

“Ukyaaa!?”

When it became a slope, Shia raised a scream then the back of her head hit the surface hard. “Nuuaa!”, as she writhed in pain, then slipped along while covered in that liquid. In that state, with her legs opened in a M character, she collided with Hajime’s face.

“Bu!?”

The spikes on his artificial arm came off because of the impact, Hajime was overturned backward with his left arm holding Yue. Then the spikes on his feet also came off, he slipped down the slope headfirst. Shia was on top of Hajime with a reversed position.

“You! Clumsy rabbit! Move now!”

” I am sorry, but to move-~”

While slipping, their speed became faster. Hajime desperately tried to stab the spikes on his artificial arm and shoes on the ground, but they were too fast, so it didn’t go well. Then, he tried to transmute the staircase but with the strong disintegration inside the dungeon, it also didn’t turn out well.

Shia, while struggling was somehow able to get up. Now, it was as if she was riding Hajime.

“Use Doryukken’s stake!”

Hajime gave an instruction to Shia. The Sledgehammer Doryukken that Shia carried had a few gimmicks prepared inside, one of them was to form a stake on the head part of the hammer. It was a mechanism to raise the penetrative power by focusing on one spot. If that was stabbed on the surface they should be able to stop.

“Y-yes, leave it to me!? Hajime-san! The road—!”

Shia tried to remove Doryukken from its fastening/holding device on her back. Then, Shia who looked forward immediately raised an uneasy voice.

Hajime was able to realize what had happened. When Shia slipped before, it was likely dropped.

“Kh! Yue!”

“Nn!”

Hajime immediately called out Yue’s name. Even with only that Yue was able to read Hajime’s intentions.

“Shia, hold on tight!”

“Y-yes!”

While still riding Hajime, Shia tightly clung to him.

Finally, they reached the end of the slope and they were thrown in the air. One moment of weightlessness/floating. At that chance, Yue invoked her magic.

“”Soar”!”

It was an elementary-ranked magic of wind system. It magic created a strong vertical updraft, and it’d increased one’s jumping power. An expert would be able to make pseudo-flight using this magic. However, in this place magical power was hard to maintain. That’s why, Yue’s magic only lasted for a few seconds and its effect only made Hajime and his party float.

“It’s enough.”

Hajime’s voice that was mixed with praise resounded. That’s right, for Hajime, it was enough if he got the time to confirm their surroundings. Yue completely and splendidly answered his expectations.

Hajime, with Yue on his left arm, and Shia clinging to his neck, hung his artificial arm toward the ceiling. Then, he poured his magic power…

PASHU!

A sound come out along with a thin wire with an anchor installed on it and shot out from his artificial arm, it pierced the ceiling’s wall. Then, because of the anchor they were fixed to their place.

Hajime and his party were currently hanging with one wire that hung on the ceiling, they felt relieved after confirming the anchor did not come off.

Then, they felt regret when they saw what was under them.

Kasakasakasa, washawashawasha, kiikii, kasakasakasa.

Those sounds came from a lot of scorpions wriggling around. Its length around 10 cm. Although it didn’t give off the same feeling as that scorpion-look-alike, it gave them the psychological feeling of disgust. If they didn’t halt their fall with the anchor, they would dive into a sea of scorpions, and it gave them goosebumps all over their bodies when they thought that.

“”” … …”””

The trio fell into silence. Because they didn’t want to look below, they looked at the ceiling. Then, somehow they noticed lights emitting into some characters. It was already too late, Hajime and his party inadvertently read it.

“These guys doesn’t have lethal poison.”

“But, you’ll be paralyzed.”

“Please be satisfied by lying with these cute children, pugya—!!”

Maybe she purposely set up these phosphorus ores there, those characters were standing out in the dim space. Those who fell here would surely, with scorpions wriggling around their body, desperately try to move, and try to reach out to heaven (ceiling). Then, they’d discover it. Those playful words.

“”” … …”””

Once again, Hajime and his party fell into silence but because of something else. “Ignore it, ignore it”,was what they told to themselves, and somehow they were able to observe their surroundings.

“… … Hajime, over there.”

“Nn?”

Because Yue noticed something, she pointed her finger to a certain place below. There was an empty tunnel.

“A tunnel… … what should we do? Are we going to climb up to our previous location or are we going over there?”

“I-I will follow Hajime-san’s decision. I have been nothing but a burden after all…”

“No need, the punishment will come from the dungeon, so don’t mind it.”

“That only makes me even more anxious! Isn’t it better to just say “don’t mind it”~”

“… …Impudent. The punishment will become twice.”

“Wh-wha, Yue-san also joined him!? Uu, even if the dungeon is conquered, the future looks dark.”

Hajime and Yue forgave Shia who lamented.

“Haa, no matter, what would be useful is if we could use your “chosen future”~”

“Uu, that was still. Although I’ve been practicing…”

“Chosen future” was Shia’s special magic. It was able to catch a glimpse of the future under some assumptions. However, it can only be used once a day, it was impractical because this special magic required large amounts of magic power to use. Even though Shia specialized in body strengthening, if her magic power drained she’d only be a shameless rabbit. Although the amount of consumption was decreasing because of daily training… … it was still a long way from mastering it.

“Well, it can’t be helped if we can’t use it. Rather than returning, it feels better to advance, so let’s go to the tunnel.”

“… … Nn”

“Yes.”

Hajime shot out another anchor then moved just like tarzan until they safely reached the tunnel.

Hajime and his party advanced in the passageway that was lit by phosphorus ores while being vigilant about any unpleasant traps that might appear.

Volume 5 Chapter 5


At the doorway of a certain passage. You’d noticed that somehow there were only walls in the passage. Normally, one would see it as a dead end. However, some parts of the walls were actually connected to a room from several minutes ago.

Silence lingered in the air, immediately, sparks started to appear from the dead end-like wall, and a hole where people could pass through in a half-crouching position appeared. Creeping out of it were…

“Zehah zehah, hu-hurry it up.”

“… …Nn, it’d be troublesome to be crushed by this.”

“Well, I don’t think that was at a level where you’ll only feel troubled, right? Wouldn’t you normally die from it?”

It was the trio of Hajime, Yue, and Shia. Hajime and his party were wandering around after escaping via the tunnel inside the scorpions’ room. Then, they arrived at a room that had a standard trap where the ceiling dropped down and crushed them.

They were unable to escape the room because the range was too vast. Immediately, Hajime and Shia used their backbones to support the ceiling, and with that chance he used transmutation to make a hole in the ceiling.

Most of all, transmutation was becoming harder to use because of strong magic disintegration in this place, the speed of transmutation became a quarter of the usual, and the range only one meter, while the amount of magic consumption became tenfold the usual. That’s why, Hajime only managed to transmute a small space just enough to hold three people, and they moved toward the exit.

“Damn, even “High-speed magic recovery” was useless. The amount of recovered was too small”

“… … for now, do you want to drink… … recovery potion?”

“Now now, please drink your full~”

“You guys, somehow you have too much composure…”

Hajime who felt a little tired, sat while leaning on the wall, Yue held the gesture of feeding someone chocolate, while Shia got the magic-recovery potion from her pouch. Although it was possible to use the magic crystallization stone to replenish his magic, while it was convenient to get magic power from it, he wanted to preserve it. Furthermore in this situation it was more appropriate to use a magic-recovery potion.

Hajime who felt that he was in a play, as a salary-man with Yue and Shia, and thought, “I can’t make any rebuttal on it”, while he received the recovery potion and drink it in a flash. It tasted almost the same as Li**vitan D. Hajime felt the differences in speed and amount of recovery from magic crystallization stone was significant compared to this, but he could feel that his vitality had recovered a lot. “Ush!”, was how he psyched himself up and stood up.

Once again, they discovered those annoying sentences.

“Pupu—, in a hurry~?, how uncou~th”

Apparently these annoying sentences were a set along with the traps. Miledi Raisen… … was a person who put in a lot of effort to harass someone.

“W-we aren’t in a hurry! Absolutely not! We aren’t that uncouth!”

Having traced Hajime’s gaze, Shia who found those annoying sentences let out, “GRR!”, while protesting toward those characters. It seemed Shia’s hostility toward Miledi already reached the heavens. She reacted every time she found those annoying sentences. Probably, if Miledi was still alive she would have said, “Good prey have come!”, while grinning.

“Ignore that, let’s go. You don’t need to mind that every time.”

“… …What you thought is important.”

“Uu, okay.”

Afterwards, they advanced on the passage, and they reached rooms with other traps waiting. Suddenly, poisoned arrows came from every direction, sulfuric acid-like liquid which melted anything that entered the pitfall, there was also a room where the floor turned into something like an Antlion Nest, with a worm-like demonic beasts in the center of the room, also the annoying sentences. The stress level of Hajime and his party increased at mach speed.

Even so, they passed through all of the traps, and arrived at the biggest passage they had gone through in this dungeon. Its width around 6-7 meters. It gradually became a slope that bent to the right. It was probably a passage that descended in a spiral shape.

Hajime and his party kept vigilant. There was no way that a passage like this didn’t had any traps in it.

After a while, their thoughts proved to be right. An unpleasant sound, “GAKONn!”, of a mechanism could be heard. Immediately, they realized that they hadn’t stepped on or pushed any switches. Then, you didn’t need to use switches before!, was the grand rebuttal that Hajime thought, surely Miledi Raisen would have been happy to hear that as he let out a “Guh.”

What kind of trap is it now?, was what Hajime and his party thought while examining their surroundings vigilantly. Then they heard something.

GOROGOROGOROGOROGOROGOROGOROGORO

It was the sound of something heavy rolling down.

“”” … …”””

The trio went silent and looked at each others, then they looked overhead at the same time. They couldn’t see anything because the slope was curved. The strange noise became louder, then… … a giant boulder as big as the passage rolled down from the curve. The rock was in the form of a big ball. It was a completely standard trap. Surely, after they desperately ran away, those annoying sentences would be there.

Yue and Shia already turned their heels to run away as fast as they could. However, they were immediately stopped. It was because Hajime didn’t move away.

“… …Nn, Hajime?”

“Hajime-san!? Let’s hurry or else we will be crushed!”

The duo called out to him, however Hajime didn’t answer back, then kneeled down while extending his right hand straight forward. His palm hung towards the big ball. Finally, he drew out his left arm with ‘Ghgh’, to the limit, and “Kiiiii!!”, the sound of an activated mechanism resounded.

Hajime watched the approaching, roaring big ball, and his lips transformed into a fierce smile.

“Every time, I won’t always do what you expect! It doesn’t fit my nature!”

From his artificial arm, “Kiiiiii!!”, sound of mechanism became louder along with Hajime’s word.

Then…

GOGAaAAN!!!

A loud sound of something being destroyed emerged when Hajime’s artificial arm met the big ball. The big ball’s force only pushed Hajime back a little, thanks to his spikes, while Hajime’s attacked crushed the big ball at the center when they collided, and it was cracked all over. The big ball’s force disappearing could be seen.

“RAaAAA!!”

Hajime shook his left fist along with the roar. Because the big ball’s durability was barely exceeded by the power of Hajime’s fist, it crumbled, and Hajime’s fist was the victor. A thundering sound could be heard when the big ball crumbled and scattered into tiny pieces.

Hajime draw back his fist while shaking it, then “Fuh”, he stood up. The sound of mechanisms couldn’t be heard anymore from his artificial arm. Hajime observed his artificial left arm to check for any abnormalities while clasping and opening the hand. Then he turned to Yue and Shia.

His expression was truly refreshing. “I did it!”, was the feeling it emitted. It seemed Hajime also couldn’t take it anymore, because he had accumulated too much stress from the traps that he couldn’t detect followed by those annoying words.

What Hajime used this time was the same attack that defeat one of Faea Belgaen’s Elders, a combination of a bullet’s explosive power and “Great Arm,” in addition, he used his artificial arm to invoke vibration magic to crush the boulder, in other words an oscillation fracture. Because of the huge burden, it was only to be used once, normally it was his last resort… … but he couldn’t endure it so that happened.

Hajime, with a satisfied expression, turned around and he was greeted by Yue and Shia who were excited.

“Hajime-sa~n! Just as expected of you! That was so cool! That was so neat!”

“… …Nn, neat.”

“Hahaha, of course, of course. With this, the path…”

Hajime wanted to answer to their praise. However, his words were interrupted.

GOROGOROGOROGOROGOROGOROGOROGORO

They could hear that sound. Hajime’s smile stiffened. Shia also stiffened her smile and the expressionless Yue twitched her cheeks. Hajime turned around with ‘GIGIGI,’ as if he was a machine that was forgot to be oiled and what greeted him was…

— — — — — a big metallic ball that shone with a black luster.

“Lies”

Hajime inadvertently muttered that while having a stiff smile.

“U-umm, Hajime-san. Maybe it was just my imagination, but, somehow that thing also scatters a strange liquid…”

“… …It melts.”

That’s right, the big metallic ball approached them while scattering liquid around that came from small holes on its surface, and places that got splattered with the liquid melted, with a ‘Shuwa—,’ that kind of dangerous sound.

Hajime, after confirming that, “Fuu~”, let out a breath, then faced Yue and Shia with a smile. After that, while smiling he shouted, “Let’s run! Damn it!”, and immediately he splendidly started running to descend the slope, just like a sprinter.

Yue and Shia also looked at each other for a while then, ‘kururi,’ chased after Hajime in a dash.

At their backs, the sound of metal touching the ground along with the dissolution liquid approached them with its speed that gradually increased.

“NOoOOO!! I absolutely don’t want to be melted~!”

“… …Nn, let’s run for now.”

Shia’s lament echoed inside the passage.

“Rather, Hajime-sa~n! Its cruel to run ahead of us! Cold-hearted! Demon!”

Shia protested to Hajime who ran ahead of them.

“Noisy! It’s a calculation error, a calculation error! Just shut up and run!”

“What’s with that excuse! You don’t care if anything happens to me, right!? Uwaa~n, I’ll come to haunt you if I die!”

“… … Shia, surprisingly calm?”

Even while desperately running away, Shia was able to firmly complain, Yue was amazed by it.

They finally saw the end of the passage. He confirmed it with “Far-sight,” apparently it was quite a big and wide space. However, what he saw was a little strange. He couldn’t see the floor of the room even after a long time. Perhaps, the exit of the passage that Hajime and his party were on was on top of the room’s ceiling.

“It’ll be a descent!”

“Nn.”

“Yes!”

Hajime and his party were sliding when they passed through the passage to the room, they descended on the exit.

Then,

“Geh!?”

“Nnh!?”

“Hinh!?”

Three different groans were raised. Right under the exit was a pool filled with an obviously dangerous liquid.

“That bastard!”

Hajime immediately shot out knives from his artificial arm, then used his artificial arm’s anchor, while his right arm caught Yue to prevent her from falling.

At the same time, the metallic ball that scattered around dissoluting liquids dashed out overhead, and fell into the pool before their eyes. It sunk with ‘blub blub,’ sounds, while smoke rose.

“”Wind Wall””

Yue used her magic to disperse the scattered corrosive liquid. For a while, they carefully examined their surroundings and nothing else happened, finally Hajime let his tension leave his shoulders.

“Sob, hic, why only me… … only me… … uu, sob”

Somehow at her side, Shia’s crying voice could be heard, if you look carefully she was stuck onto the wall by having several knives pierce her clothing, pinning her to the wall..

” ? Why did you suddenly cry?”

“… …Emotionally unstable?”

“If you see my current state you should understand. Why was only Yue-san held gently, while I was crucified. Hajime-sa~n, please, can you just be even a little dere to me?”

“Well, didn’t I save you?”

“That’s wrong. I want to be saved in the state that more girl-like… … you understand right!? I wanted to be saved while being held just like Yue-san!”

“… … Shia”

“Sob, what is it, Yue-san?”

“… …Look at the reality”

“What does that mean!?”

“You see, Shia. You’re only our companion, and that’s how I’ll treat you… … Yue is the one I love after all, that’s why it can’t be helped that my body moved on reflex, right?”

“Uu~”

After the justifiable complaint and those justifiable words were said, while ‘pura~n,’ crucified, tears floated on the edge of Shia’s eyes and groaning could be heard. When he said, “the one I love”, Yue’s cheeks were blushing, and while being held by Hajime she rubbed her cheek against Hajime’s chest.

“Absolu~tely, I will make you fall for me and save me by holding me!”

“What a spirited fellow~”

“… …You have the spirit… … I will pay attention to it.”

Under them was the pool of corrosive liquid, while hanging, Hajime and his party still did the love-comedy antic. They were quite composed as expected.

Hajime and his party moved like a pendulum using the anchor, then landed to the ground after jumping over the pool of dissolution liquid.

It was a large rectangular room. On the both side of the walls, there were sets of two meter tall knight armor equipped with large swords and shields. Furthest from the room was a staircase, before that was an altar and there was a door that gave out solemn aura. On the altar was a diamond shaped yellow crystal.

Hajime who looked at that surroundings frowned slightly.

“That was quite a door. Is it Miledi’s hobby? If that’s so then I’ll cheer… … is it only me or aren’t those suits of knight armor giving off a bad feeling?”

“… … it’s okay, it’ll be just like promised.”

“Are they going to attack us? It won’t be absolutely okay after all?”

Hajime and his party advanced toward the center of the room while saying that, surely it was as promised.

The sound that was familiar to them came out.

GAKON!

Hajime and his party immediately halt. They thought, “As expected~”, while looking around at their surroundings, and from the eye slits in the knight’s helmets, ‘GINn’, it shone. Then, ‘gashagasha,’ sounds of metal rubbing each other came when those knights moved from their spot. They numbered 50.

Those knights, raised their shields while wielding their large swords in a piercing stance with their waist slightly lowered. Then, they completed the encirclement.

“Haha, it really is as promised. Although it was okay to destroy them before they moved. Well, there is no need to say… … Yue, Shia, shall we?”

“Nnh”

“A-aren’t they are too many? Well, I’ll do it anyway…”

Hajime pulled out Donner-Schlag. Although Metherai’s machine gun was more effective against such numbers, he didn’t know how many traps were set in this room. The barrage of bullets that shot out indiscriminately would trigger all of them. Therefore, he chose the two railguns.

Yue answered Hajime’s words with a yell filled with fighting spirit. She understood that she had the least fire-power inside this dungeon. However, she would not be a burden. As Hajime’s partner, she won’t lose to something like this. Even more so from now, there would be existences acting as her rivals in love, so she must not show any weaknesses.

On Shia’s side, she lowered her waist a little. This party member was the lowest in terms of influence, but not her power. She knew her battle experience was still considerably insufficient. First of all the battle against demonic beasts in the ravine merely lasted for five days. Even if the mock battle against Yue was included, it was only a little over two weeks of battle experience. Because she also came from the Haulia tribe renowned for their gentleness, it was impossible for her to have a resolute attitude in battle. Rather, it could be said she showed great guts just to hold Doryukken while confronting her enemies.

“Shia.”

“Y-yes! Wh-what is it, Hajime-san”

Shia answered with a nervous voice when she heard Hajime’s voice calling her. His voice was more tender than usual… … or maybe it was just Shia’s imagination.

“You are strong. We guarantee it. You won’t lose against these golems. That’s why, don’t ever think you’re weak. If it becomes dangerous I’ll come to help for sure.”

“… …Nn, it’s my job to take care of my apprentice’s problems.”

Having heard Hajime and Yue’s words, Shia inadvertently became teary eyed. She was simply happy. Although she was treated harshly, when she thought it was because she was a burden, it made her feel uneasy… … it was a needless anxiety. A novice should only do what a novice can do, as best she could. Shia activated whole body strengthening, then she powerfully and firmly stomped on the ground.

“Fufu, Hajime-san is a little dere now. I’m full of motivation now! Yue-san, the day for me to surpass you must be close.”

“” … …Don’t get carried away.””

Although Hajime and Yue said that with amazed looks, Shia who had her tension maxed didn’t hear that. She faced straight ahead and glared at the knights.

“Here I! Come!”

“No, like I’ve said before, how did you get that material… … ah, she’s already gone.”

“… …Daa~”

“… … I won’t refute that. I absolutely won’t refute that”

With 50 Golem Knights in front of him, Hajime carried a tired expression even before the fight began. As if they understood Hajime’s state… … the Golem Knights started to attack the intruders all at once.

Volume 5 Chapter 6


The Golem knights’ movements were agile, despite their large build. ‘Gashah gashah’, was the noise that appeared while they rapidly approached, they gave off intense force along with their glinting weapons. It was as if walls were closing in from all directions.

And Hajime aimed at those golem knights. Even though the two railguns he grasped in his hands were only able to put out power less than half the usual, their power that was still several times that of a real rifle, and was shot at the golem knights.

DOPAN! DOPAN!

Two flashes of light targeted and shot two golem knights’ heads accurately, at the eyes’ parts. The knights fell on their backs from the impact to their heads. When the next set of knights drew near, Hajime lightly jumped. Then he shot them in rapid succession, and the lethal encirclement was thrown into disarray.

Having endured Hajime’s storm-like gunfire using shields, large swords, and the bodies of their companions, several knights finally drew near Hajime and his party.

However, that was the gray hair with a blue hue Shia Haulia’s killzone, who had set up her superheavy Sledgehammer in the air. Without any need to talk, with her physical ability strengthened to the limit, she let out a blow that cleared away everything.

“Deeyaaa!!”

DOoGAAAA!!

There was a yell. She brought down her Sledgehammer, Doryukken, with a tremendous impacting sound one of the golem knights was flattened. Although the knight set up its shield beforehand, it defense was still crushed.

There were cracks and a dent on the ground caused by Doryukken. The attack was released with all her might, maybe after it confirmed the dead body, a knight was able to set up its shield and endure the impact, while trying to cut Shia in two with its large sword.

Shia firmly confirmed that with a side glance. Twisting the handle, she adjusted the angle of Doryukken’s head, then pulled the trigger.

DOGANn!!

Such an explosive sound came from Doryukken that was on the ground and it jumped. At Shia’s side a shotshell fluttered after rejecting from its case. While riding on Doryukken’s momentum, Shia rotated in her place and delivered a blow carrying great centrifugal force. The knight that tried to bring down its large sword was hit in its flank.

“Rhaaa!!”

She let out a shout filled with vigor. The knight that received the direct hit had its body bent, as if it was run over by a speeding truck, it magnificently rolled to the back and hit the other approaching knights. The knight’s body, because it was unable to stop itself, was squashed and did not gave any sign of movement.

Hyun Hyun

That sound of wind entered Shia’s rabbit ears. When she took a peek at it, it was a large sword that the golem knights had raised, it was rotating mid-air after having parted from the knight. Shia jumped and grabbed the large sword, and then with all her might, she threw it at the oncoming golem knight.

The large sword flew with great velocity, and when it collided with the shield that the golem knight had set, the shield was flipped. Not missing that chance, Shia swung Doryukken from below. The golem knight which had a large build received the impact in its abdomen and floated in the air. Although it tried to swing the large sword in desperation, Shia raised Doryukken then using the centrifugal force, clashed with the large sword, and this time Doryukken attacked the floating knight from a lower angle.

Just like the previous golem knight, was blown away like a cannonball and flew at the nearby golem knights, swallowing them with its large build and laid on the ground.

A smile floated on Shia’s lips. It was not like she felt the pleasure of fighting. She was only happy that she could fight properly. She felt that she could continue traveling with Hajime and Yue now. At that moment, she was a little distracted.

On the battlefield, such a thing is fatal. When she’d noticed, a lot of knights’ shields had already drawn near. Somehow, the golem knights decided to throw their shields toward Shia. As expected of golems, they flew with extraordinary power, although it wouldn’t be fatal against Shia’s strengthened body, they have enough power to cause a concussion. If that happens, it’s easy to imagine what’ll happen next.

How careless! Though there was no time to think that, she at least tried to steel herself to endure the incoming attacks. Then, a laser-like water current attacked the shields right before they collided with Shia, and it bent their trajectories. The shields passed by the sides of Shia’s head, then crashed into the golem knights behind her.

“… …Unpreparedness is one’s greatest enemy. Punishment will be thrice the usual.”

“Fue!? Just now, was that from Yue-san? I-I am sorry, also thank you very much! Wait, punishment will be thrice!?”

“Nn… … don’t daydream.”

“Uh, yes! I will try my best!”

With a “Meh!” —like feeling Yue scolded her, Shia was also conscious of her small carelessness. She braced herself while reflecting on it. Once more, she tried to defeat the approaching golem knights. With help from water lasers that flew from behind her back, the golem knight that tried to perform a sneak attack from behind of Shia was confirmed to be cleanly bi-sected.

Shia felt a warm feeling inside her knowing that Yue will protect her back. To not show any disgrace in front of her master, she raised her fighting spirit.

Afterwards, the same water current flew at the knight who tried to go into the rampaging Shia’s blind spot, and cut it just with sharpness keener than blades. What Yue used was middle-ranked magic from water system called “Rupture.” It was a water cutter that fired the moisture in the air at ultra high-pressure.

In Yue’s hands were big metallic water bottles. There were also two other water bottles on her shoulder strap. These were something taken out by Hajime from “Treasure Box.” Every time Yue muttered the magic’s name, water cutter would fly out from the water bottles that she held.

Although Yue was able to use the moisture in the air, she thought it would consume too much magic power to pressurize it from scratch. Moreover, utilizing the exit of the water bottle to aim, the water cutter that came out didn’t contain magic itself, so it wouldn’t affected by the disintegration and disappear.

Shia’s explosive area attack, was supported by Yue’s water blade that covered her blind spots. The knights were incapable of breaking the duo’s combination, and one by one they were destroyed as if being played with.

Hajime who took a side glance to look at Yue and Shia’s splendid cooperation floated a wry smile.

“Oioi, you can do it after all. I wonder if I would also be capable of displaying something good?”

While joking to himself, Hajime started to enter close-combat with Donner-Schlag (…).

He warded off a descending large sword of a knight with Schlag’s barrel, and shot its helmet at zero distance with Donner in his right hand. Without looking at that knight who flew backwards, he warded off an attack from behind with Schlag, and shot the knight behind him without turning around, then he squatted down while rotating to dodge large swords that were swung horizontally, the knights’ hands were intersected and he shot their sides.

A shot that didn’t use “Lightning-clad” ricocheted from the knight’s shield and hit a nearby knight’s knee joint, destroying its balance. And then he jumped up and while reversing his view, he destroyed the knight and another nearby knight at the same time from overhead. He parried large swords aimed at him with the back of his hands, then fired to his side while mid-air and four knights’ heads were shot and crushed at the same time. As he landed, he took the bullets from “Treasure Box,” and reloaded the guns by spinning them, and he resumed shooting while spinning. The surrounding knights were blown away radially.

Doing that, without leaving a chance to be scratched, they slaughtered those golem knights one by one.

However…

“… …?”

While counterattacking the golem knights, Hajime raised his eyebrows in doubt. The reason being that, although a lot of the golem knights were destroyed, there was no change of density that approaching.

It seems, Yue and Shia were also having that doubt. Finally, when they carefully observed the battlefield, the golem knights that they had defeated could not be seen.

“… …Replication?”

“Looks like it.”

“That can’t be!? Then, it won’t end at all!”

That’s right, after the golem knights were destroyed and lost the glint in their eyes, more knights with the same glint and body as those knights were reproduced in no time and rejoined the rank.

Shia raised a panicked voice while mowing down the approaching knights. It was reasonable to say that, after all no matter how many she defeated there was no meaning to it. However, Hajime and Yue were calm, there was no impatience in their expressions as they kicked around the golem knights. This might be what is called a difference in experiences. They had experienced something like this many times in the depths of the Abyss. Naturally, they were stronger now.

“… …Hajime, if it’s a golem then there must be a core”

Just as Yue had said, it was normal for golem to have a core inside its body, and that core was the source of its power. The core was made using demonic beasts’ magic stones. It was written down on blueprint of Oscar’s cleaning golem. What Yue said was to destroy that core.

However, Hajime floated a bitter expression having known Yue’s proposal.

“What can I say, these guys didn’t have a core at all.”

“… … Really?”

“Aa, I have confirmed it using magic eye, there is no mistake about it. Although I was able to find some suspicious magic power from the golem…”

“I-it ended with that after all! It’ll be bad if this keeps up!”

Shia raised her voice filled with impatience. Hajime only let Shia’s shout pass through his ears, then used “Mineral Appraisal.” For golems that operated without core, he wondered, “Are they made using special ore?”

His thoughts were right on the money.

Induction Ore

An ore that naturally induces magic. It was able to establish a connection of magic power between two or more induction ores, using one ore, other ores with an established connection of magic power can be remotely controlled.

These golem knights made using induction stone must have something that acted as a remote control. Although Hajime and his party thought it was replication, it was actually rearrangement by manipulating the ore, they only needed to add to the parts that were insufficient. It’s actually more like reconstructing rather than replicating.

If you looked carefully, you’d notice that the floor was also made using the induction ore, and parts that that appeared to be cut away could be seen. Those were probably used to replenish the parts of the golems. Without defeating the controller, it’d be truly endless.

“Yue, Shia. There must be something that’s controlling them. Because it’s seriously endless, let’s breakthrough them!”

“Nnh.”

“B-breakthrough? Affirmative!”

Under Hajime’s signal, Yue and Shia immediately dashed out toward the altar. Hajime advanced using Donner-Schlag’s rapid-fire against the knights and as they scattered a path was created, two grenades were thrown toward the knights that approached from behind. With a big explosion in the back, the golems knights were felled one after another by the blast and the shockwave.

Shia advanced through the space that Hajime made, while rotating Doryukken, mowing down golem knights all the while. The golem knights were skillfully throwing their shields and large swords at Shia only to have Yue’s “Rupture” come and split them.

Hajime whose duty was to guard the rear, fired his railguns in rapid succession at the golem knights approaching from behind. Using the opportunity, Shia passed through the encirclement and arrived in front of the altar. Next was Yue who arrived in front of the door after jumping over the altar.

“Yue-san! The door-!?”

“Nn… …It was sealed after all.”

“Au, as expected!”

In front of their eyes were the suspicious altar and door. They had guessed it’d be sealed. That’s why, they originally thought it’d be troublesome and decided to slaughter the knights instead. While they resolved to release the seal on the door. Shia complained as usual, which resulted in knights flying in from the stairs.

“I’ll leave the seal to Yue. It’d take too much time to breakthrough it using transmutation.”

Hajime stood beside Shia to look out for her back. Just as Hajime said, to forcibly use transmutation to breakthrough the door, although it might be possible, it’d consume large amounts of magic power in this area, and it’d also take a lot of time. That’s why, having reached the altar with the yellow crystal with so much effort, it was faster to release the seal normally. Hajime who thought so, left the duty to Yue who had bad magic consumption.

“Nn… … leave it to me.”

Yue readily acknowledged that and immediately took the yellow crystal from the altar. That crystal was in a square made of pyramids shape, if you looked carefully it was made from combinations of solid blocks.

Yue looked back at the door behind her. There were three indentations there. Yue thought for a while, then started to disassemble the square of pyramids. She reassembled those blocks to make new cubes that fit the indentations.

While assembling those, Yue observed the indentations in the door. Then, only by carefully observing it she noticed small characters that were carved there. They said…

“I wonder if can you solve it~, I wonder~”

“You’ll die if you don’t do it fast, you know~”

“Well, it can’t be helped if you can’t solve it! You’re just an ordinary human unlike me after all!”

“Don’t worry! Even if your head is bad you can liv-… … you can’t live! How regre~ttable! Pugyaa—!”

They were the annoying sentences as usual. Yue was truly irritated by it. With her usual expressionlessness, she concentrated to solve the puzzle although she wanted to punch the door.

Somehow, Hajime and Shia could feel her anger from her back, and could only curse in their minds while concentrating on destroying golem knights.

“Hajime-sa~n. Please use DOPAh just like before~”

Like a certain black thing from the kitchen, the golem knights swarmed disgustingly, that’s why Shia begged Hajime to use a grenade.

“Idiot. That must be thrown where it was sure no trap was installed. If it was thrown near the stairs, you must know what might happen.”

“You said it now even after it laid waste to the golems before?”

“Well, it was something Miledi Raisen made. Isn’t it possible that it won’t react only against golem?”

“Uu, I can’t refute that…”

In certain ways, Hajime and Shia only played around with the golem knights so they could make idle talk. In the beginning, Shia was truly impatient about it, but when she saw how calm Hajime and Yue were, she calmed down.

“But, it made me somewhat happy.”

“Aa?”

Once more, while smashing a golem knight then making it fly with a kick, Shia blurted that out.

“Just a little while ago, I, who was only capable of running away, was able to fight together with Hajime-san… … it made me so happy.”

“… …You are truly a curious one.”

“Ehehe, I, finally able to flirt with Hajime-san after we capture dungeon ! Yay.”

“Oi, you. How did you connect to that, it’s the same as raising a death flag. To be a tragic heroine will be too much for you, so stop that. Also, I just can’t rebutted it, but you know this material, right?”

“It was, “I absolutely won’t let you die, my honey?”, something like that? Hajime-san, mouh!”

“You twisted it too much! Recently, although I was scared of your positivity… … I don’t have any appropriate remarks for it…”

They kept chatting for several minutes while repelling those knights. In a way, in the space between the two who kept flirting, “nuu~,” a shadow appeared. It was Yue.

“… …Flirting is forbidden.”

“Well, we didn’t do anything like that.”

“Nufufu, is that what it looks like? How embarrassing~”

“It’s better for you to shut up…”

Somewhat, after Hajime look with a side glance at Shia with a tired expression, he turned to Yue who looked a little displeased. However, without re-thinking about this situation, this time she showed a little proud look having done a great achievement.

“… …It’s open.”

“How fast, just as expected of Yue. Shia, fall back!”

“Yes!”

Hajime took a peek behind him, and as Yue said, the seal had released and the door was open. There seemed to be nothing unusual inside the room. Hajime told Shia to withdraw, then he retreated toward the room. The golem knights wouldn’t able to chase after them if they closed the sealed door. Yue was the first to retreat, next was Shia who jumped beyond the door, and because it was a double door they were on standby at both sides to close it.

Hajime threw several grenades as farewell gifts, and dived into the room. Although the golem knights rushed after their escape, they were scattered by the strong impact that came from the grenades. Their balance were destroyed. Without missing that chance, Yue and Shia closed the door.

Inside the room, using farsight it was confirmed that there was nothing at all. Surely, even if it was not Miledi Raisen’s room, there must be some clue leading to it, right?, and that was what they thought while losing their momentum.

“This, isn’t it that? Even though there was a conspicuous seal, there was actually nothing inside, is it that kind of punchline?”

“… …That can’t be”

“Uu, Miledi. How much do you want to take us for a fool!”

The trio were dropped because of that most possible possibility, suddenly, they heard the familiar unpleasant sound.

GAKON!

“”” !?”””

Along with the sound of mechanisms beginning to operate, the room trembled. Then, G came from the side of Hajime and his party.

“Kh!? What happen!? Did the room just move!?”

“… …Looks like i—!?”

“Ukya!?”

At the same time Hajime said that, this time the G came from above. Because of the radical change, Yue may have bitten her tongue as she covered her mouth with teary eyes while trembling. Shia fell from the ceiling in a frog-like pose.

The room continued to change its direction several more times, it was stopped after approximately 40 seconds of ignoring the law of inertia. Hajime was able to endure the impact of a sudden stop by fixing his location using spikes driven into the ground, while Shia who unable to endure it, was rolling around, flying, and hit the back of her head hard against the wall. She rolled over here, she rolled over there, and raised a scream every it changed direction, that’s why her complexion was bad. It was as if she was drunk. She was completely down like a drunk with sharp pain in the back of her head. By the way, since the start Yue was clinging to Hajime’s body so she had no problems at all.

“Fuu~, finally stopped… … Yue, are you okay?”

“… …Nn, no problem.”

Hajime retracted the spikes and stood up. There was no change at all when he observed the surroundings. Considering the movement, the door they entered from should connect to a different place.

“Ha-Hajime-san. Why are there no words for me?”

Shia who cover her mouth with blue face, stared at Hajime. It seems she was displeased because he only asked Yue.

“Well, if I ask the current you it’ll reverse the momentum… … and then you’ll throw-up and get vomiting rabbit as a new title, you don’t want that, right?”

“Of course! Even so, I wanted to be asked because that was a maide— uppu.”

“See, it’s better for you to rest a little now”

“Uu. Uppu.”

Leaving alone Shia who was on all fours that seemed to vomit at any moment, Hajime and Yue confirmed the surrounding. Finally, there was nothing after all and they faced the door.

“Well then, what shall we do?”

“… …Is the one that controlled it there?”

“There is that possibility. Miledi should have died… … then who on earth moved those golem knights.”

“… …No matter who appears, it’s all right. Hajime will be protected by me… … subsequently, Shia too.”

“I can’t hear you~ uppu.”

Hajime smiled, having heard Yue’s typical words. Gently, with one hand he rubbed Yue’s head. Yue who wanted to be spoiled came closer while pleasantly narrowing her eyes.

“… …Even though I remembered saying this before, could you stop suddenly entering into a world of just the two of you? What can I say, to be alienated makes me feel so lonely, uppu.”

While enduring the nausea, “I don’t want to be left out!”, was what Shia expressed while crawling on all fours.

“… …Even though I had also said it before, it still comes out, so could you stop that horror flick-like movement? What can I say, it’d be scary if it appeared in my dreams.”

“T-that’s good. To be beside you even just a little is a maiden’s heart-, uppu. I also wanted to be patted just like Yue-san. Please embrace me and pat me! Ue, uppu.”

“To say that with a face of someone who will vomit at any moment… … moreover to casually add your own demands.”

“… …It is still too early for Shia to be patted by Hajime.”

With her willpower, Shia came to Hajime and Yue’s side, she looked at Hajime with expectant eyes and a pale face. Hajime quietly averted his gaze to face the door. Behind him, “Why! Ueppu”, was the noise that could be heard, but he just let it pass through his ears.

On the other side of the door, will it be Miledi’s dwelling, golem’s controller, or just another trap… … Hajime thought, “Come whatever it is”, while he opened the door with a fearless smile.

There was…

“… …Have I seen it before? This room.”

“… …Certainly. Especially that lithograph.”

Ahead of the opened door was another room. There was a lithograph and passage at the left side of the room. They should have memories of this room. Because, this room was…

“It looks like… … the first room, right?”

Shia thought that even though she said it, she didn’t want to think it was so. However, certainly, just as Shia said there was the lithograph with the annoying sentences carved, just like the first room. But there was a difference from that room. The proof was, after several seconds the door opened, characters floated up from the original room’s floor.

“Nee, right now, how do you feel?”

“Even though you had advanced after much hardships, only to arrive at the starting point, how do you feel?”

“Nee, nee, how do you feel? What kind of feeling do you have? Nee, nee.”

“””… …”””

The expressions of Hajime and his party ‘suton,’ fell from their faces. Their expressions perfectly fit the words ‘Noh mask’. The trio watched as the characters silently and smoothly moved. Then, additional characters started to appear.

“Ah, there is something I forgot to say, this dungeon will be altered at regular intervals.”

“As usual, it was Miledi-chan’s thoughtfulness to make you enjoy the dungeon with a fresh feeling.”

“Are you happy? You are happy, right? There is no need to reward me! I only do it because I like it after all!”

“By the way, because it always changes, mapping it was useless.”

“Don’t tell me, did you make it? With so much hardship? But, sorry! Pugyaa—”

“Ha, hahaha.”

“FUFUFUFU.”

“FUHI, FUHIHIHI.”

The trio let out three different types of broken laughter. Afterwards, needless to say screams were echoed through the entirety of the dungeon. After getting through the first passage, it was just as Miledi said, the stairs were greatly altered along with the differing position of the corridor ahead of them. It goes without saying that they let out resentful voices again because of the structure.

Somehow they manage to regain their spirits, Hajime and his party once again tried to conquer the dungeon. However, it wasn’t a smooth sailing as expected, especially Shia who always triggered the traps (gold basin, bird lime, shots of liquids with strange smell, etc), “weren’t those psychologically dangerous?”, that is to say she became totally enraged, well troublesome things are troublesome after all.

Then, they connected back to the starting scene.

Volume 5 Chapter 7


Inside a certain room, pale light was faintly emitted by the walls, and the shadows of three people close to the wall were cast. It was Hajime, Yue, and Shia.

Yue was on Hajime’s right side, while Shia was on his left, and they sat while leaning against his shoulders. Although silence filled the room, if one focused their ears ‘suu- suu-,’ sounds could be heard. It was Yue and Shia’s breathing. They were both embracing one of Hajime’s arms and slept using his shoulders as a substitute for a pillow.

Today marks one week since Hajime and his party entered the dungeon of Raisen. During that time, a lot of traps and annoying sentences continued to exhaust their bodies and minds. They had been returned to the starting point seven times, attacked by lethal traps 48 times, and other meaningless traps for 169 times. Even though at first their hearts were filled with anger toward Miledi Raisen, after four days had passed it looked like their mental states became, “No matter what appears next, it doesn’t matter~”

They had an abundance of rations, and their bodies’ specs made it so that they wouldn’t easily die were the fortune within their misfortune . Now, they were resting after advancing, searching for clues all the while. As a result, they understood the pattern of the structure alteration. Using “mark,” they were able to confirm where those blocks were repositioned.

There might be additional progress from now on. While he thought that, Hajime turned toward the girls that slept on his sides.

“They sleep so comfortably… … isn’t this a Great Dungeon?”

Hajime’s murmur mixed with a wry smile resounded. He had stayed up for a long time as the lookout. Hajime quietly released his arm that somehow got embraced, and stroked Yue’s hair. A slight smile could be seen. Hajime’s eyes also slightly reverted to their former state.

Next, he changed his glance to Shia on the other side. She splendidly drooled on Hajime’s shoulder while “munya munya,” she moved her mouth, and it truly was a slackened sleeping expression. He remembered that she also wanted her head patted, so he quietly stroked Shia’s hair. Immediately, he felt the rabbit ears’ fluffiness. It was followed by her showing a loosened expression that she doesn’t show even under normal circumstances. It was a truly relieved expression. For the most part, it only occurs when Hajime was on lookout, well, it could be said that she’d feel relieved when Hajime was by her side.

Hajime who gently stroked the blue-hued gray hair, as well as the rabbit ears, showed a complex expression.

“Geez, just what’s good about someone like me… … that you would follow me, even here…”

He looked at Shia with tender eyes while throwing abusive words at himself. The thing that Shia sought could be compared to the feelings that Yue had. Even so, Shia’s positive attitude, cheerfulness, and how she cried but never gave up… … greatly attracted Hajime’s fancy. As a result, his strokes became even gentler. And, at that time, Shia who “munya munya,” started to talk in her sleep.

“Munya… … Au… … Hajime-san, how bold~, to do it outside~, … … everyone will be able to see~”

“… …”

Hajime who looked at her with gentle eyes immediately erased his smile. He gently used both hands, and quietly moved them, to pinch Shia’s nose and close her mouth. Shia’s calm expression gradually changed to a painful one, but he didn’t mind it and kept doing it.

“Nn~, nn? Nnh~!? Nnn–!! Nn–!! Puhah! Haa, haa, wh-what are you doing!? Even though it was an attack while I sleep, it has the wrong meaning!”

Shia who “zeha zeha,” panted, woke up then fiercely protested, Hajime turned toward her with cold eyes.

“Well? Inside your mind, what kind of a pervert am I? What will you do outside? Nn?”

“Eh? … … hah, that was a dream!? Why~, even though Hajime-san finally became dere, it was impossible to suppress the pathos that gushed out, and the bashfulness of me that writhes in agony because of those words, finally decided in publi- hebuh!?”

Without listening to anymore of it, Hajime used strengthening to flick her forehead. Shia became face up because of the big impact, and the back of her head hit the wall behind her, hard; which result in her squatting with teary eyes. As expected, her shameless character always slips out.

While rubbing the back of her head, Shia muttered, “Somehow I felt something happy happened, but is it just my imagination?” Probably, she unconsciously felt Hajime patting her. However, because he had known she would get carried away if he told her the truth, Hajime decided to ignore her.

Because Shia woke up (although by force), Hajime gently shook Yue to wake her up. Yue “… …Nn u… …Au?”, let out that lovely voice while slowly opening her eyes. Then, with a blank expression she looked upward and confirmed Hajime was there, once again, she rubbed her mouth on Hajime’s shoulder, then she quietly parted from Hajime and straightened her appearance.

“Uu, Yue-san is so cute… … this is how a girl wakes up~, compared to her I was…”

Shia began becoming depressed this time, and Yue looked at her in wonder, only to let out an explanation, “because it was Shia after all.”

“Look, from the beginning you understood the overwhelming difference in battle power (girl power), right? Rather than being depressed, start doing some soul searching.”

“… … What gentleness, you didn’t drop it somewhere?”

“… …? Hajime didn’t drop anything like that.”

“Gusuh, only to Yue-san. Damn.”

Shia stood up after some soul searching. Yue and Hajime were also ready. This time, they prayed that they wouldn’t be returned to the starting point, and so the trio resumed their dungeon conquest.

Once again, because there will be a lot of unpleasant traps and annoying sentences, they cleared their mind and soul.

Then, Hajime and his party reached a room that they had only visited once, even after a week. It was the room with golem knights that made them remember how mad they were when they got returned to the starting point the first time. However, this time the sealed door was opened from the start, and inside was not a room but a passage.

“This is… … it’d be troublesome if they encircle us again. Let’s rush to the open door at once!”

“Nnh!”

“Yes!”

Hajime and his party broke into the golem knights’ room at once. When they approached the center of the room, as expected, ‘gashan gashan,’ the sound of golem knights rushing out from the recesses on both sides of the walls resounded. From the start, they ran forward while kicking and shooting those golem knights; which bought them some time, while Hajime and his party ran faster still, to reach the altar before being caught by the golem knights’ encirclement. Although the golem knights rushed after them, they were unable to catch up to Hajime and his party that had already passed the door. Having successfully escaped, Hajime was grinning.

However, Hajime’s smile vanished in the next moment. This time the golem knights also passed through the door, chasing after them. Also…

“Wha-!? They can run on the ceiling!?”

“… … Surprising”

“Gravity-san please do your work~!”

That’s right, the golem knights that chased them, as if ignoring gravity, were running on the walls and ceiling, giving off ‘gashan gashan,’ sounds of moving heavy armor. Because of this, even Hajime and his party were surprised by it. Hajime immediately looked at the passage then used “Mineral Appraisal,” but all materials were already known. He didn’t detect any minerals that could neutralize gravity, or any with adhesive nature.

“How did they do that?”

Those were the unintentional mutterings that leaked out from his mouth. And once more he took a peek at the golem knights behind him, becoming even more surprised as he turned around.

One of the golem knights on the ceiling was running while ‘pyon,’ jumping, and like a cannonball it advanced with tremendous momentum toward them while jumping in mid-air.

“W-wha-!? Shitty bastard!”

Hajime let out a surprised voice then fired Donner rapidly. The bullets fired accompanied by flashes, and the golem knight’s helmet and shoulders were destroyed. The golem knight’s headpiece separated from the body, and the large sword and shield were also dropped. However, without falling to the ground, it advanced toward Hajime and his party as is.

“Evade!”

“Nnh.”

“Wakya!”

They avoided the golem knight’s head, body, large sword, and shield that came fast and furiously by jumping and bending their bodies. The wreckage of the golem knight passed Hajime and his party, flew towards the walls and ceiling without reducing its momentum, and then crashed and rolled around on the floor.

“Oioi, isn’t that…”

“Nn… … it looks like it “fell”.”

“Gravity-san is at work, I understand.”

It was just as represented by Yue’s and Shia’s words. Apparently, those golem knights were able to control gravity. Although no one understood why they didn’t use it last time, probably because previously it was a room, they might be only able to use it after the room changed into a passage.

While making that hypothesis, Hajime and his party were interrupted by golem knights that “fell.” Some of them approached while spinning their large swords as if they were pinwheels in a veteran-like manner. Hajime and his party used gunfire and “Rupture” for ranged attacks, while Shia struck those that drew near, and they advanced without stopping.

After a while, Hajime and his party felt a different presence from those knights.

“Muu… … Hajime.”

“Aa, I know. Because this dungeon can reconstruct itself, it must be something like that.”

“W-we are surrounded.”

After falling golem knights, next was the reconstruction to come down. Hajime and his party decided to wait for the platoon to come. The knights came with shields raised and moved gallanty, as if they had become a wall. The golem knights created a two-row formation, where the knight in the back supported the defending knight in front. Perhaps they had learned that with only a single row they’d be crushed with sheer power.

“Tch, how troublesome.”

While clicking his tongue, Hajime put Donner-Schlag back into their holsters. After that, he took out one weapon from “Treasure Box.”

In his hands was a weapon with rectangular shape and 12 rotating barrels, the Rocket & Missile Launcher : Orkan. The rockets themselves were 30 cm in length, each of them had more destructive power than the usual grenade. Using Creation magic, the warheads were installed with stones that could generate “Lightning-clad,” because these stones constantly generate static electricity, they were cobbled together with combustion powder that’d be ignited by the warhead upon contact.

Hajime was grinning while he fixed Orkan to his side.

“Yue, Shia! Cover your ears! I’ll blow them up!”

“Nn.”

“Ee~ what was that!?”

Shia who saw Orkan’s bizarreness for the first time could only open her eyes wide. Yue was the first to thrust her index fingers into her ears.

Shia’s rabbit ears ‘pinh,’ stood upright; unconcerned, Hajime pulled Orkan’s trigger.

PASHUUU!

Along with that sound, the rocket was launched, leaving trails of sparks behind. It was aimed at the platoon of golem knights that laid in wait, then it hit.

In the next moment a roaring sound came along with a large explosion. The pressure that came from igniting a large amount of compressed combustion powder greatly shook the passage. The golem knights that were in the line of fire and received a direct hit, were violently thrown against the walls on both sides, as well as the ceiling. They were destroyed to the point that they didn’t even resemble their original forms. It’d take a fair bit of time for them to be reconstructed.

Hajime and his party jumped over the wreckage of the fallen golem knights at once.

“Rabbit ears were-~, my rabbit ears were-~!!”

While Hajime and his party ran, Shia folded her rabbit ears and held them with both hands in agony with teary eyes. The Rabbitman tribe had… … the most excellent hearing among the demi-human race after all.

“That’s why I said to close your ears.”

“Ee? What is it? I can’t hear you.”

“… … truly, a shameless rabbit…”

Although Hajime and Yue looked at Shia with amazed expressions, Shia who was in agony couldn’t noticed it.

After dealing with golem knights that had come falling once again, they ran through the passage for five minutes. Finally, they saw the end. Ahead of the passage was a huge and broad room. The road itself was broken, and they could see a square scaffold 10 meters ahead.

“Yue, Shia! Jump!”

Hearing Hajime’s shout, Yue and Shia (who somehow recovered) nodded. At their backs, the golem knights kept coming down. While they tried to intercept, Hajime and his party that kept avoiding them reached the end of the passage and jumped.

The jumping power of Hajime and his party who used body strengthening far outstripped olympic athletes. Hajime and his party easily broke the world record and jumped to the square before them.

But, it was a characteristic of this Great Dungeon that nothing comes out as expected. Somehow, in front of Hajime and his party that jumped, drawing a parabolic arc, ‘shii-,’ the square block began to move.

“Whaat!?”

Hajime raised the shout that he had let out many times in this dungeon. Because the distance they judge was altered, they will fall at this rate. They took a peek below and saw that it was quite deep. When he prepared to shoot out the anchor, Yue’s voice immediately rang out.

“”Soar”!”

Using the updraft from wind magic, Hajime and his party’s jump distance extended. Even though it was only for a moment, it was enough. He somehow succeeded catching the edge of the block that was still moving even now. Using the spikes on his artificial arm to secure him in place, Hajime was hanging with Yue and Shia clinging to him.

“N-nice, Yue.”

“As expected of Yue-san!”

“… … Praise me more.”

While unconsciously smiling because they had avoided the fall, Hajime and Shia praised Yue. Yue who had consumed a large amount of magic power was a little tired, but showed a triumphant mood.

However, that peaceful atmosphere was disrupted by the golem knights that came flying. That’s right, the golem knights were flying in the air. They probably controlled gravity so that they wouldn’t fall. They approached Hajime and his party who were currently hanging, with tremendous momentum.

“kh!? Yue, Shia climb me!”

While issuing that order Hajime took out Donner and rapidly shot at the approaching golem knights. Yue and Shia climbed up Hajime’s body which was still moving along with the block. Then Hajime raised his strength to pull himself onto the block using only one arm. Immediately after, the place where Hajime was previously hanging was pierced with large swords that came hurtling with tremendous velocity. Afterwards, Hajime shoots from overhead the golem knights that were stiffened due to post-skill latency.

“Shit, these guys, I don’t know if it was caused by the gravity control, but their movements and tactics became better.”

“… … Perhaps, the cause is here?”

“Ahaha, what’s with common sense. Isn’t everything floating (…)?”

Just as Shia said, everything in their vicinity was floating.

The place that Hajime and his party had entered was a gigantic spherical room. The diameter itself was more than two kilometers. Inside the room, blocks with all kind of shapes and sizes were floating and ‘shii-,’ moved irregularly. It was a space that completely ignored gravity. However, for some reason Hajime and his party still felt gravity. Perhaps, only specific materials in this room were not restricted to gravity.

Inside this room, golem knights were able to fly around freely. Their falling directions were controlled after all, as they rapidly turned around. If they were living beings, it wouldn’t be weird for them to die due to the tremendous G-force. When he thought how their movements and tactics became better as they approached this space, perhaps…

“The one who controls the golems might be here, in this room, I think?”

Hearing Hajime’s guess, Yue and Shia also agreed and then stiffened their expressions. No one knew why, but the surrounding golem knights did not attack them. For now, because nothing happened, they observed their surroundings. They didn’t know if it was the last destination or if it continued after. However, this room was definitely close to the innermost room, proven by how the golem knights’ abilities were improved, and the uniqueness of this room.

Hajime used “Farsight” to investigate the gigantic, spherical space with his eyes. And, in the next moment, Shia’s unease filled voice rang out.

“Ruun!” “”!?””

Hajime and Yue, without asking what it was, instantly jumped when they heard Shia’s warning. Fortunately a block just passed by several meters ahead of them, allowing them to leave the block they were previously standing on.

Immediately,

ZUuGAGAGAN!!

A meteorite-like illusion came and it crashed into the block that Hajime and his party were on just a moment ago, blasting it into fine pieces. Meteorite wasn’t necessarily the wrong term for it. After all something gigantic made a scorching fall, and with its momentum it destroyed the block, and passed through.

Cold sweat flowed on Hajime’s cheeks. He would have received a direct hit from that without Shia’s warning. With him being unable to use “Vajra,” it would be an instant death. He was also unable to sense it coming. But immediately after Shia’s warning, he certainly felt the presence. However, with its falling speed it would be impossible to avoid it when he sensed it coming.

“Shia, you saved us. Thanks.” “… … nn, a big achievement.” “Ehehe, it was good that “Foresight” was activated. Although all of my magic was taken instead…”

Apparently, Shia’s special magic, “Foresight,” activated faster than Hajime’s perception was able to sense it. “Foresight” was able to see the future as a result of Shia’s assumed choice if she activated it manually, also, it could activate automatically. Just like this time, it saw through the big danger accompanied with death that affected her directly or indirectly.

In other words, if they received a direct hit, at least Shia would have died from it. With a new feeling of horror, Hajime looked at the meteor-like thing that had passed them. He peeped below from the edge of the block. And, when he thought something moved below, it suddenly flew up with tremendous momentum. It went above them in no time, and while remaining in place, ‘ginh,’ its eyes shone while glaring at Hajime and his party.

“Oioi, seriously.”

“… … So… … big.”

“It’s got the feeling of the big boss.”

Hajime and his party muttered three different impressions of it. Although Yue’s remark was a little dangerous, it was still at the limit of tolerance… … It should be.

What appeared in front of Hajime and his party was a super big golem knight that floated in mid-air. Although the armor was the same, its length should be around 20 meters. Its right hand was burning as if it was a heat knuckle, and it might be what caused the block from before to be blasted to pieces. In its left hand was a chain that made ‘jhara jhara,’ sounds, equipped with a flail-type Morningstar.

Hajime and his party took their stances as they saw the gigantic golem, and they could hear ‘hyun hyun,’ sounds from the surrounding golem knights that came flying until finally Hajime and his party were surrounded. The golem knights who stood in line, raised their large swords in front of their chests. It was as if they were saluting their king.

Hajime and his party were completely encircled and could feel their tension raised. Silence filled their surroundings, it was as if it was a critical situation. The moment they move, the game that bet their lives (slaughter) would begin. What destroyed the strained mood that was caused by such a premonition was…

… … Was the joke-like greeting from the gigantic golem.

“Yaho~, nice to meet you~, Miledi Raisen that’s loved by everyone is here~”

“””… … Ha?”””

Volume 5 Chapter 8


“Yaho~, nice to meet you~, Miledi Raisen that’s loved by everyone is here~”

From the gigantic golem equipped with brutal equipment and full body armor and a helmet, whose sharp glint was able to make people freeze, was a random and light greeting. The words that it had said couldn’t be understood, even by Hajime. His mind was somehow trying to escape the reality in front of him. Even Shia and Yue forgot that they were encircled and could only stare blankly with their mouths opened.

Because the trio stiffened, the gigantic golem let out a sullen voice. It was a woman’s voice.

“You know~, because I already gave out a greeting, reply with something already. That’s proper manners, you know? Geez, that’s why youngsters of this generation… … should have more common sense.”

They were words filled with real irritation. Moreover, the gigantic golem was raising its burning right hand and its left hand that held on the thorned iron ball at shoulder height. It was a random and human-like gesture as if it said, “Yare yare daze”, while shrugging its shoulders and shaking its head. But, Hajime and his party were the ones that were truly irritated by it. It was as if they were seeing those annoying sentences again. Although the one that called itself “Miledi Raisen” might be the one behind those words, that woman should have been dead, she was a human after all.

For the time being, Hajime observed his surroundings.

“I am sorry about that. But, Miledi Raisen should be a human and already dead, right? Moreover, I have never heard of a golem with an ego… … that’s why we are surprised, so please forgive us. After that, please explain who you are. Make it brief.”

“Aree~, this person, even under this situation you’re so conceited.”

There was no need to observe anything at all. Rather, he let out a super straight ball. As expected, because of his unexpected reaction, the gigantic golem that called itself Miledi showed a perplexed expression. However, it immediately recovered, it replied to Hajime and his party with a voice that could simply make one imagine it as someone grinning, if it were human.

“Nn~? Miledi-san is a golem-san from the start you know~ To say I was human…”

“I have read a little about you from Oscar’s notes. It’s perfectly written that you’re a human woman, you know? Rather, I don’t want to hear any foolish talk. I already said to make it brief before. Even if you try to obstruct us, what we need to do is still the same. I will turn you into scrap and move on. That’s why, before you can’t make any more ‘gata gata’ sounds, tell us everything.”

“O, oou, because it was my first conversation after a long time, no matter what you say it makes me dance with joy inside. Rather, did you just say Oscar? Don’t tell me, you’ve conquered O-chan’s dungeon?”

“Aa, if it was Oscar Orcus’s dungeon we already conquered it. Rather, it was us who’s supposed to do the asking. If you won’t talk then we’ll fight, you know? Well, it’s not like we need to know anything. Our only objective is the age of Gods magic after all.”

Hajime turned Donner toward the gigantic golem. Although Yue showed a clarifying face, Shia said “Uwa~, he didn’t shake at all~”, in half-surprise and half-amazement while looking at Hajime.

“… … Age of Gods magic you say, then as expected, is that for god slaying? Is it to slaughter and destroy those shitty bastards? If you have captured O-chan’s dungeon, then you know the situation, right?”

“I already said that it was us who’s supposed to do the asking. What we want is the answer, so answer our inquiry from before.”

“This fellow~ is truly conceited~, well, that’s okay~, umm what was it… … Aa, my identity. Uu~n”

“Make it brief. I don’t need a long explanation like Oscar’s.”

“Ahaha, certainly, O-chan’s speech was long~, and there was too much theory~”

The gigantic golem looked up at the ceiling into a far distance, filled with nostalgia. It was truly a golem with human-like movements. Yue gazed at the gigantic golem with her usual expressionlessness, while Shia was restless because of the surrounding golem knights.

“Un, I will say it briefly as you want. I am certainly Miledi Raisen. All the golem’s wonders can be explained with age of Gods magic! If you want to know more, then magnificently try to defeat me! Well something along those lines.”

“In the end, there is no explanation…”

“Hahaha, that was, before you complete the conquest, you won’t receive any information, right? Without that there would be no meaning behind the dungeons, you know?”

This time, the gigantic golem, Miledi Golem, used her finger as if saying, tsk tsk tsk! Although they didn’t know for sure if Miledi Raisen was inside of it, if they excluded the character then the golem had its own charm. Yue boldly muttered, “… … its only problem is the inside”, having the same impression as Hajime.

Finally, about that inside, they still didn’t understand anything in the end. If it was truly Miledi herself, Hajime guessed it must be some kind of residual thought. Hajime hazily remembered from his memory that his classmate, Nakamura Eri, was a necromancer; a job that handles residual thoughts. However, with her necromancy a residual thought that carried a clear intent like this couldn’t be formed. In other words, it was still in the boundary to assume that the established intent of the deceased inside the golem was made by age of Gods magic.

Anyway, it was not a magic that could be used to move to other worlds that he was looking for. So Hajime who was a little disappointed asked a question to the gigantic golem, no Miledi Golem.

“Your age of Gods magic, is it something related to residual thoughts? If that’s so, there is no reason for me to be here.”

“Nn~? That look, do you have other purposes to get age of Gods magic? By the way, my age of god magic is not that one~, I was helped by Ra-kun to establish my soul in this body~”

Hajime’s objective is only to go back to his own world. Because he doesn’t understand anything about souls and thoughts, obtaining an age of the Gods magic that manipulates something like that would be pointless. That said, after he asked about that, Miledi’s reply didn’t match up to his predictions. Even though he didn’t know who Ra-kun was, it was probably one of the “Liberators.” That person gave Miledi Golem Miledi’s soul before she died and established it inside the golem.

“Then, what is your age of Gods magic? Depending on your answer, we’ll return as we are…”

“Nn~ Nn~, do you want to know? Do you really want to know?”

Once again, Miledi asked with a grinning-like voice, and Hajime who was waiting for her reply was irritated by it.

“If you want to know~, answer my question first,”

Only on the last few words in her voice changed. Her frivolous atmosphere up till now vanished, and she carried seriousness instead. Hajime and his party were a little surprised by the change. Hajime asked back without showing that on his expression.

“What is it?”

“What’s your objective? What do you need age of Gods magic for?”

I won’t forgive any falsehood was what her tone implied, even her joking atmosphere totally disappeared when Miledi asked that. That was probably this woman’s true nature. If you think about it, she even challenged the Gods for the sake of the people. That was why she didn’t want to entrust her magic to someone with an unknown purpose. It was different from the will in Orcus’s image recording. No matter if hundreds of years pass by, she intended to keep waiting deep in the dungeon to ascertain the challengers’ purpose. In a way it could be called torture for her. Even her frivolous attitude was a bluff, the real her is someone who has great patience and will, it could be said that she had a sense of responsibility.

Maybe because Yue also thought of her like that, she had been looking at Miledi Golem with a different expression since a while ago. Yue understood well the suffering of someone who was alone in the depths of darkness. That’s why, for Miledi who was determined to leave her soul behind in order to stay in the depths of the darkness, she seemed to feel something more than sympathy.

Hajime looked straight at Miledi Golem’s glinting eyes and replied without any falsehood.

“My objective is to return to my hometown. I was forced into this world by the ones you call mad Gods. I am looking for age of Gods magic that’s capable of transferring people between worlds… … I have no intention of defeating the Gods in your stead. I don’t even have the slightest inclination to risk my life for this world.”

“… …”

For a while Miledi Golem quietly stared at Hajime, then maybe because she reached something she gave a little nod. Afterwards, she only muttered “I see”. And, in the next moment, her serious atmosphere disappeared as if it was an illusion and her frivolity returned.

“Nn~, I see I see. So that’s it~, you’re from a different world~. Un un. That is problematic for you~ Okay, then it’s time for battle! Splendidly defeat me and you will obtain the age of Gods magic!”

“Although your chain of reasoning was so odd that I lost the meaning of it… … just what’s with “then it’s time”. Rather, didn’t you hear my words? If your magic isn’t transition magic there will be no meaning, you know? Or are you saying it is transition magic?”

Miledi only, “Nnfufu~”, let out an unpleasant laugh, then, “That is… …”, answered with a voice filled with too much emphasis as she prolonged her answer. Her appearance resembled Mino**n that tried to inform the Final Answer.

Finally, with his irritation reaching its limit, and because it’d be a battle from now on, Hajime took out Orkan and Miledi shouted the answer she forestalled.

“No~t telling!”

“Die.”

Without asking any more questions, Hajime fired the rockets from Orkan. Leaving trails of sparks, the storm of destruction flew toward Miledi Golem and hit.

ZUGAaAAAN!!

The violent sound of explosions resounded and shook the room. Smoke rose from that explosion.

“Did we do it!?”

“… … Shia, that was a flag.”

Shia who let out “first strike for victory!”, with a joyful look was tsukkomi’ed by Yue. The result: it was just as Yue said. From inside the smoke the burning right hand appeared with a ‘bobah,’ sound and dispersed the smoke.

When the smoke cleared up Miledi Golem appeared, with some parts of both of her forearms broken. Miledi Golem picked up the floating blocks that had drawn near, and they were decomposed to become materials for the parts of her arms that were broken.

“Fufu, what a fast preemptive strike~, come, my age of Gods magic might be what you seek after all~, but because I am strong~, work hard so you won’t die~”

While laughing joyfully, Miledi Golem shot out the flail-type Morningstar in her left hand toward Hajime and his party. It wasn’t thrown. The Morningstar just suddenly flew with tremendous velocity without any starting movement. Perhaps, the gravitational force’s direction was adjusted and made it “fall” just like the other golems.

Hajime and his party avoided the Morningstar by jumping onto a nearby floating block. The Morningstar turned the block that Hajime and his party were previously standing on into minute pieces. Then it turned around and returned to Miledi Golem’s hand.

“Let’s do it! Yue, Shia. Let’s destroy Miledi!”

“Nnh!”

“Affirmative!”

Along with Hajime’s shout, inside one of the Seven Great Dungeons; Raisen Great Dungeon, the last fight began.

The golem knights who raised their large swords in a standby state began to move as if signalled by Hajime’s shout. Just like inside the passage before, they turned toward Hajime and his party and rushed out.

Yue took out a water bottle that was clanking with the other bottles and used it to horizontally mow down her enemies. The water that was pressurized to the limit, rather than water cutter it cut apart the golem knights more like a laser.

“Ahaha, you can do it after all~, but, the enemies are 50 infinitely regenerating knights and me, I wonder if you can handle all of us at the same time~”

While saying that with a sarcastic tone, Miledi fired the Morningstar again. Shia made a big jump, and jumped onto the moving pyramid block’s upper part. Hajime didn’t move from his spot and turned Donner toward the Morningstar and fired rapidly.

DOPAaaNh!

There was only one gunshot sound. However, the bullets that fired numbered six. The attacks were accompanied with a flash aimed only at the approaching Morningstar, striking it with tremendous velocity. It was indeed a metal ball with huge mass, there was not much change even after it was hit by the railgun six times at the same time, but its trajectory deviated away from Hajime by a large margin.

At the same time, Shia jumped from the upper part of the block to Miledi’s overhead, she brought down Doryukken as she fell.

“I already saw that~”

Along with those words, Miledi Golem suddenly moved to the side at a great velocity. She must be “falling” to the side.

“Kuh, you—!”

With her aim off, Shia gritted her teeth and pulled Doryukken’s trigger, then an explosion came out. With the cartridge ejecting from the side, her trajectory was corrected. After spinning three times, a blow that carried significant centrifugal force hit Miledi Golem.

ZUuGAGAN!!

Miledi Golem immediately used her left arm to guard. A tremendous sound of impact came from the left hand. However, as if nothing happened Miledi Golem swiped her left hand horizontally.

“Kyaaaa!!”

“Shia!”

Shia who was hit let out a scream. Somehow she managed to pull Doryukken’s trigger and corrected her pose using its explosive power; additionally, using the recoil she made an emergency landing on the nearby block.

“Hah, you can do it after all. Oi, Yue. Just what kind of training did you make her do?

“… … I only drove her into a corner.”

“… … I see, it was something like polishing her ability to survive to the maximum.”

Hajime used Farsight to confirm Shia who ‘pyon pyon,’ bounced on the blocks to come back, with admiration in his mind. And, on the block Hajime and Yue were on, the golem knights that rushed them was finally could not be held back by Yue alone.

Hajime took out Metherai the Gatling gun from “Treasure Box.” Then, with his back turned to Yue, he unleashed the monster capable of scattering 12,000 deaths per minute.

DOuRURURURURU!!

Its six barrels began rotating as he fired it. While letting out sounds particular to this weapon, a lot of flashes flew straight freely all over the room; while the enemies who met the bullets mid-air were turned into scrap and fell to the bottom. Those that sneaked around to the other side to evade and attack from the blind spot, by a laser of water, were perfectly cut.

More than 40 golem knights fell to the bottom of the room in tragic states in no time. After some time, they would likely finish reconstructing and return to the frontline, but it was good that they won’t be hindrances for a while. That’s right, until the time their boss, Miledi Golem is destroyed.

“Wh-, what was that!? I have never seen nor heard of anything like that!”

Having heard Miledi Golem’s astonished shout, Hajime put Metherai back into “Treasure Box,” then once again he pulled out Donner, and let out a voice that could be heard even by Shia who was at a distance..

“Miledi’s core is at the same place as the heart! Destroy that!”

“W-wh-! How did you know that!?”

Once more, Miledi let out an astonished voice. Surely she didn’t know that Hajime has a magic eye that’s capable of seeing the flow of magic power. Because the position of the core that could be used to defeat the golem was confirmed, Yue and Shia’s eyes became sharp with a glint.

Currently, there were around ten golem knights that still floated. The trio released waves of attacks aimed to hit Miledi’s heart.

Hajime immediately tried to get closer to Miledi Golem by jumping using the floating blocks as footholds. With the current output of the Railgun, it’d be hard to pierce Miledi Golem’s gigantic body and hit the core. That’s why, he decided to shoot at zero distance to destroy the armor, then pull out a grenade.

However, it was not that easy.

When he noticed Miledi Golem’s eyes shine for a moment, blocks were floating from her overhead toward Hajime with tremendous speed.

“!?”

“I never said I can only control the knights~”

Ignoring Miledi’s grinning voice, Hajime immediately ‘gashun,’ operated his artificial arm’s gimmick.

DOGANh!!

With a sound that could affect the insides of your stomach, an explosive sound rang out and pressure was generated from the back of the artificial arm that was aimed forward. More specifically, it was the discharge of the powerful shotgun. Although acceleration using electromagnetism couldn’t be done, the compression ratio of combustion powder was much higher than in Donner. The recoil was also severe because of it. The trajectory of Hajime’s body changed mid-air, while the blocks that came flying were dodged. Afterward, he somehow managed to put his feet on the targeted block.

Naturally, Miledi Golem tried to “drop” Hajime’s foothold, but before she was aware, Shia already approached her from behind and she jumped to deliver a strong hit on Miledi Golem’s head. First of all, she wanted to destroy the eyes’ part on the head that gave off suspicious light.

Miledi Golem who noticed Shia was approaching, made the golem knights target Shia that was in the middle of her jump. Shia was completely defenseless mid-air. At the moment that she was almost cut by the large swords.

“… … I won’t let you.”

This time, it was Yue that had moved before she was aware of it, using “Rupture” she cut the golem knights that tried to attack Shia.

“As expected of Yue-san!”

While saying that, with the trouble gone, Shia continued to advance in the air, and she delivered the attack that was made by strengthening her physical ability to the limit.

“Golem won’t lose in terms of power~”

Miledi Golem proved her own words, while turning around she immediately swung her burning right hand toward Shia.

DOoGAGAGAN!!

A tremendous roar resounded when Shia’s Doryukken and Miledi Golem’s heat knuckle collided. The surrounding floating blocks were blown away radially by the ensuing shockwave.

“Damn you!”

Shia who was unable to penetrate Miledi Golem’s fist let out a shout to pull out more of her power. However, just as expected of a golem’s physical strength, Shia was shaken off and blown away by the fist.

“Kyaaa!!”

Shia let out a scream. There was no floating block in the direction she was in. Because she thought Shia would fall at this rate, Yue dashed out from the side and embraced Shia. Using “Soar” for just a moment, they corrected their trajectory and landed on the floating block in front of them.

“Quite a combination you have there~”

With a composed voice, Miledi Golem looked up while Yue and Shia looked down at her. An unexpected voice came out from nearby.

“Right?”

“!?”

Letting out a panicked and surprised voice, Miledi Golem changed the direction of her glance. Before she was aware of him, he had slipped onto her bosom while fixing his location using the anchor and putting his foot into the cracks on the armor, he aimed the large weapon : Schlagen to the heart’s part. A bright red spark gushed out from Schlagen.

“S-since whe—!?”

DOoGAN!!!

Miledi’s surprised words were cut off by the roar that came from Schlagen. Having fired a mass of killing intent from zero distance, it blew Miledi Golem away and her chest armor was shattered into tiny fragments. Even if “Lightning-clad” couldn’t be used with enough output, the current Schlagen’s firepower was the same as Donner’s maximum power. Even so, that was enough firepower to destroy metallic armor. Even golem knights’ armor could easily be blown apart by the current Donner, so Miledi Golem’s armor that’s made from the same materials even if it was a little thicker, could be destroyed using Schlagen.

Blown backwards, smoke came from Miledi Golem’s chest. Hajime also flew backwards. By shooting the anchor, he turned around mid-air, and with the momentum he landed on a nearby floating block. Then, he observed Miledi Golem’s condition.

Yue and Shia also jumped to the floating block near Hajime.

“… … Did we do it?”

“Although there was a response…”

“With this, I want it to end.”

Having heard Yue’s response, Shia said her wishful thinking. Hajime’s expression was subtle. Although Miledi Golem’s chest armor was destroyed, without knowing what had happened, nearby floating blocks started to move, and Hajime and his party could hear a voice that was filled with admiration.

“Wow~ you’re the real deal, that was a close call. If there was no magic power disintegration, that artifact’s real power would be very dangerous you know~, yes, having made this dungeon with great effort, Miledi-chan is a genius!!”

Miledi Golem praised herself. However, her words didn’t enter Hajime’s ears. Hajime’s expression was sharp. That’s because there was jet black armor beneath the wrecked chest armor, and he noticed one thing from that. Hajime remembered that armor’s material.

“Nnu~, did this interest you~”

Miledi Golem noticed Hajime’s gaze, and with a grinning voice she pointed at the jet black armor. With the tone of someone important, “This is you know~”, she tried to explain the armor’s identity, but Hajime continued that with a mutter followed by a vulgar word.

“… … Azanthium huh, bastard.”

Azanthium ore is an ore boasting the trait as the world’s hardest ore that even Hajime use in some of his equipment. A thin coating of this ore is even able to endure Donner’s maximum power. That’s why Schlagen’s attack was unable to scratch it. Hajime drew wrinkles on his forehead because it would be hard to destroy that Azanthium armor.

“Oh my? You knew of this~, rather that’s a given. You have conquered O-kun’s dungeon after all, so it was impossible for you to not know how to use Creation magic~, now come, because you had understood your limit and feel hopelessness, let’s move on to the second round!”

Miledi snatched the materials from the smashed floating blocks, when the surface armor was reconstructed, she started to fiercely charge while firing the Morningstar.

“W-what should we do!? Hajime-san!”

“There is still a way. By any means, seal off her movement!”

“… … Nn, affirmative”

With the condition where they didn’t have enough firepower, Shia who was shaken asked Hajime. Hajime still had his last resort, to use it he issued an order to seal off Miledi Golem’s movement. On the other hand, Yue and Shia let out somewhat relieved expressions and they tried to evade the incoming Morningstar by jumping to the nearby floating blocks. However,

“I won’t let you~”

Along with Miledi Golem’s voice, the floating blocks that became their footholds started rotating in high speed. With their footholds rotating all of a sudden, Hajime and his party lost their balance. Then, the Morningstar crashed into Hajime and his party with its immense power. Hajime and his party abandoned their footholds that had become fine dust. Hajime was clinging to the chain that passed with ‘jhara jhara’ sounds. Yue used the fragments of the smashed floating blocks along with “Soar”, while Shia was using the recoil from Doryukken’s explosion to somehow manage to make an emergency landing on the floating block before her eyes.

Maybe because that was Miledi Golem’s aim, she thrusted her heat knuckle towards them.

“Kuu!!”

“Nnh!!”

They avoided the direct hit but were affected by the force of it passing by. Groans of anguish were let out from Yue and Shia’s mouth. Even so, as if that were something else, Yue aimed at Miledi Golem’s hand and invoked “Rupture”, while Shia used Doryukken’s gimmick to let out a stake, and with a strike, pierced Miledi Golem’s armor, and clung to it.

“Rupture” was able to cut off part of Miledi Golem’s right hand, but it couldn’t completely sever it, and Yue landed on another floating block with a mortified expression.

On the other hand, Shia who clung to Miledi Golem’s left shoulder made a full swing of Doryukken and aimed at Miledi’s head. However, Miledi Golem’s sudden use of “fall” made Shia lose her balance and she was thrown out in the air.

“Kyaa!”

Shia let out a scream. Over there, Hajime who clung on to the Morningstar’s chain swung himself and using the centrifugal force, he jumped and caught Shia in the air.

“Hajime-san!”

Shia called out Hajime’s name with a voice full of joy. It was the rescue by embracing that she yearned for. Although she was aware of the situation they were in, she immediately felt elated. However, there was Hajime’s quality. Shia was thrown to the crowd of demonic beasts in front of them.

“H-Hajime-san!?”

“Let’s go one more time!”

With a ‘gashun,’ he reloaded a shotshell into his artificial arm and then fired it. Using the recoil, Hajime rotated and threw Shia toward Miledi Golem assisted by the centrifugal force.

“Damn ittt—!”

When she thought her desire had been fulfilled, the next moment she was in a situation where she was suicide attacking the enemy. Letting out a roar of desperation she prepared Doryukken.

Even Miledi felt that Hajime’s actions were cold. However, she was still ready to intercept that, she drew back the heat knuckle behind while clenching its fist. And, in the next moment, suddenly a big explosion came from the chain that connected to the Morningstar.

“Wawawah, what-!?”

Miledi let out a surprised voice. The cause of the explosion was a large amount of grenades that Hajime attached to the chain. With tremendous explosive power, the chain was blown from the middle section, while the left arm that was wrapped by it was greatly damaged. Because of the impact, Miledi Golem’s stance was broken.

Shia reached her while swinging Doryukken.

“Rhaaaaa!!”

Along with that shout, she pulled the trigger on the handle and the shotshell inside burst out. Doryukken approached Miledi Golem using the momentum created by the acceleration from the impact that was even able to crush air.

Miledi Golem was still occupied by the severe damage on her left arm. Immediately, Doryukken hit her left hand. Without mercy, Doryukken pulverized the brittle left arm up to the shoulder.

With the momentum used to swing Doryukken, Shia floated in mid-air. Miledi Golem wanted to at least take revenge for her left arm, and she released her heat knuckle at Shia.

However, during the time Miledi was concentrating on Shia, a laser of water came forth from her lower side, and it precisely cut the part that was previously only partially cut. Afterwards, with the wound opened up and being cut further, Miledi Golem’s right hand was finally cut off.

“… … I did it.”

The one who said that with a smile, was of course Yue.

“Kh, you—! Don’t get carried away!”

Miledi raised a voice filled with irritation. In that moment, Hajime fired the anchor at the floating block overhead and moved in the air like a pendulum, catching Shia who had fallen. However, it was not a hug, but rather, holding her armpit.

“Hajime-sa~n, aren’t you going to give me a hug as a reward? Please read the mood~”

“Don’t say it as if I was a KY. You who tries to fulfill your desire in such a situation is the one that should read the mood”

The moment they landed on the nearby floating block, Shia let out a displeased voice while pouting, then Hajime tsukkomi’d while amazed by that. Miledi who lost both arms somehow didn’t summon the surrounding blocks to reconstruct her arms, she only looked at the ceiling while her eyes shone strongly.

Because of a totally bad premonition, Hajime’s expression stiffened. It was also supported by Shia’s pale expression.

“Hajime-san, Yue-san! Dodge! It’ll rain (… …)!”

Hajime guessed Shia’s special magic had perhaps triggered. That means, somehow a dangerous situation that could kill someone related to, or Shia herself would occur. He confirmed Yue’s location, a little ways behind him, with a cursory glance, then Hajime took a stance to respond to anything that might happen

Immediately, it happened.

The entirety of the room rumbled. The low rumbling of earth resounded, fragments fell from the ceiling. No, they were not fragments. It was the ceiling itself that’s falling.

“Kh!? That bastard!”

“Fufufu, it’s payback. Although I am incapable of controlling multiple things except the knights, if it’s only to make them “fall,” then even I can cause hundreds of them to do so~, show me how you surpass this~”

Although there was irritation in Miledi’s easygoing words, there was no time to notice it. Because the room’s walls were made from numerous blocks, that means the ceiling is also made from numerous blocks. One by one, each of those blocks were gigantic with weight surpassing ten tons. Those things were falling like rain. Cold sweat flowed from Hajime’s forehead.

“Ha-Hajime-san!”

“Let’s join with Yue!”

Shia let out a trembling voice while being carried, and using the anchor with a pendulum-like movement, they jumped toward Yue’s direction. Yue also jumped using the floating blocks as footholds toward them. During that time, Miledi Golem kept looking at the ceiling. Perhaps, just as she said, unlike the golem knights she was only able to control one or two things. Therefore, in order to make them fall, she must concentrate to remove hundreds of those gigantic stones from the ceiling.

Somehow, when Hajime and his party rejoined, hundreds of gigantic stones simultaneously poured down from the sky.

GOGOGOGOGOGOGOGOh!!! GOBAh!!

Blocks were coming from the ceiling, groups of gigantic stones were falling, letting out devastating roars while the room’s tremor was stopped. Moreover, she might even be able to adjust the trajectories because they were specifically aimed at the place where Hajime and his party were. Even Miledi Golem wouldn’t commit a double suicide, so it’d be safe to go under her and after he took a glance at that, he dashed out with a tremendous speed along the wall. But, even if he started now, they wouldn’t make it.

“Yue! Shia! Hold on tight! Absolutely don’t let go!”

“Nnh!”

“Yess!”

As soon as Hajime heard Yue and Shia, he once again took out Orkan from “Treasure Box.” Then, he rapidly fired 12 rockets at the oncoming gigantic stones. While leaving trails of sparks, they flew towards the death that was coming overhead, and one by one the rockets that came flying at the gigantic stones caused large explosions.

Their vision was shrouded, the groups of gigantic stones couldn’t be seen, and they let out a little smile because of Orkan’s attacks. Finally they were able to see some of the ceiling. Hajime put Orkan away then set up Donner-Schlag and fired them at the ceiling. He tried to spread the little path of safety they were in, so he continued to precisely break the fragments from the gigantic stones.

However, Hajime’s interception could only go so far. Finally, groups of gigantic stones that fell with great velocity reached Hajime and his party. Hajime confirmed that Yue and Shia were tightly holding onto him, then moved using his special magic. It was “Light Speed.” Hajime’s world immediately lost its color, he was able to recognize the falling fragments of death one by one.

He passed by the barrage of gigantic stone fragments using the minimum necessary movement. At the same time, he spun the guns in his hands and reloaded them, he used concentrated shots at the unavoidable fragments, changing their trajectories. He couldn’t waste even a comma. Just like the fight with the Guardian of Orcus Great Dungeon, where even with the level of perception expansion from “Light Speed” that he just awoke to, it still wasn’t enough. It was necessary to exceed the limit of concentration!

Hajime further used another special magic. It was “Limit Break.” Hajime’s body was immediately wrapped in red light. But, that immediately disappeared. If it was normal, Hajime’s physical abilities should have raised by three times, but that special magic was nullified by the dungeon’s magic power disintegration. “Limit Break” itself was similar to wearing a reinforced exoskeleton made by magic. It was different for physical ability strengthening which was applied internally. In other words, even with the cancellation of body strengthening, his strengthened and expanded perception effectiveness was not canceled.

Also, to “break” the “limit” wasn’t something gained for free. The load on his body wasn’t something normal. Furthermore, Hajime already strengthened his perception to the limit using “Light Speed.” His body would already have been broken if not for the demonic beasts’ meat that he ate. Actually, because he was still unable to endure it, the capillaries in Hajime’s eyeballs showed, while he let out a little nosebleed.

Yue and Shia were swaying unsteadily when he moved, while clinging to Hajime who was evading the death that rained with only small movements. He balanced himself on the footholds that swayed and were violently crushed, sometimes he made the falling fragments as his foothold. He sharpened his mind, and now he was able to perceive the cracks on the falling rocks one by one. Having passed the limit, he used the area that normally could not be used by humans to find a way to escape death!

Miledi who observed Hajime and his party from the wall’s side, saw that they were immediately swallowed by the groups of gigantic stones. Although they struggled, they weren’t able to surpass those large masses as expected, then she deactivated “fall” with a little disappointment.

With their fall stopped, the clusters of gigantic stones were floating along with the blocks, then the scattered ceiling’s wreckage rose.

“U~n, as expected, it was impossible~, but if they couldn’t do this much, they wouldn’t be able to win against those shitty bastards~”

Miledi muttered that while searching for the corpses of Hajime and his party. And, at that time,

“I have no interest in those shitty bastards.”

“Eh?”

She heard a familiar voice. The insolent boy that moved at his own pace, gray haired with an eyepatch and used artifacts she’s never seen before. That’s right, it was Hajime’s voice. Miledi turned her head to the back while letting out a shocked voice tinged with a little joy.

There was, surely, Hajime who stood safe and sound on the floating block with rough breathing, and blood flowing from his eye and nose while glaring at Miledi.

“H-how…”

Because she saw Hajime swallowed by the group of gigantic stones in front of her eyes, Miledi could only unintentionally let out a doubting voice in front of him. Having seen that, Hajime’s mouth formed a smile.

“Although it’s okay to answer that… … is it okay to only focus on me?”

“Eh?”

Miledi raised the same doubting voice as before. But, that doubt was immediately answered by hits of magic.

“”Rupture””

Yue’s dignified chant resounded, then lasers of water rushed out from behind Miledi Golem and hit her back, feet, head, and shoulders. The water cutter tore apart the surface armor of each part.

“No matter how many times you do it, it wont be any different~, I’ll just defeat you after reconstructing my arms.”

“Well, we won’t let you have the time for that.”

To the Miledi Golem that still calmly turned around after receiving Yue’s magic, Hajime used the anchor to approach her in a flash. In his other hand was Schlagen.

“Ahaha, this again? Well, it’s impossible to break my Azanthium armor~”

Miledi was still composed. She thought Hajime who clung to her was trying to shoot the chest part having aimed Schlagen there. She didn’t even try to obstruct him using the floating blocks in the surroundings. Well, that was only natural. After all, Hajime’s weapon was proven to be unable to stand against Miledi Golem’s armor. Therefore, because it already reached this stage, he still chose that kind of attack. Miledi determined that he was just putting up useless resistance without any more plans behind it.

However, her composure proved to be fatal.

“I already know that!”

Sparks came from Schlagen along with Hajime’s words, he fired the full-metal jacket-like thing that was accelerated by electromagnetism towards Miledi Golem’s chest at zero distance. A great roar and impact were generated while Miledi Golem was blown backward.

However, Hajime didn’t withdraw like last time. He kept clinging using the anchor, his artificial arm pushed into the Miledi Golem’s chest that was broken, once it was inside he fired the shotshells until they were exhausted. The tremendous impact blew Miledi Golem even further, and she was thrown into the floating block behind her.

“E-even after this, eventually…”

“Yue!”

Ignoring Miledi’s words, Hajime called out Yue’s name. Following that, Yue jumped and released her magic.

“Be frozen! “Ice Coffin”!”

Just as she wished, she pulled the trigger to activate the magic that’s originally used to confine objects inside a coffin of ice. However, this ice magic was a high-ranked water magic. Middle-ranked and above magic should be unusable in this area. Even so, this magic was necessary to restrain Miledi Golem.

The ceiling blocks that she threw along with the back of Miledi Golem were frozen immediately, then the floating block was at a stand still.

“Wh-!? How did high-ranked magic—!?”

Miledi raised a shocked voice. It was a simple story on how Yue was able to use high-ranked ice magic. Just like “Rupture,” by preparing the water beforehand she was able to reduce the consumption of magic power. That’s why beforehand, water was scattered on the blocks that Miledi was thrown to. Also, water was also scattered on the back of the composed Miledi Golem. That was the objective of the previous “Rupture.”

Even so, it still consumed enormous magic power, Yue used up all of the magic power that she stocked inside the magic crystallization stone. Yue evacuated on the nearby floating block while panting.

“You did it, Yue!”

Standing on Miledi Golem’s chest, Hajime took out his last resort from “Treasure Box.” What appeared from the void was a large elongated cylinder with a length of two and a half meters. A lot of mechanisms were installed outside, while inside a jet black stake with a diameter of 20 centimeters was loaded. On the lower side, four sturdy arms were installed, and it began to synchronize with the mechanisms inside Hajime’s artificial arm.

Just like that, Hajime inserted the arms right above the unmoving Miledi Golem, and fired the anchors that were installed on it’s outer casing. Six arms deeply pierced the surface and firmly fixed the large cylinder in place. At the same time, Hajime poured his magic power into it. Then, the large cylinder let out red sparks, the jet black stake that was loaded inside began to strongly rotate.

KIiIIIII!!!

The melody coming from the high-speed rotation echoed. Hajime was grinning, if not for having a golem’s body, Miledi’s expression would surely seem cramped. This atrocious form was the artificial arm’s attachable weapon called “Pile Bunker.” Using “Compression Transmutation,” four tons were compressed into a stake with a diameter of 20 centimeters and length of 1.2 meters, and its surface was coated with Azanthium ore. It was the heaviest and hardest stake in this world. It was shot out using a large amount of combustion powder that was compressed and electromagnetic acceleration that was set on the upper part of the large cylinder.

“Take it with all your might and die.”

Accompanied by those words, as if driving a stake into a vampire, the jet black stake struck Miledi Golem’s core.

GOoGAGAGAN!!!

The pile bunker activated accompanied with a terrific impacting sound, the jet black stake pierced through Miledi Golem’s absolute defense. The Azanthium armor on the chest was immediately cracked, and the stake buried itself into it without mercy. Because of the impact, Miledi Golem’s body sank and created a radial crack on the floating block. The floating block immediately descended. From Miledi Golem, white smoke was rising from the chest part because of the friction from high-speed rotation.

… … however, the light didn’t disappear from Miledi Golem’s eyes.

“Ha, hah. Apparently its power is still insufficient. But, well isn’t it the real deal? I wonder, did it pierce 3/4 of the armor?”

Somewhat, her voice was stiff, but Miledi still kept her composure. She secretly drenched in cold sweat. Although the pile bunker was a certain kill weapon, because of insufficient electromagnetic acceleration, its real power couldn’t be shown. Therefore, it was disappointingly unable to fully penetrate the defense.

However, Hajime’s eyes didn’t show any resignation. It was as if he already took it into account.

“Do it! Shia!”

Hajime put everything away into “Treasure Box” except the stake, then he quickly jumped away from Miledi Golem’s chest.

What appeared instead of him was Shia with rabbit ears blown by the wind and Doryukken in an upper stance, while she fell from far above.

“Kh!?”

Miledi had probably guessed what Shia tried to do. This time, Miledi Golem tried to hurriedly get away. When she realized, with Shia’s current speed, even if she moved the floating block now, she wouldn’t make it in time… … she gave up and stopped moving.

Shia, using the force from the shotshell, brought down a blow with all of her might into the stake.

DOGOoOO!!!

The stake sank further accompanied with a great roar. However, it was still unable to fully penetrate the armor. Shia decided to attack using all of the remaining shotshells, then she pulled the trigger.

DOGONh! DOGONh! DOGONh! DOGONh! DOGONh! DOGONh!

“AaAAAAA!!”

Shia’s shout rang out. She decided to show all of her will and pour it into the Sledgehammer that was her partner. With all of her might and will, she let out all of her power. Together with the attack, the floating block was greatly pushed downwards by the impact.

Finally, with a roar the floating block crashed onto the ground. The jet black stake penetrated the absolute defense of Azanthium with the last attack, and reached Miledi Golem’s core. Although it was just the tip, but ‘bishih,’ the core was cracked along with that sound.

When it crashed into the ground, Shia used Doryukken as the starting point, and with one hand, she somersaulted. Then, with all of the body strengthening power directed to her leg, the kick that carried enough centrifugal force was used to drive in the stake.

Having received Shia’s kick, the stake was immediately pushed deeper into the core and expanded the cracks… … until finally it was completely crushed.

The light in Miledi Golem’s eyes disappeared. Having confirmed that, Shia gradually loosened her power, and let out a sigh of relief. Immediately, Shia heard landing sounds behind her. There was Hajime and Yue as expected. Shia turned toward the two with a smile that sums up everything. Hajime and Yue also let out smiles that sums up everything.

One of Seven Great Dungeons; Raisen Great Dungeon’s last trial was certainly over.

Volume 5 Chapter 9


Dust drifted in their vicinity, and numerous cracks were carved on the ground. On the floating block that had crashed was a large crater, and on top of that laid a gigantic golem with a jet-black stake sprouting from its chest area.

On top of Miledi Golem, Shia let out, “zehaa zehaa,” gasping breaths while being supported by Doryukken. Hajime narrowed his eyes in admiration, while Yue looked at her with gentle eyes.

“You did it Shia. The ending was filled with great vigor. It made me think better of you, right?”

“… … Nn, you’ve worked hard.”

“Ehehe, thank you very much. But, Hajime-san, it’s okay if you put “I’ve fallen for you” instead, you know?”

“From the beginning, I would never fall for you.”

Even with her exhausted appearance, Hajime and Yue’s praise made Shia feel shy. Actually, until just recently she didn’t think anything about battle. She only single-mindedly wanted to stand on the same stage as Hajime and Yue and to always be together with them. Those were Shia’s wishes. With those deep and strong wishes, Shia faced one of the Seven Great Dungeons’ trial with her potential, and it resulted in her delivering the finishing blow.

Even for Hajime, the last scene where Shia delivered the finishing blow was something he had predicted. Because he expected the pile bunker’s power to be insufficient, he already had other means to drive it in. However, although the Rabbitman tribe was gentle and not good in combat, Shia never whined, saying “I want to go back”, while she fought, but surely she must have felt anxious and scared entering the depths of a Great Dungeon. That’s why he thought to leave the finishing blow to Shia.

The result was magnificent. She delivered the last attack with great vigor, it was so splendidly done that it even made Hajime praise her. Shia’s desire to become strong surely reached him. Even so, Hajime’s feelings did not reach the level Shia wished for. But, her perseverance and will-power certainly made him feel their bonds. That’s why Hajime gazed at Shia with gentle eyes.

“Fue? So-somehow… … Hajime-san is looking at me with such gentle eyes… … I-is it a dream?”

“You know… … No, well, although it can’t be helped when I think about how you were usually treated…”

Because the way Hajime gazed at her was unbelievable, Shia pinched her own cheek. Although Hajime wanted to complain about her reaction, once he thought of how she was treated until now, he could only think it was the natural reaction.

Yue tokotoko, approached Shia who was still pinching her cheek. Then, Shia’s clothes were pulled to make her bend down and her head was patted slowly. Her disordered hair was fixed, slowly and gently.

“U-umm, Yue-san?”

“… … Because Hajime won’t pat you, although it’s regrettable, I’ll do it instead. You did well.”

“Y-Yue-sa~n. Uu, huh, I wonder why? Somehow I can’t stop crying, fueee.”

“… … Good girl, good girl.”

At first, Shia was confused by Yue’s sudden actions, but when she understood she was being praised, as if the string of tension was cut, Shia began to weep and immediately hugged Yue. As expected, she was trying to endure herself with her first journey suddenly becoming against the Seven Great Dungeons. That’s because she was determined to go together with Hajime and Yue. To be praised and acknowledged, she couldn’t stop her tears because of the relief.

By the way, Hajime surely wouldn’t pat her, as Yue said. Shia was the type that easily got carried away, if Hajime awkwardly patted her it would result in troublesome things like Shia misunderstanding his feelings as love. This time, although Shia would be treated comparatively better by Hajime, there was no reason for multiple people to have the same feelings as Yue. That was her “special feeling.” More or less, Hajime never considered how Yue would be saddened by that.

Moreover, “Fueee~n”, there was a happy cry from Yue’s chest. It was Shia crying out of relief while being spoiled. That’s why, when Yue who patting and looking at her with gentle eyes was seen… … well, somehow the future could be predicted.

Yue was spoiling Shia while embracing her, and Hajime watched this with an indescribable expression. While that happened to the trio, suddenly, a voice rang out.

“Ummm~, although it’s such a good atmosphere~, it’s about to get dangerous for me, so can I have some of your time~?”

It was a truly familiar voice. Hajime and his party let out “Hah,” then looked at Miledi Golem, unbeknownst to them, the light in her eyes that was previously gone has returned. Immediately, Hajime and his party jumped back to put their distance. Because they were certain that her core was destroyed, they could only take stances with wariness in their minds.

“Wait, wait a sec, it’s okay~. The trial was cleared! It’s your victory! Because there is some power left inside the core’s fragments, I wanted some time to talk~, it’ll only take a few minutes.”

As if to prove those words, Miledi Golem was completely unmoving, while the lights in her eyes parts were repeatedly blinking. It seemed to disappear at any moment. That’s why, it must’ve been true when she said she only needed a few minutes.

Hajime relaxed his mind and continued to talk to Miledi Golem.

“So? What is it? Undead? To be incapable of reading the mood even after death… … Although it’s regrettable for the future “Liberators,” maybe I should help you pass on.”

“Wa-, stop it~, what’s with that obvious harassment. That was completely unpleasant.”

“Well? I won’t hear anything about killing “those shitty bastards,” you know?”

Toward Hajime’s authoritative speech, Miledi somehow gave out an atmosphere as if she wryly smiled.

“I won’t say that. That’s not necessary after all. What I want to talk about… … is more like advice. Even if there is no age of gods magic that you’re looking for in the dungeons you visit, try to obtain all of the age of gods magics… … because they are necessary for your wish…”

Maybe because Miledi’s power was almost exhausted, her words gradually became blurred and more intermittent. But, without worrying about that, Hajime told her his problem.

“All of them huh… … then tell us the locations of the other dungeons. Because they were lost in legend, I truly don’t know anymore of it.”

“Aa, there is that… … I see, the other dungeons’ locations are unknown… … it’s been a long time after all… … Un, the locations… … the locations are…”

Gradually, Miledi Golem started to lose the power in her voice. Toward her voice that somehow contained sentimentality, Yue and Shia wore serious expressions. After a long time, for her duty, rather for the sake of her wish. To have put her soul inside a vessel was an act that made them stare at her with respect.

Miledi slowly talked about the whereabouts of the remaining Seven Great Dungeons. Inside her words was a place that seemed to surprise them.

“That’s all… … Good luck.”

“… … You’ve become completely modest. What happened to those annoying lines and that infuriating tone?”

Just as Hajime said, the current Miledi gave out an atmosphere as if she had no relation to the Miledi that prepared those annoying sentences inside this dungeon, with a completely different tone, filled with sincerity and seriousness. She had also displayed it before the fight when she wanted to hear Hajime’s objectives. This was probably her real self. It was as if there was no more need to hide it before she completely disappeared.

“Ahaha, I am sorry~. But… … those shitty bastards… … were truly unpleasant fellows… … they only say unpleasant things… … that’s why, even just a little… … I want you to get accustomed to it…”

“Oi, you. I already said I won’t defeat the Gods. That’s why, don’t say it as if I’ll fight against those guys.”

Toward Hajime’s unpleased voice, Miledi replied with unexpected conviction and seriousness.

“… … You’ll surely fight them. As long as you are you… … For sure… … You’ll, kill those gods.”

“… … I don’t understand what you mean. Well, if they try to obstruct my path then it can’t be helped…”

Hajime was somewhat perplexed. Miledi who had seen his appearance let out a joyful laugh.

“Fufu… … that’s good… … it’s okay as long as you live like that… … your choice… … will surely… … be the best… … for this world…”

Afterwards, Miledi Golem’s body was wrapped in a pale light and glowed. As if it became fireflies, the light separated into smaller lights and ascended towards heaven. It was similar to how a dead soul ascends to heaven. A very, very mysterious scene.

During that time, Yue slowly approached Miledi Golem. Then, she stared at those lights.

“What is it?”

Came Miledi’s whispery voice. Similarly, Yue whispered words, a present for a great “Liberator” that was about to disappear.

“… … Thanks for your hard work. You did well.”

“… …”

Those were words of appreciation. For her alone, a great existence that kept waiting for hope at the bottom of darkness, a small present from the one still alive. Normally, they might be improper words that came from a younger person. But, as expected, those unexpected words were the only ones that came to Yue’s mind.

Those words might also be unexpected for Miledi. Without saying anything, her blank surprise could be felt. Before long, Miledi muttered in a soft voice.

“… … Thanks.”

“… … Nn.”

By the way, behind Yue and Miledi who were exchanging words, Hajime spoke with an irritated tone, “That’s enough already, so quickly disappear.”, while Shia who heard that said, “Who’s the one incapable of reading the mood now!? Please just be quiet for now!”, and covered his mouth. Fortunately, the other two didn’t notice, so their solemn atmosphere was preserved.

“… … Well then,… … it’s time… … from now on… … you should freely… … do what you want…”

Those words that were similar to Oscar’s were presented to Hajime and his party, one of the “Liberators,” Miledi, became fleeting lights and disappeared into heaven.

Silence wrapped their vicinity, Yue and Shia followed the trail of lights as it went to heaven while soaked in reverberation.

“… … In the beginning, I thought she was someone with the worst character. But, it was just her trying her best.”

“… … Nn.”

Yue and Shia exchanged those words in the quiet atmosphere. However, there was a man that didn’t think of Miledi like they did, Hajime talked to the two with a fed up expression.

“Haa, isn’t it enough? It’s about time we moved on. Also, did you really think that fellow’s mischievousness a lie? That kind of mischievousness isn’t at the level of an act.”

“Wait, Hajime-san. To say that about the dead. That’s cruel. Hajime-san truly can’t read the mood.”

“… … Hajime, KY?”

“Yue, even for you… … haa, well, that’s okay. But for your information, it’s not like I can’t read the mood. I just don’t want to.”

While they were talking, Hajime and his party didn’t notice a light shoot out from a corner of the wall. When they noticed, they moved toward it. They jumped onto the floating block on the upper part of the wall, so the trio jumped onto the same block. Then, when they landed, the floating block that served as their foothold shii—, started to move, it carried Hajime and his party toward the shining wall.

“… …”

“Wawah, this thing suddenly moved. How convenient”

“… … Service?”

Because the floating block suddenly transported Hajime and his party, Shia was surprised while Yue tilted her head in doubt. Somehow Hajime wore an unpleased expression. They advanced toward the shining wall in ten seconds and completely stopped five meters in front of it. Following that, the shining wall, as if waiting for that timing, started to lose its radiance. With a suh- sound the part of the wall that was still shining started to split. In its place, a passage with glossy white walls appeared.

The floating block Hajime and his party were on advanced into the passage. Apparently, they were going into Miledi Raisen’s dwelling. After advancing for a while, just like the door leading to Oscar’s dwelling inside Orcus Great Dungeon, there was a wall with the same seven distinct patterns engraved on them. Hajime and his party approached the door and, as if the wall was waiting for that exact timing, the wall slid to the sides and they advanced towards the interior. The floating block was advancing without stopping towards the wall on the other side.

Slipping through from the wall on the other side was…

“Yahhoo, short time no see! It’s Miledi-chan!”

A small Miledi Golem.

“”… …””

“Come on, look. I already knew this might happen.”

Yue and Shia were speechless. Hajime who already expected this showed a fed up expression. Hajime was able to expect this because he saw through that both the frivolous Miledi and the serious Miledi were the real her. Those annoying sentences and unpleasant traps were not at a level a truly serious person could conceive. Also, Miledi chose to leave her own soul to test the challengers herself. That’s why it was impossible for her to pass on after being defeated just once by a challenger. If that truly happened, the last trial would be gone after just one clearing.

Because of that, Hajime expected that Miledi herself wouldn’t disappear even after Miledi Golem was destroyed. His expectations became conviction when the floating block started to move to guide Hajime and his party. After all, Miledi was the only one that could move the floating block.

Toward Yue and Shia who were looking down silently, Miledi talked to them with a very casual tone.

“Aree? Aree? Isn’t the tension too low~? It’s okay to be more surprised, you know~? Ah, is it that you are so surprised that you can’t say anything? If that’s so, then my surprise is a bi~g success ?”

The small Miledi Golem was designed to be more human-like compared to the gigantic one. It had a slender body clad in a milk-white, long robe while wearing a white mask. Its Niko-chan mark was slightly irritating. Along with Miledi’s words that ended with kira!, a twinkling star, she came in front of Hajime and his party. Even now, Yue and Shia looked down, their expressions hidden behind their bangs. Because he could read the development that might happen next, Hajime took a step back.

It wasn’t known if it came from Yue or Shia, but a question was muttered.

“… … Before?”

“Nn~? A while ago? Aa, did you really think I was gone? No way, no~ way! That’s impossible~!”

“But, didn’t you disappear into the light?”

“Fufufu, isn’t that well prepared? That “production (of play)”! Oh my, Miledi-chan truly has talent as an actress! What a frightening woman!”

Mini Miledi’s tension rolled up. It shot up in proportion with their annoyance. In front of that Mini Miledi, Yue thrust out her hand while Shia prepared Doryukken. As expected Mini Miledi stopped moving while thinking, “Are? Did I overdo it?”

“U-u~mm…”

Towards Yue and Shia who were swaying as they approached her, Mini Miledi moved her head kakukaku, in hesitation then said the words she had decided in her mind.

“Tehe, pero?”

[T/N: Head bonk with tongue sticking out to the side, really annoying Japanese gesture.]

“… … Die.”

“Please die.”

“Wa-wait! Please wait! This body is weak! It’ll be truly bad if you destroy it! Please calm down! I will apologize!”

For a while, dotabata, dokanbakih, sounds of destruction and “Iyaa—”, a scream could be heard, Hajime who ignored those sounds was observing the room. The room was white all-over, there was nothing except a magic circle that was carved on the floor in the center of the room. The other one was a door-like thing on one part of the wall, Hajime guessed that Miledi’s dwelling was on the other side of it.

Hajime slowly approached the magic circle then arbitrarily examined it. Mini Miledi saw that and panicked while drawing near Hajime. From behind her, the expressionless vampire princess and rabbit-ears approached while making dodododoh, sound effects.

“You~ it’s not good to examine it without permission. Rather, they are your companions! Please don’t just ignore them, stop them!”

While saying those complaints, Mini Miledi hid behind Hajime and made him into a shield against the devil duo.

“… … Hajime, please move aside, I won’t kill her.”

“Please stand back Hajime-san. I will kill her. Here and now.”

“Surely, I never thought of hearing those materials at this timing. Rather, stop playing around and do it already.”

Hajime gave his advice with a somewhat amazed expression at Shia and Yue’s softness. Behind him, Mini Miledi said, “That’s right, that’s right, do it seriously!,” only to get iron clawed by his artificial arm. He ignored the Niko-chan mark that was distorted into a bitter expression. Just as it is, he put more power and mekimeki, sounds of something cracking came from Mini Miledi’s head.

“It would become an unpleasant design if this keeps up, so hand over the age of gods magic already.”

“Ummm~, did you notice your speech and behavior are villain-lik- [Meki meki meki] Affirmative! I’ll immediately hand it over! That’s why, stop! I truly will break if this keeps up!”

Maybe because their bitterness had decreased having seen Mini Miledi being capable of little more than flailing around, Yue and Shia regained their composure. Mini Miledi who understood that she truly would be destroyed if she kept joking around, finally began to activate the magic circle.

Hajime and his party entered the magic circle. This time, because Miledi herself knew they cleared the trial, there was no need to search their memories like that time in the Orcus Great Dungeon, and the information and how to use the age of gods magic were directly carved into their brains. Although Hajime and Yue who already experienced this didn’t show any reaction, Shia who experienced this for the first time bikunh, jumped.

The carving ended after a few seconds, Hajime and his party easily obtained Miledi Raisen’s age of gods magic.

“This is… … magic to manipulate gravity as expected.”

“That’s ri~ght. Miledi-chan’s magic is gravity magic. Use it well… … is what I wanted to say, but you and that Usagi-chan don’t have the aptitude~ it was at a level that even I was surprised by it!”

“How noisy. I have understood that much.”

Just as Mini Miledi said, Hajime and Shia who had the information of gravity magic carved into their brain were unable to fully use it. It’s the same case as how Yue is only able to use a little of Creation magic, it was a matter of aptitude.

“Well, Usagi-chan should be able to use it if it’s only to adjust weight. For you… … because you can use Creation magic, just do something about it yourself. Blonde-chan alone has the aptitude. With training, you can master how to use it.”

Having heard Mini Miledi’s somewhat serious explanation, Hajime could only shrug his shoulders, while Yue was nodding, and Shia was brokenhearted. It was because she was judged to have no aptitude for the age of gods magic that she had finally obtained. She could only use it to adjust her weight. She was truly disappointed. Moreover, it was out of question to make herself heavier, but there was also a problem to make herself lighter. If she was negligent, it would only make her figure bad. Rather, burdened by the demerits… … Shia could only feel depressed.

Having cast a skeptical gaze toward the depressed Shia, Hajime immediately made further demands. There was no need to be reserved at all.

“Oi, Miledi. Pass us the proof already. Then, give me all of your convenient artifacts and all of the unusual materials you have such as the Induction stone.”

“… … You, aren’t your lines completely the same as a robber’s? Are you aware of it?.”

From the distorted Niko-chan mark mask, a glare could be felt, but Hajime ignored that. Mini Miledi pulled out a ring after rustling her chest pocket, then threw it toward Hajime. Hajime received it with a pashih, sound. Raisen’s ring had a design of upper and lower ellipses with a stake piercing them.

Mini Miledi immediately made a large amount of ores appear from empty space. She probably had a “Treasure Box.” The ores that were taken out was kept inside of it. Having seen that she obediently took them out, she probably had already decided to hand them over beforehand. That’s because Miledi was convinced Hajime would fight those mad gods, that’s why she wouldn’t mind cooperation of this level.

However, to not be satisfied by this much was Hajime’s quality. After putting away all of the minerals inside his own “Treasure Box,” Hajime turned cold eyes toward Mini Miledi.

“Oi, isn’t that “Treasure Box”? If so, hand that over too. There are probably some artifacts inside.”

“O-oi you~. I won’t hand over anymore than this. The “Treasure Box” and the other artifacts are necessary to maintain the dungeon.”

“As if I care. Hand them over.”

“Ah, oi, I said no!”

Because Hajime truly tried to snatch it away, Mini Miledi retreated with an impatient expression. All of the artifacts that she owns were things necessary for the dungeon. Rather, they were only useful for that, so they were no use for Hajime to have them. Having heard that explanation, Hajime, “Hou hou, I see. Then, hand those over.”, said that demand without any mercy. No matter how it was seen, it was a robbery.

“Ee~i, I already said I won’t hand them! Mou, go back already!”

Currently, toward Hajime that impatiently approached, Mini Miledi turned on her heel with all of her might and ran toward the wall, then elevating the floating block, she moved into the ceiling.

“Don’t escape. For me, I just want to get the rewards for conquering the dungeon. That’s a legitimate demand from me.”

“Having the nerve to say that, please do something about your sense of value! Uu, to make me say something that O-chan usually said…”

“By the way, my sense of value was cultivated inside that O-chan’s dungeon.”

“O-chaa—n!!”

While she continued looking at Hajime with a shocked expression, Yue and Shia who still held a grudge after being toyed with entered the fray, they narrowly encircled Miledi. Although half of it was because she reaped what she had sown, Miledi felt the other half was her former comrades’ fault for making this dungeon.

“Haa~, to have these abnormals as my first challengers… … mou, no more. I will send you outside by force! Don’t come again!”

In front of Hajime and his party who seemed to jump out at any time, Mini Miledi grasped the string that unbeknownst to them hung down from the ceiling, then gui, pulled it.

“””?”””

For a moment, Hajime and his party let out expressions wondering what she was doing. But, an unpleasant sound they’ve already heard before could be heard by their ears.

GAKON!!

“””!?”””

That’s right, it was the sound of an activated trap. At the moment the sound rang out, accompanied with a roar, water gushed out of the four walls with tremendous velocity. A large amount of water gushed out like a flash flood, not from the front but diagonally above, and the room was filled in no time with a rapid current. At the same time, the magic circle in the center of the room sunk like an antlion’s nest, there was a hole in the center of it. The rapid current rushed toward the hole.

“You! This is—!”

Hajime who had noticed something stiffened for a moment, he instantly wore a distorted expression filled with humiliation.

A white room with a hole in the middle of it, also a large amount of water whirled and flowed into it… … That’s right, this was just like a “toilet”!

“Unpleasant things should be flushed?”

Mini Miledi gave out a wink. Yue immediately tried using magic to jump up. Because there was an age of gods magic circle, there was no magic power disintegration. That’s why, even with only a little amount of magic power left, Yue could use magic to help everyone escape the rapid current.

“So-”

“I won’t let you~!”

However, the moment before Yue said “Soar” to activate the magic, Mini Miledi thrust out her right hand, at the same time an extraordinary pressure attacked Hajime and his party. They sunk inside the rapid current as if being pressed by something gigantic. She was probably using gravity magic to multiply the gravity several times.

“See ya~, good luck on conquering the other dungeons~.”

“Gopoh… … you, did you think we are filth!? Someday, I’ll surely destroy you!”

“Kehoh… … Unforgivable.”

“Now you’ve done it! Fugah.”

Hajime and his party let out sharp parting remarks, then were swept by the rapid current into the hole. A moment before they entered the hole, only Hajime tried to retaliate by throwing something. Along with Hajime and his party that were flushed into the hole, the water flowed out at the same speed, then the floor returned and the room regained its former form.

“Fuu~, what strong fellows~. Even so, a synergist master just like O-chan huh. Fufu, somehow it feels like destiny. Keep struggling for your wish… … well then, I’ll be busy for a while to repair the dungeon and the golems… … nn? What was, that.”

Even without the ability to sweat, Mini Miledi made a gesture of wiping her forehead. After that, she discovered an object that she was not used to seeing at the edge of her field of vision. A knife was pierced into the wall and a black object hanging from it. “What is it?”, as she approached, having recalled it she finally realized.

“Heh!? This is, don’t tell me—!?”

A black object, it was Hajime’s handmade grenade. It was the only form of retaliation that he could have done; throwing a knife with a grenade attached, just before being flushed into the hole. Because he had used it many times inside the dungeon, Miledi already judged that it was an explosive, she immediately floated to take refuge in a hurry. Actually, the current Mini Miledi had bad magic power consumption when using gravity magic, she already spent most of it bringing them down. That’s why she was unable to hold down the explosion.

Although Mini Miledi watawata, turned her heels, it was too slow. At the moment Mini Miledi turned her heels, the white room was kah, filled with a flash, and followed by an intense impact.

Inside the dungeon, “Hinyaaa—!!”, a woman’s scream resounded. Afterwards, there was a small golem that was seriously in need of repair, weeping, or there wasn’t, was there…

On the other side, Hajime and his party that got flushed like filth were swept into the tunnel-like place by the rapid current at tremendous speed. It wasn’t a place where you could breathe either, so they could only advance while submerged in the water. Somehow, although unskillfully, they desperately tried to control their bodies so they wouldn’t crash into the wall and lose consciousness.

Then, at that time, in the view of Hajime and his party, many shadows passed them by. Those were fishes. It seemed the place they were swept into was an underground vein that connected to rivers and lakes. However, unlike Hajime and his party who were washed away, the fishes were boldly swimming inside the rapid current and came to pass them by.

Unbeknownst to them, one of the fishes swam beside Shia’s face who had stopped her desperation to breathe. Somehow, that fish looked toward Shia.

There were eyes.

The fish. No, the human-faced fish had oldman-like eyes. Because it probably didn’t know how to speak, it didn’t say anything. In conclusion, Shia met the eyes of the human-faced fish. The old man-like face of the human-faced fish displayed impudence and lethargic feelings, it was reminiscent of the nostalgic Shi-ma**.

Shia who was surprised, opened her eyes wide. She panickly tried to cover her mouth with her hands after unintentionally letting out her breath. However, she was so surprised she didn’t avert her gaze. Shia and the old man (fish) continued to advance inside the rapid current while staring at each other.

And, the flow of time that seemed to continue forever between Shia and the old man (fish) was abruptly ended. A voice resounded inside Shia’s head.

—- Just what are you looking at.

That was added with a click of the tongue. This time Shia was unable to endure any longer. Inside the water “Bufoa!”, she grandly exhaled. Certainly, the old man (fish) might be a kind of demonic beast. It probably had the special magic similar to “Telepathy.” But, without being able to confirm it, the old man (fish) started to swim through the rapid current and went ahead with surprising agility.

What it left behind was a rabbit-eared girl who lost her power while displaying the whites of her eyes.

* * *

From town to town, a carriage and several horses advanced peacefully on the highway that connected villages with pakka pakka, rhythmical footsteps. Certainly, there were people riding on the horses. There were three men and a woman who were dressed as adventurers. On the carriage, sitting on the coach seat was a 15-16 year old girl and a monster… … a giant shemale.

“Souna-chaa~n, because we’ll reach a spring soon, let’s rest a little there~.”

“Affirmative, Crystabel-san.”

The shemale called Crystabel was the manager of a dress store in Brook town who Yue and Shia were indebted to. Also, the girl that sat beside Crystabel was the inn girl of “Masaka Inn”; Souna Masaka. Although for some reason her name is always able to surprise anyone, she is only a normal girl who has a lot of curiosity and too much pink elements in her brain.

These two were currently returning to Brook town from a neighboring town escorted by adventurers. Because it could be understood that Crystabel was as strong as an oni, it harvests a lot of clothing materials by itself. To get all of the materials at the same time, it left the town. Souna was taking advantage of it hearing that a relative in the neighboring town was injured, she represented her parents who were unable to leave the inn to deliver a get-well gift. The adventurers originally came from Brook town, having finished their job, they incidentally became their escorts.

There was only one day of travelling left until they returned to Brook town. Crystabel and the others decided to rest at the spring on the side of the highway, at noon.

Crystabel and the others who had arrived at the spring were preparing to have lunch on the spring’s levee after letting the horses drink the water. Souna who wanted to get some water approached the side of the spring. Then, the moment she scooped the water by dipping the container in the spring,

GOPOh! GOPOGOPOh GOPANh!!

Those sounds suddenly rang out, then bubbles suddenly started spouting from the center of the spring.

“Kyaa!”

“Souna-chan!”

Souna raised a scream and fell on her butt, Crystabel immediately carried her in one arm and returned to where the adventurers were. Even at that time, the bubbles that spouted out became more intense, until finally a water column with a height more than ten meters appeared.

This spring was commonly known as a resting place along the highway, and this kind of phenomenon had never once been reported. Therefore, Crystabel, Souna, and the adventurers could only open their mouths in surprise while blankly staring at that, without being affected by the rain-like drops of water, they only looked at the huge water column.

Following that,

“Douwaaaaa–!!”

“Nnh—-!!”

“… … … …”

From the water that spouted out without losing momentum, three people… … the screams of two people could be heard as they came out. Spontaneously “What the-!”, said Crystabel and the others with their eyes popping out. The trio of humans that came out were blown off ten meters above while screaming, and just as it is, they were thrown to the opposite side of Crystabel and the others and DOBONh!, fell while making that sound.

“”””””… …””””””

“Wh-what on earth happen-…”

The adventurers and Crystabel were speechless. Souna’s mutters represented everyone’s feelings.

* * *

“Gehoh, gahoh, ~~kh, that was awful. I will surely destroy that guy next time. Yue, Shia. Are you okay?”

“Kehoh kehoh… … nn, I am okay”

Having somehow managed to get into the water’s surface, Hajime confirmed Yue’s and Shia’s safety after cursing. However, only Yue replied to him.

“Shia? Oi, Shia! Answer me!” “Shia… … where are you?”

Even as they called out to her, there was no sign of her in the surroundings. Hajime hurriedly dived underwater to search for her. Then, as he thought, Shia had sunk to the bottom. Having lost her consciousness, she was unable to float because of Doryukken’s weight.

Hajime took out a compressed super-heavy mineral from “Treasure Box” and used it as a weight replacement to immediately dive, then he carried Shia up.

He went to shore while dragging Shia. Shia was laid upside down, her face was pale with the whites of her eyes showing, while her breathing and pulse stopped. Maybe because she saw something unpleasant, she had lost consciousness with her face looking like it had a cramp.

“Yue, do CPR!”

“… … C-… what?”

“A~, like I said, secure her breathing…”

“???”

Having seen Shia’s condition, he told Yue to do CPR, but Yue only had “?” floating overhead. In this world, there was probably no such thing as CPR. Because there was no wound, drinking the Holy Water wouldn’t help, and would just hydrate her even more. Yue was weak at healing magic, she couldn’t possibly know any magic that was capable of making Shia let out water or to pinpoint massage her heart.

Although the exact moment when she lost her consciousness wasn’t known, there was no time to argue. Hajime, with grim determination performed CPR to the unconscious Shia.

And naturally, well, there was mouth to mouth, Yue who saw that immediately became displeased, but because she understood that was the only way to save Shia, she could only quietly watch. That’s right, she only jii and ji-, stared at him.

Hajime tried to ignore Yue’s inorganic gaze with all his might and repeatedly performed CPR.

‘Geez, when I think back, to be dying right after everything is over… … you’re truly a regrettable fellow.’

In his mind, he let out those abusive words, and after doing artificial respiration for who knows how many times, Shia finally vomited water. Hajime turned her sideways so the water wouldn’t block the trachea. It was a situation where he completely covered her body.

“Kehoh kehoh… … Hajime-san?”

“Ou, it is Hajime-san. Geez, don’t die because of somethi-!?”

While continuing to display an amazed expression near Shia who was laid down and choking, Hajime showed a somewhat relieved expression. Shia who could only blankly look at Hajime, suddenly, gabacho!, kissed him as she embraced him. It was an unexpected action, so Hajime who was close to her failed to avoid it.

“Nnh!? Nn-!!”

“Amuh, nchu”

Shia held Hajime’s head with both her hands, wrapping her legs on Hajime’s waist to keep a hold on him and without any reservation her tongue invaded his mouth. Hajime was unable to shake off Shia who used her herculean strength to hold him.

To tell the truth, during the many repeated artificial respirations, Shia somehow knew she was kissed by Hajime. Although she was unable to move her body, her consciousness had already returned. It was probably a situation brought by her using body strengthening the moment she drowned.

Having kissed many times, Shia’s feeling-o-meter was blown off. To not let him escape, she completely held Hajime’s body then losing herself, she returned Hajime’s kiss.

On the other side, Yue who saw such a spectacle… … was perplexed and displeased. Although she was displeased by it, she didn’t try to stop it. She whispered, “Only this time, as a reward…”, in small mutters. Apparently, she took Shia’s feelings into consideration and seemed to allow it as her reward for working hard inside the dungeon.

“Wah wah, what!? What’s with this situation!? A-amazingly… … wet, while entangled with each other… … so, so intense… … even though it’s outside! H-how abnormal!”

That was the conclusion that came from the excessive delusions of Souna-chan; the inn girl. Following that, “Ara? Certainly you are…”, Crystabel tried to remember Yue and Shia while wriggling its body. Then, with flames of envy inside their eyes, the male adventurers desperately tried to control themselves from drawing their swords, while the female adventurer looked at them with cold eyes.

Now, with Shia stuck to him, Hajime lift his body up. Then, he intensely grasped Shia’s plump butt.

“Anh!”

Shia unintentionally let out a gasp. In the next moment, without loosening his grasp, Hajime PEIH!, pulled and peeled Shia off then threw her into the spring just like that.

“Ukyaaaa!”

DOPANh!

Looking at Shia being dropped into the spring while screaming with a skeptical gaze, Hajime fixed his hair while breathing roughly.

“Th-there is no time to be careless at all. Attacking right after resuscitation… … even I can’t read that move.”

Towards Shia who was immediately crawling out from the spring like Sadako, Hajime displayed an expression as if he was shivering.

[T/N: Sadako is Japan’s female ghost equivalent of the grudge.]

“Uu~ that was cruel~ even though Hajime-san also did that~.”

“Haa? That was just a life-saving action… … rather, you, were you already conscious that time?”

“U~n, although I could only feel it… … I somehow knew what happened. For me to be kissed by Hajime-san, uhehe.”

“Stop that laugh… … listen, in the end that was a life-saving action, there is no other meaning, you know? Don’t expect anything weird, okay?”

“Is that so? But, a kiss is a kiss. The time for dere will come faster if this keeps up.”

“Never. Rather, Yue. Help me stop her.”

“… … Only this time… … but, because Shia had worked hard… … No, but…”

“Yue~? Yue-san Ya~y”

Toward Yue who kept looking at an empty space while continuing her murmurs, Hajime was only able to let out a sigh while thinking, “This one is also hopeless.” Then, he looked toward Crystabel and the others that had come near to check on Hajime and his party.

His gaze moved from the adventurers, it stopped for a moment toward Souna. Then when he saw Crystabel, he returned his gaze toward Souna. It seemed he preferred to not see that.

Having been gazed at by Hajime, Souna’s body twitched then shook, and her face immediately blushed.

“So-sorry for the interruption! P-please don’t worry about us and continue!”

Crystabel picked Souna up by the scruff of her neck, who tried to turn her heels after saying those words. Then, they came straight toward Hajime and his party as it is. Because of the monster approaching them, Hajime tried to pull out Donner, but Shia next to him said, “Ah, manager-san”, with a tone as if they were acquaintances and they continued talking.

As a result, their current location turned out to be one day away from Brook town, Hajime and his party decided to revisit the town. Taking advantage of Crystabel’s carriage, they were spoiled by it. Their wet clothes were changed on the way. While talking about various things, they advanced under the warm sunlight with the horse’s footsteps as the BGM.

Together with a new companion, Hajime conquered the second dungeon. While laying down inside the wagon and watching the sun shining brilliantly, Hajime thought about what might happen on his journey from now on and a smile floated on his face.

Volume 5 Chapter 10


Hatayama Aiko, 25 years old. Social studies teacher.

As a teacher she taught specialized knowledge to the students, she also tried to improve their academic performance. She wasn’t someone who only gave guidance, but someone exemplary. Surely, those were serious matter for her, even more so, were her “allies”; those who thought of her as the most important person. To put it concretely, she was the adult that the kids could depend on outside of their families.

This was influenced by a big event in her student days, but let’s leave it at that. Anyway, as the ally of the students outside of their houses, Aiko’s pride as a teacher became the pillar of support that helped her call herself a teacher.

Therefore, Aiko was extremely dissatisfied by their current situation. Suddenly, while she was stunned after being summoned to another world and arbitrarily forced into a fantastic situation. The student with the greatest charisma in class continued the talks instead of her. And then when she noticed her precious students were preparing for a war.

No matter how she tried to persuade them, the decided “flow” easily swept away her opinion, she was unable to stop her students at all.

“That’s why, I will at least protect my students!”. Is what she was determined to do, but with her rare abilities, she was told to settle with being useful with the duties outside of combat (farmland improvement and development). Although she desperately tried to oppose it, she was persuaded by her students. Aiko herself was unable to object to the point of view of the right person in the right place.

She spent every day anxiously thinking about the students who were fighting beyond her reach. Guarded by temple knights of the Church of the Saints and imperial guards of the Herrlicht kingdom, she visited every farm village and undeveloped area, but when she finally completed that work and returned to the royal palace, what awaited her was a certain student’s death.

At that time, Aiko blamed herself over and over for being unable to force herself to stay with them. “After all, aren’t I just being carried away after thinking myself an ideal teacher!?” Something like that. Certainly, Aiko was perplexed because she couldn’t even be certain if something might have changed with her being there. But, this incident gasun, struck Hatayama Aiko’s head as a teacher, in other words it awakened her.

Toward the students who were unable to stand up because of the overwhelming fear of “death,” the church and the kingdom still wished for them to resume their war preparations. Aiko thought, “As if I would let it happen for a second time!”, stood to oppose the church and the nobles of the kingdom. Using her position and abilities as her shield, she shouted out, “Don’t come near my students,” to corner them.

As a result, she somehow managed to gain victory. There were no students who refused to fight. But their hearts wavered because of Aiko’s persistence. In addition, her already high popularity was grew further. Although she wouldn’t do anything like war, the ironic result was that, at the very least some of the encouraged students appeared to escort Aiko in her duties running all over the place.

“There’s no need for you to fight” and “Because the knights are escorting me, I’ll be okay”, was how she persuaded them to give up, but some of the students stood up and said “We’ll protect Ai-chan”, filled to the brim with determination. Following that, she was eventually overwhelmed, afterward they followed her around the farmlands, and “I was swept around again. I am such a bad teacher…”, while on all fours was still fresh in her mind.

By the way, this time, although the dedicated knights escorting Aiko assisted in persuading the students, somehow it became a situation where the students stubbornly refused to back down. If they asked why they opposed the bodyguards, as a consensus of all the students, they blocked everything with the words:

“As if we can leave Ai-chan to someone we don’t know!”

The students’ sense of crisis was directed at not thieves and demonic beasts on the road ahead, but rather it was turned towards Aiko’s dedicated knights. Their reason was that all of the members were good-looking guys. This was the upper echelons’ strategy to tie Aiko’s talent to the kingdom and church. In short, it was a honeytrap-thing. One of the students who noticed it informed the other students and “Protect Ai-chan from the good-looking military men corps” was formed.

However, there was a miscalculation made by the students. The so-called hunter becoming the hunted scenario. To prove it, these were the persuasive words that the knights gave the students.

Commander of the temple knights and the bodyguard, David:

“There is no need to worry. I’ll protect Aiko. I won’t let her get even a scratch. Aiko is… … my everything”

Vice-commander of the temple knights, Chase:

“For her sake, I will even throw away my beliefs. I am determined to dedicate everything for Aiko. Don’t you feel relieved even by this much?”

Imperial knight Chris:

“It’s my destiny to meet Aiko-chan. Did you think I’ll let my destined person die?”

Imperial knight Jade:

“… … I swore to risk my life. Not as an imperial knight. But, as a man”

This time, the students thought, “Just what on earth happened!? They all had a change of heart!”, something like that. In other words, at first they thought it was Aiko who would fall into the honey-trap, but after hearing those words they shout, “We won’t hand Ai-chan to unknown people!”, as if they were her parents, they didn’t want to part from Aiko’s side.

It should be noted, what happened between Aiko and them… … because it’s a long story it’ll be omitted, but Aiko’s idleness and inborn diligence made a gap. Coupled with her sincerity which permeated her surroundings, they had already become Aiko’s believer ‘when they noticed,’ well something along those lines. When told, it could become an entirely new story… … so a lot happened. A lot of things.

With that said, currently, the students were divided into Kouki’s hero group, which continued to train inside the “Orcus Great Dungeon”, the stay behind group, and Aiko’s bodyguard group.

After that, two months after the messengers of the empire visited Herrlicht kingdom, Aiko and her party that improved and developed farmland were currently using the carriage to go develop a new farmland. Their destination was the lakeside town, Ul.

“Aiko, aren’t you tired? There’s no need to hold back if you’re tired, you know? We’ll immediately take a break, okay?”

“No, I am okay. David-san. Rather, didn’t we just take a break a while ago? I am not weak after all”

Inside the spacious and large carriage, the commander of Aiko’s bodyguards’; David, worriedly talked to Aiko. Aiko’s reply was mixed with a wry smile.

“Fufu, commander just can’t stop worrying about Aiko-san. Because a while ago you were exhausted after just a day of travel… … that’s why I am also worried. Make sure to not hold yourself back, okay?”

“I apologize for the inconvenience that time. That was the first time I had traveled by carriage… … but, I am really okay because I’ve become accustomed to it. Thank you very much for your concern. Chase-san”

At first, Aiko displayed disgraceful behavior because she had yet to experience how a carriage moved, she blushed because she was reminded of her past, and thanked the vice-commander of the bodyguards; Chase. Towards the blushing Aiko, Chase covered his mouth with his hand in agony, and tried to casually take Aiko’s hand… … “Gohonh!”, his hand was stopped by a cough and a sharp gaze. The one who stopped him was a schoolgirl, Sonobe Yuka, who sat diagonally in front of Aiko. She was a member of “Protect Ai-chan from good-looking military men corps.” Because they wouldn’t know what might happen if there were only Aiko and good-looking military men inside the carriage, several members also came to board it.

By the way, there were eight people inside the carriage. Outside were knights on the scale of a platoon, they tried to hold back because it was already too late to tsukkomi about how only the commander and vice-commander were allowed to ride the carriage. These good-looking guys had also tried to give some reason or another to ride the carriage. They seemed to not want to be separated from Aiko.

“Oya, oya, I’ve been stared at. To have gathered so many wrinkles on your forehead, wouldn’t it spoil your cute face?”

Chase said that accompanied with an ikemen-smile. It was an attractive smile that could make an ordinary woman inadvertently blush. But, Yuka’s reaction was, “Peh!”, an expression of someone who wanted to spit on him even now.

“Not only Ai-chan sensei, do you also call other women “cute”? Ai-chan-sensei, this person is surely a bad philanderer. Please be careful, okay?”

Yuka believed a guy that’s capable of saying another woman is “cute” in front of his beloved, wasn’t a good guy. These guys also had realize they were used by their employers to honeytrap Aiko. They knew that their appearances were capable to making women’s hearts flutter. Because she knew that, Yuka was irritated by Chase who was able to smile daringly, and she made a small counter.

“S-Sonobe-san. Don’t be that belligerent. Even though you finally called me “sensei,” you still called me “Ai-chan”… … isn’t it okay to just use Aiko-sensei?”

“That won’t do. Ai-chan-sensei is “Ai-chan,” that’s why nothing else will do except Ai-chan-sensei. That’s the consensus of the students”

“Wh-what’s with that, I don’t understand it. Moreover, is it the students’ common view? Is that the way this generation thinks? Work hard me, this is a trial for my dignity and reliability as a teacher! I must understand how my students think at any cost!”

Toward Ai-chan-sensei who said to herself, “Fight-!”, Yuka and Chase’s awkward interactions, and similar atmosphere became warm and fuzzy. That’s the reason why Aiko’s called “Ai-chan,” but she didn’t notice. Her road to become a dignified teacher was a long one.

Even so, for the reliability part, the students were truly depending on Aiko. Even when seen from an outsider’s point of view, she was the most familiar adult the students had, after all. Her recognition became stronger when she stood up to oppose the leaders of the kingdom and church. Especially toward the students that were brokenhearted because of Hajime’s death, Aiko became their mental support.

As a matter of fact, even for the students who requested to be Aiko’s guards, the desire to simply be near Aiko was half of their reason for doing so. It should be noted that, the members of the Ai-chan’s bodyguards, other than Sonobe Yuka were Sugawara Taeko, Miyazaki Nana, Aikawa Noboru, Kawahara Akira, Tamai Atsushi, and Shimizu Yukitoshi, a total of seven students.

From there, they traveled on carriage for four days.

Good-looking military men tried to approach Aiko, but Aiko, who thought everything they said was for the sake of their employers, just let it pass through her ears. Aiko didn’t notice that they had truly fallen for her. Added with the effect of students glaring at them when they tried to seduce her more than necessary, a heavy mood often came about. But it soon changed into a warm and fuzzy one because of Aiko’s speech and behavior… … and that repeated until the group finally arrived at the lakeside town, Ul.

After recovering from their travel fatigue, they began to survey Ul’s outskirts’ farmlands and made their plan of improvement. Although there were a lot of love-comedies with Aiko at the center during those times… … that was also a story for another time.

Finally, they began to reform the farmlands, and recently she got “Goddess of Good Harvest” as her second name that started to spread from Ul town, then once again, a new incident occurred and squeezed Aiko’s mind.

One of her students disappeared.

Aiko worked the best she could. All for the sake of her precious students. In the end, what awaited her was an impactful reunion that would end in an undesirable outcome.

Volume 6 Chapter 1


“Fufuh, your silliness, thoroughly show me how you sticky you get today!”

The crescent moon sometimes hidden by clouds illuminated the dark night. Even now, the face that possessed radiance peeped from above the clouds that was moved by the wind. That light began to illuminate a certain building on the ground. More accurately, a rope hanging from the roof of that building, and what was illuminated was a girl that displayed excellent rappelling skills, just like a special forces from somewhere.

Surusuru, as she descended to the corner of a window in a certain room on the third floor, she turned around. While being upside down. her face peered in from the upper part of the window.

“For today’s sake, I had Crystabel-san teach me her Climbing technique! I never thought of using it at this place, kukuku. Now, what kind of abnormal plays will you do, I will absolutely confirm it!”

“Haa haa,” rough breathing came from the excited girl as she focused on peeping into the room before her. Concealing herself, this girl was none other than Souna-chan; the inn girl of Brook Town’s “Masaka Inn”. Bright and energetic, able to talk without hesitation, and working hard all over the place. Even though she couldn’t be called beautiful, the inn girl was simply lovely just like a blooming flower on a plain. There was a considerable amount of single men targeting her in this town.

That girl was currently using all the techniques she knew to “peep” on certain guests with all her might. If her expression was seen by the men who fell for her would make them instantly feel as if they’d been disillusioned… … It was as if she was a perverted old man.

“Kuh, it is dark after all. I can’t see anything. If only the angle shifted a little more…”

“Like this?”

“That’s right, if it’s from this angle… … Even so, isn’t it too quiet? Even I thought I’d hear more moaning…”

“Isn’t it possible to use magic to intercept the sound?”

“Hah!? There is also that move! Kuu, how crafty! But, I won’t give up! Even if it’s only their silliness, I’ll burn it into my eyes…”

Just saying this once more, here was outside the window on the third floor. Even if Souna was an idiot to the limits, she couldn’t believe she’d hear a voice from nearby. Souna instantly sweated like a waterfall, and gigigi, turned around with an awkward movement just like a machine that was forgotten to be oiled. There was…

Hajime standing in the sky like a Niou statue, with a cold smile plastered across his face.

“I-ich not what you think, you know? Dear customer. This is, that’s, umm, right! A regular inn maintenance!”

“Hou~, in the middle of the night?”

“Th-that’s right~. Look, if I don’t do it some time in the middle of the night, such as during the day, the repair work will end up being seen. Because it’s an inn, there will be some backlash, right?”

“I see, isn’t reputation an important thing?”

“Th-that’s right! Reputation is important!”

“By the way, apparently there is a peeping tom in this inn. Do you know something about it?”

“Th-that’s a serious situation! T-to peep, th-that’s unforgivable, right?”

“Aa, just as you said. Isn’t peeping unforgivable?”

“E, ee, it is unforgivable I think…”

Hajime and Souna looked at each others’ faces and “Hahaha”, “Fufufu”, laughed together. However, Hajime’s eyes weren’t laughing, and even though Souna was laughing, she was trembling a little while sweat continued to drop.

“Die.”

“Hii—, I am sor~ry.”

Hajime suddenly reverted to his serious look and iron clawed Souna’s face. Merimeri, sounds came from Hajime’s fingers. Souna who could only flail around in the air, let out a scream and desperately asked for forgiveness. Souna is an ordinary girl. That’s why Hajime adjusted his power to a level that wouldn’t overdo the punishment. If this was her first offense, then he would’ve be more lenient. But the day after he returned from the Raisen Great Dungeon, and every night since they checked into the inn, she kept trying to peep using various methods. That’s why his leniency was fading. By the way, the reason they were still staying at this inn was because the food was delicious.

Hajime could only let out a sigh and carry Souna, who was now only capable of twitching, in his arm. Souna was finally able to let out a relieved sigh when her face was released. But, when she looked down… … there were devils. Even though there were smiles on their faces, they were her parents that looked like devils whose eyes didn’t smile, just like Hajime’s.

“Hii!!”

They noticed that Souna had seen them. She was slowly descending while her parents raised their hands to receive her. It was just like an invitation to hell.

“This time, it’ll probably be forgiven only after a hundred spankings.”

“Iyaaaa—!”

Towards Hajime’s words, Souna remembered her punishments up to now, and was screaming. Surely, at breakfast the next day, he’ll see Souna rubbing her swelling butt with teary eyes. Every night and every morning, Hajime could only sigh at such spectacles.

* * *

Having handed Souna over to her parents, Hajime returned to his room and collapsed onto his bed.

“… … Thanks for your hard work.”

“Welcome home.”

The ones who greeted Hajime were of course Yue and Shia. The room was illuminated by moonlight shining in through the windows, and the pair fleeting figures could be seen. The girls sitting on the opposite bed were Yue and also Shia who sat shamelessly. Only wearing negligees, their appearances were somewhat lascivious. Coupled with their beautiful faces, if they were drawn on a painting, it’d be described as a masterpiece even by a second-class writer.

“Ou. Even so, what on earth drives that child… … to even climb down from the roof, that’s not normal, right? As expected, no matter how delicious the food, we should search for another inn.”

Hajime spoke with an amazed tone. Standing up, Shia laughed and sat on Hajime’s bed. Yue also steadily stood up and moved to Hajime’s bed, then she put her knees below Hajime’s head. As the result, they became lap pillows.

“Surely, our relationship has ignited the flames inside that Souna-chan’s girly mind. It can’t be helped for her to be curious about us. Isn’t that cute.”

“… … but, for her to become more and more skillful… … it worries me.”

“Yesterday, she used a handmade snorkel tube to hide at the bottom of the bathtub… … When I saw her glaring and sparkling eyes, it made me shiver.”

“U~n, certainly, that’s bad manners for an inn’s daughter… … For now, it’s only towards us but…”

While they chatted about Souna’s eccentric behaviors, Shia quietly drew her body near Hajime. She naturally extended her hand, then guided Hajime’s hand towards her breast. Shia’s face turned crimson, and she was nervous at what might happen from this situation.

Hajime gently grasped Shia’s hand back. Kyuh, he put in more power that made Shia’s body respond with a twitch. Because she was happy, she also put her power into her grasp. Hajime continued to put more strength into his grasp.

Kyuh… PIKUNh, Gyuh… BIKUNh, GIRIh… BIKUBIKU, MISHIh… GAKUBURU

“Wa-! Hajime-san! It will be crushed! My hand will be crushed!”

MEKyah!

“Hii—! I am sorry, I am really sorry! I just got a little carried away! That’s why release it! It’ll break! I’m going to break if you do anymore than this!”

“What are you trying to do by casually making a good mood? To begin with, your room is next door. So why are you here?”

Towards her hand that was gripped by Hajime, Shia tried to somehow release it while trembling, but she couldn’t release it because of the vise-like grasp.

“Th-that’s, I was just wondering~ if I can get into the same bed ?, something like that. Rather, our relationship is already at the stage where we kiss. It’s okay if it’s only that much.”

“As if. Even though I have said it was a life-saving action.”

“Well, from my intuition, Hajime-san has started to become dere! Compared to the beginning, you’ve become very gentle! Because that is a fact, then… … Guhehe “MEKHOBAKIh” Doon’t—! It’s going to break—!”

Unable to endure hearing Shia’s rude plans, Hajime inadvertently put more power into his grip. Shia whose hand was released, trembled at the edge of the bed while crouching and holding her hand to endure the pain. Ignoring Shia, Hajime turned his glance toward Yue. Yue immediately looked straight at Hajime.

“Rather, Yue. Recently, aren’t you too lenient? Did you have a change of heart?”

Yue tilted her head and thought about Hajime’s questions. Just as Hajime said, having returned from Raisen’s Great Dungeon, Yue’s attitude towards Shia become more lenient. Before, when Shia tried to stick to Hajime she’d immediately blow her away without arguing, but recently she didn’t say anything about Shia’s skinship. Even so, if it was something excessive… … for example when Shia tried to kiss him, she’d immediately become displeased…

“… … Shia did her best. She’ll continue doing that from now on. Because she likes Hajime and me.”

“Nn? Well, that’s so…”

“… … I also… … don’t hate her.”

“No matter what, you’re actually getting along well. I can understand that just by watching. Nn~”

The main point that Hajime guessed from Yue’s few words, Yue was pleased by Shia, but not at the level of thinking of her as someone important.

That was the truth. Inside Raisen’s Great Dungeon was magic power disintegration that was even stronger than in the ravine, so Yue was unable to display her full power. It was the same with Hajime. They could guess how much hardship they’d have experienced if it were just the two of them. Surely, Hajime alone would be able to clear it, in exchange, the probability of him using one or two Holy Waters was high. To be able to conquer it without consuming them could be considered as thanks to Shia.

Just a little while ago, Shia was an existence that had no connection to fighting. Rather than being unrelated, it was more like she disliked it. This girl was surely frightened and uneasy, but she kept following Hajime and Yue without complaining. They went into the hell-like Great Dungeon, and while grinding her teeth, she was finally able to beat it with a splendid result.

She was single-mindedly doing that for the sake of her love towards Hajime, and her friendship toward Yue. Because she wanted to be together with them, Shia had changed herself and advanced ahead with all her might.

Yue of course held jealousy and a desire to monopolize him. Therefore, Shia’s feelings towards Hajime were not easily acknowledged. That’s why, at first, although it was hard to support it… … towards Shia who’s able to jump straight even after being treated cruelly, friendship was spread after so many times, following that it was further proven by how they conquered the Great Dungeon… … that became the tangible proof.

If she thought about it, Yue had no memory of anyone she could call her friend. Before she was sealed, she was busy with studying politics. There was no one who could be her friend on equal footing. In other words, she was alone. That’s why, toward Shia who said, “We are comrades~!”, straight without being two faced, excluding the parts about Hajime, from the beginning she was unable to hate her.

Because of that, regarding Hajime recently, “Well, if it is Shia then just a little…”, she showed her generosity.

“… … Even so.”

“Nn?”

Yue looked up at Hajime while continuing her words. Her eyes were bewitching and filled with sincerity, confidence, and resolution. Added to Yue’s gleaming smile that also reflected all of the above, she was so lovely, so charming, and made Hajime instinctively hold his breath. As if she was possessing gravity, Hajime was unable to move his glance and could only look at her in admiration. Hajime once again returned the look at Yue.

“… … Hajime’s heart is already mine.”

“… …”

No matter who else loves Hajime, no matter who else came to be attached to him, the number one, the most important is… … me. There was such a declaration. Yue’s declaration of war. A declaration of war toward those they had, and would meet from now on.

Hajime was speechless. He was sucked in by the radiance of her eyes, Yue once again as if entwined by him, caught Hajime’s glance. Following that, Hajime’s hand touched Yue’s cheek, while Yue put her hand over his. The moonlight reflected their shadows on the wall, their shadows slowly became closer. Then, at the moment they almost met…

“Gusuh, umm, can you at least please stop forgetting my existence? It feels so empty and lonely… …gusuh.”

Shia was sitting while holding her knees on the corner of the bed; while crying and wiping her tears she watched Hajime and Yue create a world for two people.

It was a truly pitiful appearance, Hajime felt somewhat bad, and Yue was telling her to come closer. “Yue-zaa~n”, while shouting that, Shia dived into Yue’s bosom and sniffled. Shia’s head was gently stroked, and because it felt pleasant she closed her eyes, then started to sleep just like that.

Hajime who saw their appearance could only wryly smile and say,

“Rather than a friend, aren’t you more like a mother?”

“… … I prefer Hajime’s child.”

“… …”

“… … Won’t you be gentler to Shia?”

“… … About that, I’ll do my best.”

“Nn… … I love you”

“… … Ou”

In the end, with Shia on his left side and Yue on his right side, the three of them fell asleep. After this day, Shia who was allowed to be in the same room would dance in ecstasy, and get carried away by repeatedly trying to attack Hajime every night, only to be severely punished by him.

By the way, at the time Shia screamed when her hand was grasped, Souna who heard that further intensified her misunderstanding, curiosity, and her delusions. Then she became an inn girl that possessed high infiltration skills… … but this was another story.

* * *

KARAN, KARAN

Accompanied by the sound of bells, the door of the adventurer’s guild: Brook’s branch opened. Three silhouettes entered, they were Hajime, Yue, and Shia who had completely become celebrities after several days. Inside the guild’s cafe, several adventurers spend their time freely just like usual, but there were some who greeted Hajime and his party by raising a hand when they noticed them. As for the men, they looked at Yue and Shia as usual, then turned their glances filled with envy toward Hajime, but there were no malicious ones here.

They had stayed at Brook town for a week, there were several people who didn’t learn and caused a commotion by challenging him to a duel to obtain Yue or Shia during that time. In the past, they were unable to persuade Yue who was known as “Crotch Smasher” because they were frightened by her, as such they tried to capture Hajime and bury him outside the moat.

Of course, Hajime wouldn’t do something as troublesome as that. Finally, “Duel me!”, when the line was only on “Duel,” he already fired the gun. What shot out was a non-lethal rubber bullet that exploded as it hit the pitiful challenger’s head, and made him spin three times, then kiss the ground.

Because of that, in the town, Yue the “Crotch Smasher” and her loved person, the one who was capable of killing his enemy in a blink before the duel even started, Hajime the “Duel Smasher” combination became famous people to be reckoned. Even though they didn’t apply a party name to the guild, the name “Smasher Lovers” already spread, and Hajime who discovered their nickname could only look off into the distance for a while, because of this new memory.

By the way, as a side note, Shia who felt her existence become thinner could only shed tears.

“Oya, the three of you are together today?”

Hajime and his party approached the counter, just as usual, aunt… … Catherine was there, and she was the one that greeted them just now. Catherine’s voice was filled with surprise because in this one week the ones who came to guild were usually either Hajime alone or Shia and Yue as a pair.

“Aa. We’ll leave the town tomorrow, and because we are indebted to you, we came to greet you. Furthermore, we thought of accepting it if you have any commissions related to our destination”

What he meant by indebted, was how Hajime had borrowed a guild’s room for free. Because he finally gained Gravity magic, he wanted to experiment: combining it with Creation magic, that’s why he needed a spacious room. Catherine who happened to hear about it offered the use of a guild room for free.

It should be noted that Yue and Shia trained to use gravity magic on the town’s outskirts.

“I see. So you’re going to leave. That’ll make me lonely. It’s been lively since you came back here after all~”

“Please give me a break. There is a pervert in the inn, there is also a pervert in the dress store, there are also those perverts who start to prostate when Yue and Shia walk in town and stalker perverts who call them “Onee-sama,” there were also idiots who challenged me to duels… … there were no decent fellows at all. Of all the guys I met, 70% are perverts and 20% are idiots… … just what’s wrong with this town”

All of the complaints that Hajime said while scowling were the truth. Let alone Souna, everytime Hajime met Crystabel, she always licked her lips while looking at him like a carnivore, he already forgot how many times he felt chills.

Moreover, there were three major factions created inside Brook town, they tried to compete with each other every day. One was the “We want to be stepped on by Yue-chan corps”, the other was the “We want to be Shia-chan’s slaves corps,” and the last one was the “We want to be onee-sama’s siblings corps”. Respectively, they literally hold those as their wishes, and it seems they competed on which side would be the majority.

Hajime and his party could only spurt out their drinks because those names were the opinion of the masses. Suddenly there were people inside the town prostrating to Yue saying “Please step on us!” It made her shiver. It was not known how extreme their thought processes were to be like that for Shia. The demi-human race should have been under discrimination, so the way they wanted to become her slaves was a full chance for tsukkomi, but she immediately refused them because it was unpleasant to think deeply about it. The last was a group of only women, maybe because they saw him as an obstruction to Yue and Shia, they mainly tried to eliminate Hajime. Once, “The harmful and parasitic pest to Onee-sama! I’ll remove his ballssss—!!”, a girl screamed that while thrusting a knife toward him in one hand.

Because it’d be troublesome to kill a girl inside town after all, Hajime only left that girl naked in a tortoise shell-like bondage (because he had no knowledge about it) situation, after hanging her on the highest building, and leaving after sticking on a piece of paper that read, “I’ll kill you next time.” Because of the indifferent content in the paper he left behind, the girls’ extreme actions became more hidden, and that’s a good thing.

Hajime who recalled those events could only frown, while Catherine let out a bitter smile.

“Now, now, the lively part is the truth.”

“Right, it sure is.”

“Then, where are you going?”

“Fhuren”

Even though they talked in that manner, Catherine was working diligently. Immediately, she started searching whether there was a request related to Fhuren.

Fhuren was a neutral commercial city. Hajime and his party’s next destination was “Guryuen Great Desert”, where one of the Seven Great Dungeons; “Guryu-en Volcanic Mountain”, resided. Therefore, they must go toward the west of the continent, and on the way was the “Neutral Commercial City Fhuren”, so they wanted to drop by the continent’s number one commercial city. It should be noted that after “Guryu-en Volcanic Mountain”, their next destination was further west of the Great Desert, the Great Dungeon that had sunk into the seabed; “Meljine Seabed Ruin”.

“U~n, oh my. I found something good. A request to escort a merchant company. There’s a vacancy for one person… … How is it? Are you going to accept?”

Hajime confirmed the contents of the commission he received from Catherine. Certainly, the content was a request to escort a merchant company. It was a medium-scale merchant company, and it seemed to request 15 people as the escorts. Because Yue and Shia were not adventurers, it was perfect for Hajime.

“Is it OK to take my companions along?”

“Aa, no problem. Although there would be complaints if there are too many people, but there are people hired to carry the luggage, and there are also adventurers who brought their slaves along. Furthermore, Yue-chan and Shia-chan are also influential people. To have another two excellent adventurers in addition when hiring a person. There’s no reason to refuse.”

“I see, nn~, what should we do?”

Hajime who was a little hesitant, looked back at Yue and Shia to ask for their opinions. Truthfully, he thought of accepting the request if it had something to do with delivering packages. If it had been only Hajime and his party, they could have used the Magic-Driven vehicle and arrived at Fhuren much sooner than if they had to use a carriage. It would be too troublesome to match the pace of the others in an escort mission.

“… … No need to travel in a rush.”

“That’s right~, sometimes it may be good to go with other adventurers. We might be able to learn the know-how from the veteran adventurers, right?”

“… … That’s true. Since we aren’t in a hurry, sometimes it might be good…”

Having heard their opinions, Hajime was, “Fumu”, and told Catherine that he accepted the request. It was just as Yue had said, it would take a lot of time to conquer the Seven Great Dungeons. There’s no telling what kind of mistake they might make if they tried to rush it. That’s why the know-how peculiar to adventurers would likely be useful in their future travels, as Shia had said.

“Here you go. I’ll notify the client, so please go to the front gate tomorrow, first thing in the morning.”

“Roger.”

After she confirmed that Hajime received the application form, Catherine turned her eyes toward Yue and Shia who were behind him.

“You must keep yourself healthy, okay? Whenever this child makes you cry, please come back here. I’ll beat him for you.”

“… … Nn, we are indebted to you. Thanks.”

“Yes, Catherine-san. Thank you very much for taking care of us!”

Catherine’s kind-filled words made Yue and Shia smile. Shia was especially happy. She seemed to have forgotten that she was of the demi-human race, ever since she arrived at this town. Of course, there were different strokes for different blokes. Not all of them were friendly in regards to Shia, but with Catherine at the top, there were Souna, Crystabel, and some people like her fans, who didn’t discriminate against her, even though she was a demi-human. It was not known whether that was because of the locality or the people’s nature or the flow of this town, but for Shia, this was a warm place, almost like her hometown in the Sea of Trees.

“You too, don’t you let these good girls cry, okay? I’ll punish you if you don’t value them as the most important, alright?”

“… … Geez, what a meddlesome person. I’ll do that even without you telling me.”

Hajime replied to Catherine’s words with a wry smile. Catherine held out a letter towards Hajime. With a doubtful expression, Hajime received the letter.

“This is?”

“You’re carrying various problems in your arms after all. It is an apology for all the trouble caused by the people of this town. When you arrive at another town’s guild and get into trouble, show this letter to the person in-charge. It might prove to be useful.”

Catherine perfectly added a wink, and Hajime’s cheeks inadvertently cramped. “For a letter to be able to influence the person in-charge, just who on earth are you?”, his doubt could be seen in his expression.

“Oh my, is there a need to investigate me? A good woman is someone that holds secrets, after all.”

“… … Haa, un’stood. I will gladly take it.”

“It’s good to be obedient! Although a lot of things might happen, please don’t die.”

Catherine was a staff of the guild in a remote countryside town, and held a lot of mysteries. She sent Hajime and his party off with a charming smile that contained attractiveness.

Afterwards, Hajime and his party drew near Crystabel’s place. Although Hajime refused to come along, he could only reluctantly come because of Yue and Shia… … but, the moment it heard that they wanted to leave town, Crystabel became a huge monster, and tried to attack Hajime, since this was her (Crystabel’s) last chance. Hajime, who was so scared, used the oscillation fracture to bury it. Although Yue and Shia were able to desperately stop the traumatic event… … The details will be omitted.

When she heard it was their last night, Souna finally managed to trespass into the bathroom with a dignified demeanor. That action was followed by her charging into their room, then her parents, who were completely angered by her, tied her with genuine tortoise shell bondage all night long. The event where she was hung in front of the inn would be omitted. The reason why her parents knew how to tie the tortoise shell bondage will also be omitted.

The next morning.

With pleasant memories of Brook’s townspeople, Hajime and his party arrived at the front of the gate, moved towards the merchant company’s facilitator and other adventurers who accepted the escort request. Apparently they were the last ones to arrive. When the facilitator-like person and the 14 adventurers looked at the incoming Hajime and his party, they caused a commotion at once.

“O-Oi, don’t tell me the remaining three are the “Sma-Love”!?

“It’s true! Although it makes me happy and frightened at the same time!”

“Look at my hands. They haven’t stopped trembling since a while ago, you know?”

“Wait, isn’t it because you’re drunk?”

There were those who were happy with Yue and Shia’s appearance, some hid their groin with both hands while teary-eyed, and one with trembling hands who got tsukkomi’ed by his companion, various reactions. Hajime approached them with a very displeased expression, then the facilitator-like person called out to him.

“Are you the last escorts?”

“Aa, this is the application.”

Hajime showed the application that he took out of his chest pocket. After confirming it, the male facilitator nodded in consent and began to introduce himself.

“My name is Mottou Junker. I am the leader of this merchant company. Although your rank is still blue, I heard you’re excellent adventurers from Catherine-san. I expect you to escort us along the way.”

“… … Motto(more) Yunker ? … … It must be difficult to be the leader of a merchant company… …”

[T/N: Yunker is a Japanese formulated energy and health supplement.]

It was a name that reminded him of a certain health tonic from Japan, and Hajime’s eyes were filled with sympathy. Mottou, who was unable to understand why Hajime looked at him with such eyes, only inclined his neck and replied with, “Well, it was difficult but I’ve become accustomed to it,” as if he was wryly smiling..

“Well, I won’t betray your expectations. I am Hajime. Here are Yue and Shia.”

“That’s reassuring… … By the way, this person from the Rabbitman tribe… … Won’t you sell her? I can only pay a moderate price though.”

Mottou glanced at Shia while appraising her. She was a beautiful girl of the Rabbitman tribe who wasn’t blue-haired like the normal Rabbitman tribe member, but possessed gray hair instead. As a merchant’s nature, he couldn’t help but lay his hands on such a rare commodity. He judged her as a slave from her collar, then immediately proposed negotiation to Hajime; the owner. Surely he must be an excellent merchant.

Having received the glance, Shia, “Ugh,” groaned unpleasantly and hid behind Hajime. Yue looked at Mottou with a severe look. The popular perception of a Rabbitman tribe outside the Sea of Trees was a slave, that’s why it was natural to offer trade negotiations for such an unusual slave. There was no reason to blame Mottou.

“Hoo, she seems fairly attached… … somehow, she also seems to be cherished. Then, I will give you some discounts, how about it?”

“Well, since you seem to be an excellent merchant… … shouldn’t you already know the answer?”

Although Mottou, who had seen Shia’s appearance, was interested and offered a more appealing proposal, Hajime’s reply was simple. Nevertheless, Mottou felt he should not let go of this chance to negotiate with Hajime, since it will surely bring forth large profit that will only increase thanks to Shia’s charm. That’s why, he tried to give out more bargaining chips to lengthen their conversation.

However, Hajime had read his intentions. Though they were simple words, he voiced them to Mottou with an unwavering will.

“Even if it was god who wanted her, I still wouldn’t let her go… … Won’t you understand with this much?”

“… … … … Ee, I understand. It can’t be helped. I’ll withdraw here. However, if you ever change your mind, by all means please visit my Junker company. Well then, it’s almost time to depart. For the details on escorting, please ask the leader over there.”

Hajime’s words were actually dangerous ones. If it was done unskillfully, his words would have branded him as a heretic by the Church of the Saints. As a side note, the demon race believes in a different god, they worshipped different gods than the strongest god in history; “Ehito”, but they didn’t directly try to fight the Church of the Saints. Since Hajime didn’t drastically alter his words, therefore, Mottou understood that Hajime, from the bottom of his heart, refused to let Shia go.

Hajime watched as Mottou dejectedly returned to his merchant company, then he noticed the surroundings become noisy again.

“Wow… … For the sake of a woman, to even say that much… … It numbed me!”

“As expected of Duel Smasher. He won’t forgive anyone who puts their hands on his woman… … fuh, what a man.”

“That’s nice~, I also wanted someone to say something like that to me at least once.”

“Wait, you, aren’t you a man? Who would, say someth—, sorry, I am sorry, so sto— Ah——!!”

Having heard the happy conversations of his amused escort companions, Hajime could only hold his head in his hands due to the headache. All of the fellows from Brook town were idiots as expected. While he thought that, ‘Munyuu’, he could feel something soft on his back, furthermore Hajime was embraced closely by the arms that came from behind him.

Hajime turned his head over his shoulder, and saw a close-up of Shia’s face as she rested her chin on his shoulder. Her face completely dyed red, and because she was truly happy, her expression loosened.

“… … Listen, there was no special meaning to it, so don’t misunderstand, okay?”

“Ufufufu, I know~, ufufufu~”

Although Hajime explained that, in the end it was akin to not abandoning a relative, and not because “she is his woman”, like the surrounding people noisily described. His explanation was not transmitted to Shia. It was because the man she fell for had declared that “Even if it’s god, I won’t let her go.” No matter what his real intentions were by declaring that, a pleasant thing is pleasant.

Even though those words were to quickly break off the negotiation, in a lot of ways it was “overkill,” and Hajime could only feel regret. Yue tokotoko, went to Hajime’s side, then kuikui, she pulled Hajime’s sleeve.

“? What is it, Yue?”

“Nn… … Don’t worry about it, because that was cool.”

“… … Thanks for the consolation.”

Having sympathized with Hajime’s feelings, Yue tried to comfort him, and Hajime gently stroked her cheeks while letting out words of gratitude. Yue closed her eyes as if she was pleased by it.

In front of the front gate early in the morning, inside a crowd of people, with a beautiful rabbit-eared girl that looked so happy attached to his back, and another beautiful blonde girl with crimson eyes in his right hand, was Nagumo Hajime.

The ladies of the merchant company looked at them with lukewarm expressions, while the men looked at the spectacle with dead-fish eyes. Toward these annoying gazes and words that pierced Hajime, surely he just reaped what he had sown.

Volume 6 Chapter 2


Using carriages, the distance between Brook Town and the Neutral Commercial City; Fhuren, was six days of travel.

They moved before sunrise and prepared to camp before sunset. This has already repeated for three days. Hajime and his party were three days away from Fhuren. Only half the travel distance remained. So far no incidents had occurred during their journey. Even though Hajime and his party were in charge of the rear, it was truly peaceful.

Even today, nothing special happened as they prepared to camp. Regarding meals, the adventurers were eating by themselves. They had to eat while minding their surroundings, that’s why, as escorts they couldn’t settle down when eating together. It also seemed to be the rule to eat on their own. Additionally, when on a mission, the adventurers only eat cruel, simple meals. In a way, preparing tasty meals would only increase their luggage, and would disturb them in emergency situations. Because of that, it became a theory that after they’ve arrived at a town they would eat tasty meals until their stomachs were full, as their reward.

That story was something Hajime and his party heard from the adventurers when they ate meals on the second day. Hajime and his party had prepared warm bread soaked in luxurious mock stew to eat.

“Gah—, good! It is truly delicious~, just as expected of Shia-chan! Mou, I don’t care if you’re a demi-human anymore, so will you be my wife?”

“Gluck gluck, gulp, puhah, bastard, don’t just run your mouth! Shia-chan is my wife!”

“Hah, just what is a small dirty pig-like man like you trying to say? Know your place. By the way Shia-chan, how about a meal with me after we arrive at the town? Of course, it’ll be my treat.”

“Th-Then, I’ll take Yue-chan! Yue-chan, have a meal with me!”

“Yue-chan’s spoon… … Haa, haa.”

The adventurers kept eating the mock stew made by Shia, saying it was delicious. On the first day, these guys were eating dried meat with things similar to camping goods when, Hajime and his party started to cook next to them, using ingredients and tableware taken out from “Treasure Box”, just as usual. The adventurers were attracted by the delicious drifting aromas. Looking around, they saw Hajime and his party eating the hot meal while blowing on it, nearby. It became a situation where all of the other adventurers stared at them with blood-shot eyes and drooling mouths. Shia who felt that they were truly pitiful proposed to share their meals, resulting in the current situation.

In the beginning, even in front of these starving dogs, Hajime continued to calmly eat his meal. Naturally, he didn’t intend to share at all. However, because Shia took over the job of preparing the meals when they camp, he had to rely on her to make delicious meals. It was not like Hajime and Yue were incapable of cooking anything, but the taste would be flat. Hajime was only capable of making manly dishes while Yue was inexperienced, being a former noble. That’s why, it was not an easy thing for Hajime to refuse Shia’s, who was able to cook delicious meals, proposal to share.

From then on, although at first the adventurers that crowded like hyena during meals were grateful, they started to get carried away and jokingly tried to persuade Shia and Yue.

Toward the adventurers who made such a ruckus, Hajime silently used “Pressure”. Although their bodies should have been warmed up by the hot mock stew, the adventurers immediately felt the chill and could only stand still with pale expressions. Hajime swallowed the meat inside his mouth and glanced at the mock stew while slowly letting out a whisper. Even so his voice could be clearly heard by everyone.

“So? Having filled your belly, who’s the guy that wants to be thrown?”

“””””I am sorry for getting carried away.”””””

The adventurers apologized while prostrating in splendid harmony and synchronization. Although these guys were senior and veteran adventurers compared to Hajime, they had no dignity at all. Even though there was also the “Pressure” that Hajime used, it wasn’t like they would go against Hajime, because they knew what happened in Brook town.

“Mou, Hajime-san. Since it’s finally time for a meal, a little ruckus is fine. A-Also, no matter what they say, I-I am Hajime-san’s, you know?”

“I never cared about that.”

“Hau!?”

Although Shia tried to casually appeal to Hajime while feeling shy, Hajime cut off her words with a single phrase.

“… … Hajime.”

“Nn?… … What is it, Yue?”

Because of Yue’s criticizing glance, Hajime flinched a little. Yue pointed her forefinger and said, “… … bad!”. In short, it was about his promise from before to be nicer to Shia. Hajime, who didn’t harbor love for Shia even now, thought it was enough to treat her as a relative… … however it seemed that was an out for Yue.

“Hajime-san! If you keep that attitude, I won’t give you the “well-done” skewered meat!”

Following that, recently Shia was not as easily discouraged. She didn’t even twitch at Hajime’s tsun-remark. Even if she received the shock, she immediately revived and repeated her strong and positive approach.

“… … Like I said, how did you know that mate-… … no, it’s nothing. I understand, so quickly hand over the meat.”

“Fufu, do you want to eat it? Th-Then, a~n”

“… …”

While blushing, Shia presented the well-done skewered meat in front of Hajime’s mouth. He seemed to really want to eat it. That’s why Hajime took a peek at Yue. Yue readily stood by his side with skewered meat at hand. Probably, she would follow after Shia’s “A~n”.

While feeling the adventurers’ gazes, Hajime let out a sigh then opened his mouth toward Shia. Shia’s expression was dyed in happiness.

“A~n.”

“… …”

Hajime bit then chewed the presented meat in silence. Shia’s expression was in pure bliss while she looked at Hajime. Then, this time another skewered meat was presented from his other side.

“… … A~n.”

“… …”

He once again took a bite. Silently chewed it. Again, he took a bite when Shia from his other side, “A~n”. He bit again when Yue said “A~n”.

Their subjectivity aside, the voices of the men’s hearts who had objectively seen this spectacle were splendidly unified. In their minds, “We beseech you, please just explode already!!”. They could only use formal words in their minds because they were clearly shown that they couldn’t do anything in face of Hajime’s power .

Two days had passed since then. The distance was only one more day of travel, finally someone appeared to inelegantly obstruct their travel and to assault them.

Shia was the first to notice it. Her rabbit ears, piko piko, moved while pointing toward the forest beside the highway, her unconcerned expression suddenly tightened and she warned the others.

“Incoming enemies! They number more than 100! They’ll come from the forest!”

When they heard her warning, the tension between the adventurers immediately increased. The highway that they were currently advanced on was not known for the danger from the adjacent forest. After all, it was the only route to the one Neutral Commercial City in the continent. The highway was safe, was what was guaranteed. That’s why, although there were stories of encountering demonic beasts, they were only 20, at most. Even if there were a lot of them, 40 was the limit.

“Shit, more than 100 you say? Recently, I haven’t heard stories of assault. are they saving up their power for this time’s sake? Damn, even though I had investigated about accidents along the highway!”

The leader of the escorts, Galitima, was cursing with a bitter expression. The escorts of the merchant company numbered 15. If Yue and Shia were included, they became 17 people. Considering the number of people, it’d be difficult to flawlessly defend the merchant company. It was simply because they were overwhelmed in number.

By the way, for them to calculate Shia as a combat potential despite knowing the Rabbitman tribe’s gentle nature was because there was a time when Shia lost her temper by the extreme actions of the “We want to be Shia-chan’s slaves corps”. She blew off those perverts at once, that became well-known to adventurers and made them awe.

The moment Galitima started thinking of letting the majority of the escorts stay and at least making the merchant company escape, a proposal’s voice rang out and interrupted his thinking.

“If you’re perplexed, should we kill them?”

“Eh?”

It was said with a light-hearted tone, as if he was just going to go for a little shopping. The unbelievable proposal came from none other than Hajime. Galitima was able to grasp the significance of Hajime’s proposal, then spontaneously asked back with a stupid voice.

“Like I said, shall we annihilate them?”

“W-Well, that’s certainly, because it’ll be difficult to flawlessly defend the merchant company if this keeps up… … umm, can you do it? Although there are no strong demonic beasts around here, their numbers are…”

“There is no problem with the numbers. It’ll end soon. With Yue, that is.”

Hajime said that and immediately put his hand on Yue’s shoulder who moved beside him. Yue looked particularly eager, and as if it would be very easy work for her, she replied with “Nn…”.

Galitima hesitated a little. At least he had heard the rumors that Yue was a user of rare magic. For argument’s sake, even if she couldn’t completely annihilate them, from the attitude of Hajime and his party they should be able to cut down a reasonable number. That’s why, rather than letting the merchant company escape ahead using their various combat potential, he steadily thought of another strategy.

“I understand. I’ll entrust the first strike to Yue. Even if you can’t completely annihilate them, it’ll be no problem as long as their numbers considerably decrease. Then, we only need to decrease them further with our magic, and beat the last of them directly. Everyone, you understand!?”

“”””Affirmative!””””

The other adventurers replied to Galitima’s decision with voices filled with spirit. Apparently, it seemed they couldn’t believe Yue was able to annihilate them alone. Hajime thought in his mind, “There is no need to worry that much~”, but because it was not common sense for magic-users to be capable of annihilating more than a hundred of demonic beasts, he felt their judgement couldn’t be helped as he shrugged his shoulders.

The adventurers took a united line in front of the merchant company. Although tension hung in the air, their faces were resolute. There was no remaining joking atmosphere, like the one during meal time. On the way, even though they had heard various stories from the veteran adventurers, only by seeing their current appearance, indeed, they were able to nod and acknowledge them as veterans. The people of the merchant company were frightened when they heard the large number of demonic beasts, now their faces peeped in from the shadows of the carriages.

Hajime and his party were on the roof of the merchant company’s carriage.

“Yue, for now, start chanting. If not, it’ll become troublesome.”

“… … Chant… … chant… …?”

“… … Did you not know any?”

“… … Don’t worry, there’s no problem.”

“Well, that material… … It’s nothing.”

“Contact in 10 seconds~”

Because it’d be troublesome if others inquired about it, Hajime told Yue to use chants, but Yue who originally had no need to chant was only able to float “?” above her head. Even so, it would be good as long as she made them assume she was chanting by whispering, although there shouldn’t be any big problems, her reply somehow made Hajime anxious.

While he thought of that, Shia’s report rang out. Yue, suh, turned and hung her right hand toward the forest, then her chanting voice began to permeate.

“You are the one who brought bright red light into this perpetual darkness, crush the prison of old, the one who met face on as an equal, using the power of the strongest fragment, together with him, become the light capable of swallowing heaven, “Thunder Dragon””

With the end of Yue’s chant, she pulled the magic’s trigger. At that moment, a dragon made of thunder appeared from the dark cloud just like in her chant. Its appearance was reminiscent of a snake just like an oriental dragon.

“Wh-What’s that…”

It wasn’t known who muttered that. Even with the crowd of demonic beasts in front of their eyes, everyone’s gazes were fixated at the sky towards the bizarre thunder dragon that let out blue electrical discharge. Even those who were well-versed in magic in the rear, could only open and close their mouths towards the magic they’ve never seen nor heard before.

Then, as if it was no one’s ally. The demonic beasts that had come with killing intent for their prey from the forest, came to a halt between the merchant company and the forest, having been glared at by the huge thunder dragon, it was as if they were frogs that were stiffened by a snake’s glare.

Following that, as if it was heaven’s judgement, Yue flicked her slender and beautiful fingers, causing the thunder dragon opened its jaws that were even able to swallow heaven and attacked the demonic beasts.

GOoGAaAAA!!!

“Uwah!?”

“Dowaaa!?”

“Kyaaaaa!?”

The thunder dragon let out a tremendous roar from its huge opened mouth, and some demonic beasts were voluntarily jumping into the opened jaws. Then, they were eliminated by the jaws of thunder and disappeared without any resistance.

Furthermore, as Yue commanded, the thunder dragon coiled around the demonic beasts to encircle them. The demonic beasts that were in the middle of escaping penetrated that wall of thunder and turned into dust before their eyes. Once again, above the demonic beasts that had lost their escape route, the thunder dragon opened its jaws with a thundering roar, and the demonic beasts jumped into it as if they chose to die. Without any time to suffer the pain, their flesh turning into dust coupled with the majestic appearance of the dragon gave off a solemn atmosphere. Having swallowed all of the demonic beasts, the thunder dragon let out a thundering roar for the last time then disappeared.

Every one of the adventurers that were in formation and the merchant company, because of the flashes along with thundering sounds, and followed by a severe earthquake were inadvertently screaming and crouching. Finally, the fear of a life-threatening attack and the impact left them, and when they opened their eyes slightly to see what happened ahead… … there was nothing at all. There was only the ground, scorched in a coil-shape, it was proof that the unreal spectacle just now had truly occurred.

“… … Nn, I overdid it”

“Oioi, that magic, even I know nothing about it…”

“It is a Yue-san original, right? It seems to be a combination of magic that’s used in the stories of dragons from Hajime-san as a reference.”

“To have made something like this when I shut myself inside the guild… … Rather, Yue, the chant just now…”

“Nn… … A song of meeting and the future.”

Yue looked at Hajime with expressionlessness that gave off an, “How about that!”, atmosphere. She was probably proud of it because it was something she made herself. Hajime quietly used his hand to stroke Yue’s hair gently while letting out a wry smile. Having allowed her to finish the chant to avoid trouble, although it was completely meaningless, his caution disappeared once he saw Yue boasting about herself.

That was Yue’s original magic; “Thunder Dragon”. It’s a compound magic using the high-ranked magic; “Thunder Hammer” that creates a dark cloud then drops a huge amount of lightning, and Gravity magic. The lightning that originally just falls down was arbitrarily controlled using Gravity magic. To purposely make it form like a dragon from Hajime’s story was something made by magic using Yue’s sense. This thunder dragon was filled with gravity magic in the mouth’s parts, that’s why objects would be pulled toward it when its jaws were opened. This is why the demonic beasts looked like they voluntarily jumped toward it. Comparing its magic power, it was at the highest level even among high-ranked magic, that’s why just by looking at Yue’s expression one could see that was the gem of her pride.

And, the adventurers who looked dumbfoundedly at the scorched ground began to regain their senses. Following that, they vigorously turned around to look at Hajime and his party, then started to make a commotion.

“Oioioioioi, what was that? What was, THAT!”

“A-A strange beast was… … from the sky… … from the sky… … ah, it’s a dream.”

“Hehe, I, once we arrive at the town, I am going to marry.”

“I know how shaken you’re, but calm down. Remember that you don’t have a lover, not even a girlfriend.”

“It can be made by magic! It’s not even strange to make a strange beast like that! That’s why I am not wrong!”

“Well, there is no magic related with the life and death cycle, you know? That’s why this situation is abnormal, okay?”

“What!? Bastard, are you saying Yue-chan is abnormal!? Aan!?”

“Everyone, calm down! Listen, Yue-chan is a goddess, that’ll explain everything!”

“”””Indeed!””””

Maybe because Yue’s magic left too much of an impact, the adventurers became a little broken. That couldn’t be helped. After all, there was no existing magic that could take the shape of living things. Furthermore, that was even impossible to be used by the magic-users that were employed by the country. It could be said the thunder dropping magic; “Thunder Hammer”, was only usable by ultra first-class magic-users.

Inside the broken adventurers that shouted, “All hail Yue-sama!”, something along that line was the sole sane person; the leader Galitima, who could only sigh after looking at his comrades and approached Hajime and his party.

“Haa, first of all, thanks. Thanks to Yue-chan, we were able to get through with zero damage.”

“We are co-workers now. There’s no need to thank us. Right?”

“… … Nn, I am only doing my job.”

“Haha, I see… … so, that is. What was that just now?”

Galitima asked without being able to hide his bewilderment.

“… … Original.”

“O-Original? Do you mean a magic you created yourself? High-ranked magic, no, is that a highest-ranked magic?”

“… … I didn’t create it. It is a compound magic.”

“Compound magic? But, what on earth combines to make that…”

“… … That’s a secret”

“Kh… … That’s, well, it should be. No adventurers will simply reveal their trump card after all…”

Accompanied with a profound sigh, Galitima gave up the pursuit. He seemed to be sensitive to the tacit rule of veteran adventurers. While he shrugged his shoulders, he turned his attention to the broken comrades. “They would give birth to a new religion called the “Yue faith” if this keeps up, that’s why Galitima must work hard”, that’s what Hajime thought as a man.

While receiving gazes from everyone in the merchant company that were mixed with awe and respect, their group resumed their travels.

* * *

Since the time Yue removed the guts of every merchant company’s people and adventurers, she didn’t have anything to do at all, and their group finally arrived at the Neutral Commercial City; Fhuren.

There were six reception desks in Fhuren’s eastern gate, the goods that were brought would be checked there. Hajime and his party were queueing in one of the rows. It would take a while until their turn.

On the carriage’s roof, Mottou approached as Hajime laid down and rest his head on Yue’s lap pillow, while being attended by Shia. It seemed there was something he wanted to say. Mottou looked toward Hajime with a somewhat amazed look, then Hajime lightly nodded and jumped down from the roof.

“Geez, you’re so bold. Don’t you notice the surroundings’ eyes?”

Just as Mottou said, the surrounding eyes were the usual and familiar eyes that contained jealousy and envy toward Hajime, followed by eyes that are filled with wonder and hate toward Yue and Shia. In addition, currently the gazes that appraised Shia were increasing. As expected of a big city’s entrance gate. In the place where various men gathered, there were not only those who simply looked at Yue and Shia with dirty-minds but also those who looked at them as profit.

“Well, although they’re annoying, I can’t do anything about it. So, it’s useless to worry about it”

Hajime said that while shrugging his shoulders and Mottou could only put on a wry smile.

“There’ll be more trouble once you enter Fhuren. As expected, to sell her…”

Although Mottou tried to casually offer a trade for Shia, “Didn’t that conversation already end?”, was what was expressed by Hajime’s silence, and he could only raise a hand as a pose for giving up.

“You aren’t calling me for such talk, right? What business do you want?”

“Well, it is something like that. I’m offering a trade negotiation. It is about the artifacts that you carry. Will you sell those? When we arrive at my company, under the notary witness, I’ll pay the amount that can make someone live his whole life without working. Your artifacts, especially “Treasure Box” are something that merchants will desperately try to obtain after all.”

Along with the word “desperately,” Mottou’s unsmiling eyes were perfectly expressing “even if I have to kill.” It was because “Treasure Box” would be able to solve the problem of cheaply and securely mass transportation goods, that always became a concern in merchants’ heads. That’s why it was understandable.

When he saw various things taken out from the “Treasure Box” while camping, Mottou’s expression was as if someone who had wandered around for tens of days in the desert finally found an oasis while on the verge of dying. Because he persistently tried to negotiate, Hajime gave out slight bloodthirst and maybe because of his intuition as a merchant told him a warning, he withdrew dejectedly.

However, he was unable to give up after all. In front of Donner-Schlag, he was somehow able to approach Hajime and proposed another negotiation.

“I’ll say it again and again, I won’t sell any of it. Just give up.”

“But, those artifacts are too useful for an individual to carry. Isn’t it more reasonable for them to be used by someone who knows their value? If not, it’ll be much more troublesome… … for example, those girls wil—!?”

Mottou, for a little, took a peek toward Shia and Yue on the roof with a mad and threatening look and at that moment, gochih, something cold and hard was pressed on his forehead. That was accompanied with a sublime bloodthirst. No one in their surroundings noticed it. One of the reasons was because they were in the shadow of the carriage and also because Hajime had pinpointed his bloodthirst toward him.

“That, can I think of that as a declaration of war?”

That was said in a quiet voice. However, that voice that was as cold as ice made Mottou stiffen and the eyes of Hajime that peered into his eyes were just like thick darkness. Mottou’s whole body was drenched in cold sweat and he desperately let out his voice.

“Th-that’s wrong. Somehow… … because, guh… … I wouldn’t… … be able to hide about you… … that’s why, I said those… … words. That was all… … uh”

Just as Mottou said, Hajime didn’t intend to seriously hide his artifacts and their ability. Because he had considered it a little to avoid troublesome things, there was the case of Yue’s chant, but if it was reversed, if it was more than “a little,” he didn’t intend to hide it. Hajime had decided “to not hold back” against this world. He would mow all of his enemies down. He had the resolution to do that.

“I see, let’s just leave it at that.”

Having said that, Hajime put away Donner and dispersed his bloodthirst. Mottou crumbled on the spot. While drenched in sweat, he panted.

“Well, it’s up to you on what you want to do. For example, even if you spread that to others, and those people took action, then I wouldn’t care about it. However, if you became an enemy that tried to obstruct me… … Do you think you can survive? I don’t care if it involves the country or even the world. I’ll just sink everything into a sea of blood.”

“… … Haa haa, indeed. It will be an unprofitable business…”

Although he was still pale-faced, Mottou who was capable of firmly replying, was an excellent merchant. Even from the interactions with the other merchant company members, he seemed to be quite adored. Normally, it would be impossible for him to take such a firm posture even now. The things that charmed and drove him mad were Hajime’s artifacts.

“Well, this time I’ll overlook it. But, there won’t be a next time, okay?”

“… … For the love of god. It is me who has become senile. For me to kick the butt of a dragon in front of my eyes…”

“Kick the butt of a dragon” is a proverb of this world, it referred to the Ryuujin race and dragons. They boasted their defensive power as an impregnable defense because of their whole body covered by scales, excluding their eyes and mouth, the butt hole that wasn’t covered by scales was their only weak point. Because of their high defense, as they were deep-sleepers, they wouldn’t awaken once they fell asleep, but they would wake up at once, once their butt that was their weak point received stimulus, and became enraged like raging fires. A long time ago, it was not known why that was done, but the fool was completely crushed. From that, it became the meaning of someone who is foolish enough to purposely disturb someone that was harmless as long as they weren’t disturbed.

By the way, the Ryuujin race was assumed to have perished more than 500 years ago. Although the reason was uncertain, these guys own a characteristic magic called “Dragon Form” that made them between the boundary of a person and demonic beast, there are various opinions such as they were turned into exclusion because of discrimination and they were weeded out by the gods as an incomplete race.

“Now that you mention it, Yue’s magic from back then was imitating the dragon. Although I will apologize if that was truly a dragon, but it’s good that no one knows anything about it. After all I also never heard anything about the Ryuujin race. Well, I think it’ll be okay because it looks more like a snake than a dragon.”

Mottou who somehow recovered, managed to stand up and he advised Hajime while tidying his clothes. He was a somewhat bold person. Although he was going to be killed just now, to be able to casually talk to Hajime meant his nerve wasn’t average.

“Is that so?”

“Ee, they are incomplete beings between people and demonic beasts. Nevertheless, they are frighteningly strong. In addition, they are infidels who don’t believe in any gods. That’s why, I can only nod that they are an odd existence for the church’s authoritarian.”

“I see. Rather, you’re completely okay with it. Are you also one of those infidels?”

“I have a god I believe in, the one where the power is not held by “people”. People are “customers” after all.”

“… … Somehow, I can relate with what you just said. Must be a born merchant, you that is. Having seen it, I can only nod at your recklessness.”

Having said that, towards Hajime that fiddled with the ring on his hand, Mottou showed a mixed expression of apology and pride, truly a complex expression. His merchant-like attitude from just now could no longer be seen. Hajime’s bloodthirst was like having bathed in cold water for him.

“Although I have committed a blunder, if you have a demand, please come to my company. You’re different from the usual adventurers after all. Because I want connections with such a peculiar person like you, I’ll give you some discount.”

“… … Really, what a firm business spirit.”

While being looked at by Hajime with an amazed glance, after saying, “Well then, please excuse me”, Mottou turned his heels and returned to the front.

Yue and Shia, even now, no, gathered even stronger gazes. If you chased Mottou’s back, immediately there were merchant-like people who were talking while pointing at Yue and Shia. Although it was supposed to be a relaxing trip toward Fhuren, Hajime could only think that more troubles were waiting ahead.

Volume 6 Chapter 3


Neutral Commercial City Fhuren

20 meters in height, the wall enclosed one of the continent’s Neutral Commercial Cities with a length of 200 kilometers. All kinds of businesses and keen competitions happened in this city every day, there were people who successfully realized their dreams, and there were also a lot of people who became penniless and left dejectedly. It could be said it was the number one city in the continent with the amount of people that came to sightsee, and those who came for business.

Because it was so huge, Fhuren was divided into four areas. The Central Ward where the facilities related to various procedures in the city gathered, Sightseeing Ward where amusement facilities were concentrated, Craftsman Ward where weapons and armor, also various furnitures were sold directly, and Commercial Ward where all kinds of stores and businesses lined up. There was a main street that stretched to the east, west, south, and north from the Central Ward, it seemed to be common sense to have numerous stores the closer ones to the middle part. The places that were far from the main street and central ward were places for black dealings, in other words, there were a lot of black market-like shops. In those areas, sometimes there were unexpected things appearing, and those who were accustomed to rough stuff like adventurers and mercenaries visit this place.

That story was something Hajime and his party heard while they were eating light meals in the cafe inside the adventurer’s guild : Fhuren’s branch. The one who told them was a woman whose job was a guide. Because this city was huge, there was a lot of demand for guides, so it became a special occupation with a social standing. Although there were a lot of guide stores, they all got high ratings because they improved their services to gain more customers every day.

Hajime and his party came to the adventurer’s guild with the application form that had received the seal of proof after separating from Mottou’s merchant company. Following that, because they didn’t know the location of the inns and shops, they tried to get the guidebook from the adventurer’s guild, that’s how they came to know about the guide’s existence.

Currently, after they paid the woman guide who introduced herself as Rishee, they were hearing the basic information of this city while having light meals.

“That’s why, it is recommended to search for an inn in Sightseeing Ward. Although there are inns in Central Ward, it has become a tendency for the workers to nap there, that’s why there are less services compared to Sightseeing ward.”

“I see, then we will obediently look for an inn in Sightseeing Ward. Where’s the recommendation?”

“It depends on what Mr. Customer demands. There are various kinds of inns, after all.”

“That’s true. Okay, I won’t complain as long as the meals are delicious and they have a bath. There is no need to consider the location. Also, a place with a clear accountability should be good.”

Rishee heard Hajime’s requests with a smile. Toward the first two requests she nodded with “Un un”, she seemed to have immediately listed all of the recommended inns inside of her mind. However, towards Hajime’s next words, she could only let out “Nn?”, while inclining her neck.

“Umm~, an accountable place?”

“Aa, for example, assume I was pulled into a fight where I was the obvious victim, so I don’t want to take responsibility of the damage inside the inn. I want to stay at a good inn, and I have a lot of equipment, so it’ll be a hassle to compensate that.”

“Uu~m, I think you won’t be involved that often, but…”

Hajime could only smile wryly toward the perplexed Rishee.

“Well, if it were ordinary people it’ll be like that, but we stand out, after all. It seems a lot of loose guys will be at Sightseeing Ward, and merchants with firm spirits that will force their ways will likely appear. Well, in the end it’s only “if possible”. If that’s too hard then there’s no need to consider it.”

Because of Hajime’s words, Rishee looked at Yue and Shia who sat at Hajime’s sides while focusing on eating their light meals. Then, she nodded in consent. Certainly, these two beautiful girls stood out. Even now, they gathered considerable gazes from the surroundings. Especially Shia who came from the Rabbitman tribe. Although it’s a crime to put a hand on other’s slaves, it couldn’t be said there would be no merchants that tried to persistently negotiate nor loose and reckless guys.

“Then, how about an inn with strict guards? There are lots of inns like that, and I can introduce you to a good one…”

“Aa, that’s okay. However, the guys that are blinded by desires will sometimes appear. So, it should be considered first that I am going to physically persuade them because guards are not absolute.”

“Ph-Physical persuasion… … I see, that’s why you asked for accountability.”

Rishee completely understood Hajime’s intent, so the words “if possible” Hajime said seemed to hurt her soul as a guide, then she accepted his requests and said, “Please leave it to me”, with a motivated expression. Following that, she turned her gaze toward Yue and Shia, then asked for their demands. It was a point where she tried to answer every customers’ needs as much as possible, surely this came from the guide store she belongs to.

“… … A big bath is good, however for a mixed bath, reservations are essential.”

“Umm, I want one with a huge bed.”

After thinking for a sec, Yue and Shia said each of their requests. Even though they were called requests, if Yue’s term was combined with Shia’s, she could see clearly their intentions. Having guessed that, Rishee said “I accept it, so please leave it to me”, with an acknowledging and clarifying face, but her cheeks slightly reddened. Immediately, she alternated her glances between Hajime, Yue, and Shia and that resulted in her cheeks blushing further.

By the way, the men who hung around in the nearby tables were staring at Hajime as if saying “If only a person can be killed by a stare!”, but because he was already accustomed to it, Hajime just let it go through his head as usual.

From there, they heard the stories of the other wards, then Hajime and his party felt an unexpected strong gaze. It was especially aimed at Shia and Yue, it was the rudest of all, a sticky gaze that stuck to them. Because it was too late for Yue and Shia to mind that gaze, they could only knit their eyebrows because of the unpleasant stare.

Hajime tried to take a peek toward the source of the gaze and… … there was a pig. With a fat body that easily surpassed 100 kilograms, an oily face, along with a pig snout and sticky blond-hair attached on its head. If it were only its appearance, it could be seen wearing good clothing even from a distance. That pigman was the one who stared at Yue and Shia with eyes completely mudded with desire.

While Hajime thought, “It’ll be a hassle”, the pigman moved his body heavily and while shaking he quickly approached Hajime and his party. Apparently, there was no time for them to escape. Hajime never thought of running away, though.

Maybe because Rishee also noticed his unrest, or maybe because that pigman stood out, when the pigman arrived with an arrogant attitude, she forgot to smile and “Geh!”, raised an indescribable voice in bad taste.

The pigman soon arrived at the side of the table Hajime and his party were, then looked at Yue and Shia with a smile in his eyes, and when he saw Shia’s collar he narrowed his eyes unpleasantly. Following that, he finally looked at Hajime, who he never looked at until now, and as if he finally noticed him, he showed a gesture and let out a one-sided demand with an arrogant attitude.

“O-Oi, brat. I-I’ll give you a million ruta. H-Hand over that rabbit. That blonde too, I’ll make her my concubine. C-Come with me.”

Having said those words while slightly stuttering and coupled with kii kii sounds, the pigman tried to touch Yue. It seemed Yue was already his inside his mind. At that moment, a violent killing intent poured down. The faces of people in the surrounding tables turned pale as they fell from their chairs, and they began to desperately back away from Hajime.

Well, the pigman who received the killing intent directly was… … “Hii!?”, let out a pathetic scream and fell on his butt, then he retreated while the place between his groins began to wet.

If Hajime let out his true killing intent, he might instantly lose consciousness, and because that’d be meaningless he put enough consideration into it.

“Yue, Shia, let’s go. Let’s change the location.”

Because a dirty liquid leaked, Hajime stood from his seat then called Yue and Shia. Honestly, he actually wanted to immediately shoot him dead, but it’d raise a commotion if he killed him after all, and that’d make Hajime the assailant. The town’s guards were not that naive to let go of a murder. Basically, as long as it’s at the limit of a legitimate self-defense, Hajime thought of just half-killing him inside this city.

Rishee could only say, “Eh? Eh?”, while blinking her eyes in confusion because Hajime and his party stood up from their seats. Rishee was fine even though she was inside the range of Hajime’s killing intent because he had simply excluded her from “Pressure’s” targets. It was the reverse version of the pinpointed “Pressure” that he had used on Mottou to not let anyone notice him. It was the result of his training. It was natural for Rishee to be confused, that’s because when she thought the pigman was being selfish, he suddenly fell on his bottom and began to leak from in between his groins.

By the way, the “Pressure” that affected the surroundings was done on purpose. His reason was to make the surrounding guys who gave him depressing looks comprehend him. “Don’t try to touch them, okay?”, something like that. Judging from the surrounding guys’ pale expressions, it seemed there was no need to give out more warnings.

But, immediately after he dispersed the “Pressure” and tried to leave the guild, a big man came to block Hajime and his party’s route and stood like a Niou statue. He had a huge body with around 100 kilograms of weight in different ways than the pigman. His whole body was full of muscle with a longsword hanging on his waist, his appearance was like an experienced soldier’s.

Maybe because he saw that huge figure, the pigman once again let out a shout coupled with kii kiisounds.

“Th-That’s right, Leganid! Kill that shitty brat! H-He tried to kill me! Kill him slowly!”

“Young master, to kill him will be troublesome. Let’s just half-kill him.”

“Do it! I-I don’t care, just do it! B-But, don’t hurt the girls! Th-They’re mine!”

“Roger. So, please splurge on my reward.”

“I-I’ll give you any number you want! Just do it already!”

Apparently, the giant called Leganid was hired by the pigman as his bodyguard. He was talking to the pigman without looking away from Hajime, then he floated a satisfied smile when he heard about the promised reward. He thought nothing of Yue and Shia which was unusual. He didn’t look at them and only grinned at the word reward.

“Ou, boy. Sorry. I’ll half-kill you for the sake of my money. What, it’s not like I’ll kill you. Well, about those little misses… … just give up on them.”

Having said that, Leganid prepared his fists. He didn’t use the longsword because this was indeed a place where it shouldn’t be used. A commotion appeared in the surroundings when they heard Leganid’s name.

“O-Oi, by Leganid, you mean that “Black” Leganid?”

“”Black Wind” Leganid!? Just why did he become such a fellow’s bodyguard…”

“Isn’t it for money? He is “Money Lover” Leganid, you know?”

Hajime was able to guess the identity of the huge man in front of him from the surrounding whispers. Although his class was not known, he was a “Black”-ranked adventurer, the third rank from above, so he was quite the big-wheel.

Fighting spirit emitted from Leganid. Hajime thought it wouldn’t be a problem to half-kill him because it was legitimate self-defense, and the moment he began to swing his fist, a voice came to restrain him from an unusual spot.

“… … Hajime, wait.” ” ? What is it, Yue?”

Before she answered Hajime’s question, Yue, while dragging the nearby Shia, came between Hajime and Leganid. While Hajime and Leganid were dumbfounded by it, Yue replied as she looked ahead.

“… … Let us take care of him” “Eh? Yue-san, am I included?”

Yue ignored Shia’s question. Having heard Yue’s words, before Hajime could reply, Leganid bursted into laughter.

“Gah hahahaha, are you little misses my opponent? That’s quite laughable. What? I’ll forgive you if you become my opponent at nig- “… … Shut up, thrash” kh!?”

Before Leganid could finish his indecent words, Yue cut his words and quickly use wind blade to attack and cut his cheek. Pusyu, a small sound was made, his blood came and dripped as is. It seemed to be a fairly deep cut. Leganid fell silent just as Yue commanded. Because Yue’s magic was too fast, he completely couldn’t react to it. In his mind, “Just when did she chant? Where is the magic circle?”, as he desperately tried to analyze her while letting out cold sweat.

Hajime who didn’t know what Yue meant was currently looking at Shia who also didn’t understand Yue’s intention and the talk continued.

“… … We’ll show them that we’re not princesses that can only be protected.”

“Aa, I see. We are showing them we can make a painful retaliation.”

“… … That’s right. Because we finally came here, I’ll use that.”

Having said that, Yue looked at Leganid with a more severe gaze and pointed at him.

“Well, I understand what you are trying to say. Certainly, if the princesses that they got are in truth fierce beasts, that should wake them up. Fortunately, there are a lot of witnesses… … Unn, isn’t that good?”

“… … Fierce beasts is too cruel.”

Hajime agreed with Yue’s words and backed away with a wry smile. After Yue confirmed that Hajime had backed away, she sent an eye signal to Shia at her side. Having read the signal, Shia reached for Doryukken that was hung on her back, then as if not feeling the weight, she rotated it once in her hand.

“Oioi, just what can the miss from the Rabbitman tribe do? Because there is my employer’s request, will you just keep quiet?”

Without looking away from Yue, Leganid said that to Shia. However, Shia ignored Leganid’s words and advised him back.

“The longsword on your waist. Shouldn’t you draw it? Although I’m going to take it easy, won’t it be dangerous to be bare-handed?”

“Hah, big words from Usagi-chan. Young master! Sorry, but forgive me for one or two scratches!”

Leganid didn’t pay much attention to Shia and focused on Yue, while the pigman who was still nearby didn’t give out any objections. Surely, he must’ve judged it’d be difficult to subdue Yue without hurting her. However, Leganid should have noticed it. If he thought using common sense, he should feel the incompatibility of the cherished slave and the strength of the Rabbitman tribe that held the warhammer, he should’ve recognized the significance of them leaving him to her after he caught a glimpse of Hajime and Yue’s ability himself.

Without anymore talk, Shia held Doryukken near her waist… … and immediately dashed out. Then, she appeared in front of Leganid.

“Kh!?” “Yaa”

While letting out an adorable voice, she changed into an overpowering manner and swung the super-heavy Sledgehammer, and it approached Leganid’s chest whose expression was dyed with astonishment. Immediately before getting a direct hit, Leganid was barely able to cross his arms to defend, but…

(Isn’t it too heavy!?)

He couldn’t do anything even though he had braced himself, so he jumped back to soften the impact, but her swing was too fast and made his action meaningless. As a result,

GUSHA!

Along with that sound, Leganid was blown away and his back crashed into the guild’s wall. Along with a roaring sound, Leganid vomited all the air in his lungs and inside his shaking point of view, he could see Shia’s appearance as she lost her interest. Apparently, she thought he would be able to resist some more.

For a “Black”-ranked adventurer like himself, to be easily beaten by a girl of the Rabbitman tribe and the fact that she even lost her interest, Leganid could do nothing but laugh at himself. He revealed a smile that looked like a frown because of pain and tried to use his hands to stand up, but because of a sharp pain he collapsed as is. When he looked at the source of the sharp pain, he could see his crushed arm.

Fortunately, the one that was crushed was only his right hand, so he managed to stand up using the other arm while enduring the pain. Although his vision was still swaying, he somehow managed to firmly step on the floor. Even if it was meaningless, if he hadn’t immediately jumped back, he probably wouldn’t be able to stand up.

However, it wasn’t a good thing for him to stand up. Although Leganid managed to stand up partly because of his willpower, when he saw Yue’s appearance which looked at him with cold ice-like eyes while her right hand was thrust out, he could only grumble inside his mind.

(Young master, I am sorry, it’ll be too unprofitable…)

Immediately, for the first time in Leganid’s life, he gained a valuable and worst experience of “dancing in the air”.

“Having been embraced by the wind, dance and scatter like a flower and be smashed “Wind Flower””

It was Yue’s original number two, a compound magic using Gravity magic and the bullet of “Wind Burst”, a magic that shot a cannonball of wind. By freely manipulating several cannonballs of wind, the cannonballs would always surround and “continue to fall” to crucify their target using the gravitational field. Following that, it was an unsophisticated magic where the target became a sandbag in the air as is when they were launched at the same time. By the way, what happened was just like the chant described.

When the dance with an one-sided lead was over, Leganid, gusha, fell on the floor with an unpleasant sound and didn’t even twitch. Actually, he already lost consciousness after several attacks, but although she knew that, Yue kept attacking him without mercy, she especially concentrated her aim at his crotch and that made the surrounding men cover their crotches. Toward the brutal and severe attacks, Hajime in the back could only say “Ow”, with a shivering voice filled with pathos.

The two consecutive spectacles were over. They were followed by a silence that wrapped the guild’s interior. Not even one person tried to move, they could only stare at Hajime and his party. If one looked carefully, the people who seemed to be guild staff had tried to stop the fight, but after they arrived at the cafe, they were stunned when they tried to stretch their hands towards Hajime and his party. It seemed that spectacle even shocked them who had seen various kinds of adventurers.

While everyone was stunned, slowly the silence was broken. Hajime tsuka tsuka, began to walk. All gazes inside the guild focused on Hajime. Hajime’s destination was… … The pigman.

“Hii! S-Stay awaay! J-Just who do you think I am! I am Poom Ming! You’re defying Baron Ming!”

“… … Apologize to all of that character’s fans on Earth, you pig”

A character from Earth floated in Hajime’s mind when he heard the pigman’s name, that’s why he deeply frowned and he grandly trampled the pigman’s face that had fallen on his butt.

“Pugya!?”

He let out a pig-like scream as his face was sandwiched between the shoe sole and the floor, thenmishimishi, his skull let out that sound that made him scream again out of fear. After that, because his voice was annoying, the more he screamed, the more the pressure increased. His face became uglier, his eyes and nose were hidden by his cheeks’s flesh. Before long, maybe because he noticed that the pain increased as he screamed, he began to keep quiet. Well, there was also the possibility that he merely lost the strength to scream.

“Oi, piggy. Don’t you come into my sight again. Regardless if you are involved directly or indirectly… … There won’t be a next time.”

Even though Poom was still being trampled by Hajime’s shoe sole, he tried to nod desperately while trembling. Finally, he had lost the power to bluff. His heart was completely broken. However, Hajime was not that naive to let him go if it was only to this extent. To not let it become “You forget the heat once it passes your throat,” temporary fear was not enough. Because killing him was not a choice, instead, he was going to carve a fear that would be remembered forever.

Because of that, he raised his foot a little, then Hajime transmuted the sole into spikes and mightily trampled again.

“Gyaaaaaaaa!!”

The spikes pierced Poom’s face and made numerous holes. In addition, one of his eyes were pierced and began to sprout a large amount of blood. Poom himself immediately fainted because of the pain. When Hajime moved his foot, what he saw was a tragic… … No, his original face was tragic in the first place so there wasn’t much change, for now, Poom’s blood-stained face was released.

Hajime, with a somehow refreshed expression, went toward Yue and Shia. Yue and Shia greeted Hajime with beautiful smiles. Following that, Hajime came to the side the guide; Rishee who was dumbfounded while smiling.

“Well then, Guide-san. Please take us to the place.”

“Hahih! W-Well, that’s, I, what can I say…”

Maybe because she felt the fear from Hajime’s smile, Rishee was flustered. Her expression was obviously saying she didn’t want to be involved with them. At least, that was because Hajime and his party were abnormals. Hajime, who had somehow guessed that, thought finding a new guide after such a commotion would be a hassle, so he wouldn’t let Rishee go. Having realized Hajime’s intent, Yue and Shia stood at Rishee’s sides. “Hiiin!”, was the miserable scream that Rishee let out.

And, her saviours came, although it was too late, the guild staff came.

“Umm, I am sorry, but please cooperate to be questioned over there.”

A male staff member informed Hajime, and three members of the staff were approaching to surround Hajime and his party. However, they seemed rather stiff. Several others were going to see the condition of Poom and Leganid.

“Even if you ask me, that piggy was trying to snatch my companions, then losing his temper he tried to attack us when I refused him so I only returned that back to him. That’s all, there’s nothing more to explain. That guide and the surrounding guys and merchants are the witnesses. Especially, those guys on the nearby tables that seemed to have attentively listened to us, right?”

While Hajime said that, he glared at the surrounding men, his eyes were saying, “You know what will happen to your neck if you lie to them, right?” and that made the men nod intensely many times.

“Although we know that, it is a problem that happened inside the guild, so we’ll judge it fairly by hearing the complaints from both concerned parties… … it is the rule that needs to be followed by adventurers…”

“Both concerned parties… … Huh”

Hajime took a glance towards Poom and Leganid. It seemed they wouldn’t wake up anytime soon. Although the staff members had called healers, they would only likely awaken after two, three days.

“Until they wake up, are you saying we’ll wait for that? Aren’t we the victims here? … … should I just carry him outside of this city and kill him?”

Hajime gave a blaming look toward the guild staff. Toward the typical claimer-like words, the male staff said, “Please don’t glare at us like that, it is our job so we can’t help it”, with an expression that gave off a desperate feeling. Following that, when they heard the last line that Hajime whispered, they tried to stop him in a panic.

Hajime, although reluctant, approached Poom and Leganid to wake them up with a sharp pain only to be stopped by the staff and they argued, then suddenly, a dignified voice came out.

“What is it? Just what on earth happened here?”

When you looked at the source, there was a slender, glasses wearing man who let out an intellectual atmosphere looking at Hajime and his party with strict eyes.

“Head of secretary Datt! You arrived at the right time! What happened was…”

The staff thought it was a fortunate event and called out toward the man called the head of secretary Datt. When Datt finished hearing the story from the staff, he turned a sharp gaze toward Hajime and his party.

Apparently, they still couldn’t be freed.

Volume 6 Chapter 4


The head of secretary; Datt, pushed his glasses up with his middle finger, and talked to Hajime with a composed tone.

“I’ve roughly heard the story. It looks like it isn’t a lie that there are many witnesses. Although I think you’re overdoing it… … well, let’s just say it’s within a permissible range because they didn’t die. For now, before they wake up and give their side of the story, I assume you’ll be staying in Fhuren. So, I want to verify your identities and your contact address… … you won’t object if it’s just that, right?”

What’s implied was, ‘I won’t concede more than this, you know?’, so Hajime replied to the head of secretary Datt while shrugging his shoulders.

“Aa, I don’t care. If that pig still tries to complain, then it’s me who wants to be called. I’ll try a more polite method of persuasion at that time.”

Hajime didn’t refuse him, then he presented his status plate to the still amazed Datt.

“Our contact address, well we still haven’t decided where to stay… … You can just ask that guide. We are going to stay at the inn she recommends after all.”

Because Hajime turned his gaze towards her, Rishee twitched then dropped her shoulders with a resigned look because she’d still be their guide.

“Fumu, that’s okay… … “Blue” huh. Even though the guy that lies there is “black”… … how about the status plates of the ones over there?”

Even a little, Datt was surprised when he saw Hajime’s status plate displaying the lowest rank of an adventurer; blue. However, because he heard it was the two women that defeated Leganid, he thought the girls were the stronger ones and asked Yue and Shia to submit their status plates.

“Well, Yue and Shia… … these girls lost their status plates and we still didn’t ask for a reissue. Look, isn’t that expensive?”

Hajime casually said that lie. Although there’d be no problem to let them see the pair’s abnormal strength, if possible he wanted to avoid the details being known.

“But, even if I can’t clarify their identities, it’ll be preserved in the record, so if you frequently cause trouble inside the guild, you’ll be blacklisted regardless of who’s the culprit and victim. If possible, can you pay the guild for a replacement?”

From Datt’s tone, it seemed it was necessary to verify their identities by all means. But, if they got the status plates, then the two’s peculiar magic would surely be displayed in the skill column before they could conceal it. That, along with the magic from the Age of the Gods that’d surely be displayed. It would definitely cause a ruckus. Although it’s possible for Hajime and his party to just mow down everyone who tries to harm them during the ruckus, they wouldn’t be able to stay here any longer. Hajime thought about a lot of troubles that would somehow come. Having read his thoughts, Yue talked to Hajime.

“… … Hajime, letter.”

” ? Aa. That letter huh…”

Because of Yue’s words, Hajime remembered that he had received a letter from Catherine of the Brook branch when they were about to leave Brook town. She said to show it to the one who managed the guild when they got into trouble in the guild, because it could help them. A mysterious letter.

If the letter was useless, according to the circumstances, Hajime considered to immediately leaving the city. Then he fished out the letter from his chest pocket and handed it to Datt. Because he only heard half of what Catherine had said, he didn’t know the contents. That’s why Hajime immediately regretted not checking the contents first.

“Although I don’t know if it’ll act as a substitute for our identification, I was told to hand this over to the one who manages the guild by an acquaintanced member of the guild staff when we got into trouble.”

” ? An acquaintance in guild staff? … … Let me see.”

From the quality of Hajime and his party’s clothes, they didn’t seem to have any problems with money, that’s why Datt felt doubtful about his attitude that refused to replace the status plate, but they passed him a letter instead. When he opened it, he earnestly read it and floated a fish-like expression.

Following that, he turned to look at the face of Hajime and his party and the letter many times while he repeatedly reading the letter’s contents. From his figure that read the letter with wide opened eyes, he was trying to determine if the letter was genuine. Before long, Datt folded the letter again and carefully put it again inside the letter’s envelope, then he turned his gaze towards Hajime and his party.

“If the letter is real it’ll certainly serve as your identification… …I cannot decide by myself if the sender is real. I’ll confirm it with the branch head, so will you wait in another room? It won’t take much time. I’ll be back in ten, no, fifteen minutes.”

Because Datt’s response exceeded his expectations, “Seriously, who on Earth is Catherine?”, Hajime and his party were slightly taken aback

“Well, I don’t mind if it’s that much. I understand. We’ll wait.”

“Let the staff guide you. Well then, later.”

Datt called the staff at the side and left a message to guide them to another room, then he immediately disappeared into the guild, taking the letter with him. The designated staff asked Hajime and his party to relocate. Hajime and his party began to walk accordingly while being perplexed, but with a voice filled with anticipation rang out.

“Umm~, what should I do?”

It was Rishee’s. ‘If you still have to talk with the guild, can you excuse me?’, was what her eyes said. She obviously wanted to quickly separate from a seed of troubles, like Hajime and his party.

Hajime, with an expression as if it was natural, nodded and frankly replied.

“Wait for us… … don’t run away, kay? Aren’t you a pro?”

“… … Yes.”

Rishee dropped her shoulders and moved towards a seat inside the cafe. Her back said that although it was unpleasant work, she already accepted it, and the atmosphere of an upstanding member of society’s pathos drifted in the air.

After Hajime and his party were guided into the reception room, exactly after ten minutes, a knock came from the door. Hajime only answered with a word, then the door was opened. What appeared were a sharp eyed male in the latter half of his thirties, with blonde hair that was made into a swept back hairstyle, and Datt, from before.

“Nice to meet you, I am Ilwa Chang, the head of the Adventurer’s Guild — Fhuren branch. Hajime-kun, Yue-kun, and Shia-kun… … is it okay to call you that?”

After a simple introduction, the branch head; Ilwa confirmed the names of Hajime and his party and requested a handshake. Hajime returned the handshake while replying to him.

“Aa, we don’t mind. Our names, is it from the letter?”

“Just as you said. It was written in sensei’s letter. She seems to favor… … paid you a lot of attention. Your future is promising, but because you have a predisposition for trouble, if possible she wants us to take care of you, is the letter’s content.”

“Predisposition for trouble… … Huh. Trouble certainly continued to happen in Brook. Well, that’s okay. So, essentially will that serve as our identification? Or are there other questions?”

“Aa, Sensei already wrote everything here so there’s no need to question you further. She certainly has the eyes to discern people’s characters. She even purposely wrote this letter, so I’ll let this letter be your identification.”

Apparently, Catherine’s letter was really useful and let them meet the one who managed the guild. He seems to have close ties with Catherine, to have even called her “sensei”. Shia, who sat next to Hajime, had been especially helped by Catherine, so she was interested in the story and timidly talk to Ilwa.

“That’s~, who is Catherine-san actually?”

“Nn? Didn’t you hear from the person herself? She was the Guild Master’s head of secretary in the guild’s headquarters located in the Imperial Capital. Afterwards, she became the one in charge of training everyone related to guild management. Currently, of the 5 branch heads sent to each town, 60% are her pupils. I am also one of them, so I can’t go against her. Because of her beauty and pleasant character, at the time, she was a madonna-like existence to us, in certain ways she was also an adored big-sister-like existence. Afterwards, she married and transferred to the guild branch of Brook town. She said she wanted to raise her children in the country. Her marriage announcement was like a bolt from the blue. It became stormy after that. If you ask where, the guild in the Imperial Capital that is.”

“Haa~ she really is an amazing person~”

“… … Catherine’s amazing.”

“Although I had thought she wasn’t an ordinary person… … I never thought she was such a central figure. Rather, even though she was so popular… … Currently… … No, it’s better if I stop here.”

Hajime and his party came to admire her when they learned of Catherine’s true colors. It seemed they had always imagined her as an important person. Moreover, Hajime was somewhat looking at the distance, remembering the cruelty of time.

“Well, that’s that, if there are no more questions, is it okay for us to go?”

Originally, they came here only to verify their identity, so Hajime tried to confirm with Ilwa if it was over because staying any longer would be meaningless. However, Ilwa’s eyes shone and said, “Can you wait for a little longer?”, as he tried to stop Hajime and his party. It somehow gave them a bad premonition.

Ilwa urged Datt that stood next to him and an application form was presented in front of Hajime and his party.

“Actually, I’ve expectations for your help, I want you to accept one request.”

“I refuse.”

The moment Ilwa requested something of them, Hajime tried to decline as he stood up from his seat. Although Yue and Shia also followed after him, they stopped their feet when Ilwa spoke his next lines.

“Fumu, isn’t it fine to at least hear the story for now? If you listen, I think I’ll turn a blind eye to this affair…”

“… …”

What was implied was, “If you won’t hear me out, I’ll make you go through the troublesome procedures for this affair, you know?”, something like that. Using the testimonies from the surrounding people, even though Hajime and his party weren’t guilty of what was done to Poom and Leganid, what they have done was excessive self-defense. So according to the regular procedures, the guild would judge them fairly by hearing both concerned parties and this procedure would take quite some time. As a result, even if Hajime and his party weren’t in the wrong, on the other hand, they would spend time like fools until the necessary procedures were finished and the decision came. Also, if they escaped from these procedures, they’d likely be black-listed. In the future, that’d be troublesome because they wouldn’t be able to use the town’s guild facilities.

Hajime stared at Ilwa for a while, then he didn’t say “I’ll accept the request”, but “I’ll hear the story”, because he thought it’d be okay to at least hear him out to avoid the trouble, then he sat on the seat.

“It looks like you’ll listen to it. Thank you.”

“… … as expected of a big city’s guild branch head. You’ve a good character.”

“Not as good as you though. Well then, the contents of the request is written here, to search for a missing person. A party of adventurers that accepted a request to investigate the northern mountain range area have not returned, so the family of one of the adventurers put up a missing person search request, something along those lines.”

Ilwa’s story if summarized, went something like this.

Recently, there were sightings of groups of demonic beasts in the northern mountain range area, which is why the guild made the investigation request. The northern mountain range area is a mountain that, once crossed, would lead you to an uncivilized area. Although not as strong as the demonic beasts inside the Great Dungeons, there are strong demonic beasts that only high-ranked adventurers could handle. It just that, besides the original members of the party that accepted the request, there was another member that tried to forcefully accompany them. By some happenstance, he eventually became a temporary member of the party.

This person was the third son of Count Kudeta; Will Kudeta. Count Kudeta always secretly made someone follow his son that had a tendency to rush out as an adventurer, just like a runaway. But because of this investigation request, the contact with his employer was lost, as it was unusual he was perplexed and put up a search request.

“Although the count had already tried to use his family’s power to form a search party, too many problems kept popping up, which is why he put up the search request to the guild. Well, it was just put up yesterday. Because the missing party was considerably skilled, if they couldn’t handle this, it’d just result in another disaster if accepted by regular Adventurers. That’s why the big-guns should be the one to accept it. But unfortunately, such adventurers are all out on missions. Therefore, for you to come here with such timing, I want you to accept this request.”

“From your statement, we don’t have the required strength, so wouldn’t that be useless? Unfortunately, I am a “Blue”-rank, you know?”

What Hajime implied was they wouldn’t accept it because they didn’t have the required strength.

“Didn’t you instant-kill a “Black” called Leganid? Also… … for someone who easily searched around inside the Raisen Grand Canyon, do I need to say more ?”

” ! How did… … the letter? But, I didn’t say anything…”

No one had heard the story of Hajime and his party searching around the Raisen Grand Canyon. Therefore, unless it was from the letter, there was no way for Ilwa to know about that. But, he was doubtful about how Catherine learn of this. While Hajime puzzled it over in his head, Shia timidly raised her hand.

Hajime turned towards Shia with a suspicious look.

“What is it, Shia?”

“U~mm, I inadvertently told her when we talked… … Teehee?”

“… … I’ll punish you later.”

” !? Y-Yue-san said it too!”

“… … Shia, you traitor.”

“I’ll punish both of you later.”

Apparently, the culprits were Yue and Shia. Hajime declared to punish them, and the two were passively drenched in cold sweat. Looking at their appearances with a wry smile, Ilwa continued his talk.

“Although the probability of them being alive is low, it’s not zero. Because the Count is my friend, I want you to begin as soon as possible. What do you think? There’s no one but you here. Will you accept it?”

Ilwa’s attitude was as if he was begging him, the guild was simply responsible for the commission, but he included more emotion in this. For him to be a friend of the Count, it’s possible he’s acquainted with the missing Will. So he personally felt anxious for his safety.

“Even if you say that, we already have a destination for our journey. We are only here because it’s along the way. We won’t go to the northern mountain range area. So, allow me to refuse.”

Hajime, even though it’s a matter of the life and death for a noble’s third son, unhesitantly refused him. However, maybe he foresaw that, Ilwa immediately proposed a reward faster than Hajime could stand up from his seat.

“I can increase the reward, you know? Although the reward listed in the application is in the form of cash, let me add more appeal to you.. I’ll promote your guild rank. If it’s your abilities then becoming “Black” is okay.”

“Well, I don’t care about money and rank, that’s why…”

“Then, in the future, when you have some trouble related to the guild, I can be your support, how is that? To have the guild head of Fhuren branch’s support, you’ll have influence inside the guild you can brag about, you know? You and trouble are pretty close after all. So, isn’t it good as a reward?”

“That’s a big treat for me. Aren’t you putting in too much effort for a friend’s son?”

Toward Hajime’s words, Ilwa’s expression crumbled. It became an expression full of regret.

“He… … Will accepted the request after I recommended it. I was also the one who passed the talk about the investigation request to the party. Even if you said there’d be an accident in the investigation, I thought there’d be no problem if he was with a party that had the required strength. I meant no harm. Will was not suited to be a noble, and he had yearned to be an adventurer for the longest time… … but, he didn’t have the disposition. Therefore, if he were with strong adventurers, then he could go to dangerous places. I only wanted him to realize that it was impossible for him to be an adventurer. He was already attached to me at a young age…. … that’s why, even though I wanted him to give up after this request…”

While he heard Ilwa’s monologue, Hajime thought about it slightly. It seemed there was a thicker relationship between Ilwa and Will than Hajime thought. Although he had said that with a clarifying face, internally, Ilwa must be clinging to the last straw of hope. Will’s odds of survival would become closer to zero as time passed. Having proposed such unreasonable rewards showed that Ilwa was in a hurry.

Hajime was also fed up with making excuses for Yue and Shia’s identification every time they came near a town. That’s why it’d be convenient to use this person’s name in order to access a town’s facilities from now on. Moreover, he had zero intention of catering to the Church of Saints or the Kingdom, and someday he might be labelled as a heretic. If that happens, it’d become extremely difficult for them to stay inside a town. That’s why it was a nice thing to have a personal connection that could clear that hurdle.

So, Hajime thought that if he wanted the support of a big city guild’s branch head, in this case, they must tell him their circumstances and forbid him to speak of it, so they could use him in times of inconvenience. Because he seemed extremely intimate with that Will person, if they brought him back alive, Ilwa couldn’t be ungrateful to them.

“Although there’s no need to think about it because you already said that much… … I have conditions.”

“Conditions?”

“Aa, they are not something difficult. I want you to give status plates to Yue and Shia. After that, promise me you won’t tell anyone about what’s written there. Furthermore, even if it isn’t related to the guild, I will use all of your connections, for our convenience. These two.”

“That’s too…”

“If you can’t, then pretend we never talked about this. We are going.”

Because of Hajime who tried to stand up from his seat, Ilwa and Datt displayed expressions filled with impatience and agony. Although the first condition was not a problem, his second condition essentially meant that he wanted the Fhuren guild branch’s head to be the limbs of a single adventurer. Because he had his own responsibilities, he couldn’t immediately accept it.

“Can I ask why you demand that?”

“There’s no need to be that negative. They aren’t unreasonable demands, you know? It’s just that our existences are peculiar, that’s why when marked by the church… … No, from now on, I am sure we’ll be marked, so at that time I only want to use you to make it easier for us. It’s also good if you just become our allies in times of trouble. For example, not refusing us to use the facilities when we become wanted…”

“Is it certain you’ll become wanted people? Fumu, personally, your secrets make me anxious. Although Catherine-sensei said you’re not bad people… … now that you mention it, Shia-kun over there has marvelous physical strength, and although I didn’t see it, from the report Yue-kun has conjured a never before seen magic spell… … your secrets must be along those lines… … following that, you said that you’ll sooner or later be marked by the church… … you also didn’t try to hide it, and it looks like you are already prepared for that… … it’ll surely be hard to move into towns when that happens… … that’s why to make it easier for you…”

As expected of a big city’s guild branch head. He quickly thought inside his head. Ilwa thought about it for a while, then he matched his gaze to Hajime’s having decided what to do.

“I absolutely can’t support you when you ask for help for doing a crime because of ethics. So, I’ll hear the details of your request first, only then I’ll judge what to do. But, I promise I’ll at least be your ally… … I can’t concede more than this. What do you think?”

“Well, if it’s like… … I’ll accept it. Also, it’s okay for the reward to be given after the request is finished. I’ll bring back the young master dead or alive, is that okay?”

For Hajime, it was his first priority to obtain the status plates for Yue and Shia. It’s unnatural for them to not have status plates because it’s somehow always being requested to be shown, this was his first reason, and ultimately to make an excuse every time they came to a town was troublesome.

The only problem was that the person who prepared the status plates at the beginning would make a commotion, so he wanted to avoid it, but Ilwa’s existence solved this problem. However, even if he made a verbal promise as the condition, there are still doubts. Sooner or later, the peculiarity of Hajime and his party might come to light, so it was not preferable because he might change sides immediately. That’s why Hajime said to give the status plates as a reward after the request was completed. Whatever Will’s shape was, Hajime would gain the answer from his afflicted heart, and he could calculate if Ilwa was good or not.

Ilwa was also able to guess Hajime’s intentions. With a bitter smile, he felt relieved finding someone who could accept the search request.

“Truthfully, although your secrets make me anxious… … that’s, I’ll wait for you to finish the request. Just as Hajime-kun said, no matter what shape he is in, I want you to find traces of Will and the other… … Hajime-kun, Yue-kun, and Shia-kun… … Please take care of it.”

Lastly, Ilwa looked at Hajime and his party with earnest eyes, then bowed his head. A big city guild branch’s head bowing his head to adventurers. It wasn’t something usual. It was because he was Catherine’s pupil that his goodness as a person oozed out.

Having seen Ilwa’s appearance, Hajime and his party stood up and without any eagerness, they lightly answered him.

“Kay.”

“… … Nn.”

“Yes.”

Afterwards, they were given the downpayment, and a letter of introduction for the lakeside town at the foot of the mountain range area. They also received information about the investigation request that was given to the adventurers, and finally Hajime and his party left the room. Batan, the door was closed with a slam. Ilwa stared at the door for a while, then, “Fuu~”, let out a big sigh. Inside the room, no one spoke a word, then Datt anxiously spoke to Ilwa.

“Branch head… … Is that okay? Such rewards are…”

“… … Will’s life hangs in their hands. I can’t ask anyone besides them. So, it can’t be helped. Furthermore, they already agreed that I can judge first whether to lend them my power or not. There’ll be no problem. Also, their secrets…”

“What’s displayed in the status plates will be an “inconvenience”, is it…”

“Fumu, Datt-kun. Did you know? Herrlich kingdom’s Hero party, it seems all of them have unexpected statuses, you know?”

Datt opened his narrowed eyes wide because of Ilwa’s sudden story.

” ! Branch head, the summoned ones… … you mean one of them is “God’s Apostle”? But, from their tone it seems they are opposing the church, isn’t the Hero’s party managed by the Church of Saints?”

“Aa, it’s just as you said. But… … around four months ago, it seems one of them died inside the Orcus dungeon. He fell into the Abyss along with a demonic beast.”

“… … don’t tell me, that person’s still alive? If you said four months ago, isn’t the Hero’s party still full of novices? Although I don’t know what it’s like at the bottom of Orcus, to survive that…”

Datt couldn’t believe it as he shook his head, and denied Ilwa’s guess. However, Ilwa who somehow gave out an interested expression and once again glanced at the door from which Hajime and his party had left.

“That is true. But, if that’s so… … there must be a reason why he didn’t rejoin with his companions and even went on a journey, right? Just what did he see in the bottom of the darkness, just what did he obtain?”

“Just what… … that is huh…”

“Aa, no matter what it is, surely, it’s something worth making him decide to oppose the church. To put it frankly, he’s determined to even oppose the world.”

“The world…”

“For me, I want to make connections with such a peculiar man by all means. For example, even if they are chased by the church and the kingdom, right. Rather, Sensei might have guessed that, that’s why she purposely gave them this letter.”

“Branch head… … please be sure to know when to quit, okay?”

“Of course I will.”

Towards the story on such a large scale, Datt became dizzy, even so, as Ilwa’s head of secretary, he didn’t forget to advise him. However, Ilwa was deeply in thought when he heard Datt’s advice only replied in half absent-mindedness.

Volume 6 Chapter 5


In the middle of the vast plain was a highway stretching far to the North. Although it was called a highway, it was actually just ground without weeds since it had been treaded on so many times, thus it naturally became a road. Since there’s no such thing as a suspension in carriages of this world, the carriage crew would surely have sore butts by the time they reached their destination.

Suddenly, a shadow ran through the uneven road at an unbelievable speed. On its black body were two wheels advancing forward on the uneven road, carrying silhouettes of three people.

They are Hajime, Yue, and Shia. They moved on the highway at a speed incomparable to the time when they were at the bottom of the Raisen Grand Canyon. It might be more than 80km/h. Because there was nothing to obstruct his magic, the magic-driven two-wheeler’s original specs could be displayed. Their seating order was just as usual: Yue between Hajime’s arms, and Shia at his back. Shia’s rabbit ears were pata pata, fluttering in the wind.

Warm sunlight poured down because of the good weather, and with Yue using her magic to adjust the wind pressure, it could be said it was good weather for touring. In fact, Yue and Shia were feeling the warm sunlight and comfortable wind with their entire bodies, closing their eyes because it felt pleasant.

“Hau~, it’s niice~, Yue-saa~n. We should exchange places when we retuurn~”

“… … That won’t do. This is my spot.”

“Eh~, don’t say that, let us change our places~, it’s nice in the back~”

Shia demanded to Yue that they exchange their seats with a slackened and stretched tone. With an unpleasant face, Hajime looked at Shia’s relaxed face over his shoulder and answered in Yue’s stead.

“You know, you can’t sit in front, right? Also, you’ll only obstruct me. Especially those rabbit ears. They’ll hit my eyes when the wind blows.”

“Ah~, that’s riight~”

“… … It’s not good, she’s almost asleep.”

Apparently, Shia was half-asleep because of how comfortable it was. She laid her head on Hajime’s shoulder with all of her weight. She was also half-asleep when she was talking to Yue before.

“Well, with this pace we only need one day. I’ll go non-stop, so let’s rest when it’s time to rest.”

Just as Hajime had said, Hajime and his party were going to a town only one day away; the town closest to the northern mountain range area where Will’s party undertook the investigation request. They had advanced as is without taking a break, so they would probably arrive at sunset and start searching after a night’s stay in town. The reason they were in a hurry was, of course, the fact that as more time passed, Will’s party’s odds of survival decreased. But because Hajime was being proactive for another person’s sake, Yue was glancing upward with doubt on her face.

Hajime let out a wry smile when he saw Yue adorably incline her neck in between his arms.

“… … Proactive?”

“Aa, it’s better if he’s alive. If it’s like that, he will truly be grateful. After all, problems from the Kingdom and Church are waiting ahead of us. So, isn’t it better to have more support? I don’t want to take care of them one by one, after all.”

“… … I see.”

In fact, he didn’t know what could possibly be done with Ilwa’s support. If anything, the possibility of him being a type of useless support was bigger. But, if it could be acquired with little work, then the work might not be regrettable.

“I have also heard that our destination, the lakeside town, has plenty of rivers. That’s why the town’s outskirts are the continent’s number one rice-producing area.”

“… … Rice farm?”

“Ou, in other words it’s the rice. Rice. It’s the staple food of my hometown, Japan. I haven’t eaten it even once since I came here. So, although I don’t know if it is the same thing or not, I want to hurry to eat it.”

“… … Nn, I also want to eat it… … The town’s name?”

Hajime looked far into the distance while remembering rice dishes. Looking at the Hajime with a content expression plastered across his face, Yue hadn’t yet actually heard of the town’s name and asked him. “Hah”, Hajime was startled, he even was a little embarrassed when he noticed Yue’s gaze. He then replied with a somewhat loud voice to hide his embarrassment.

“It’s the Lakeside Town called Ul.”

* * *

“Haa, there’s no clue today, too… Shimizu-kun, where on earth did you go…”

With her shoulders dropping dejectedly, the person who was walking through Ul’s main street was one of the summoned ones; the teacher, Hatayama Aiko. Her usual cheerfulness was gone. Currently, she was tortured with anxiety and worry, while a gloomy atmosphere hung around her. Somehow the main street’s color, and even the streetlights were dimmer than usual.

“Aiko, don’t be so disappointed. We still don’t know anything. It’s enough to just think he is safe. What can you do if you don’t even believe.” “That’s right, Ai-chan-sensei. Shimizu-kun’s room didn’t seem to be attacked. So isn’t the probability of him going out on his own be higher? Please stop thinking of just bad things.”

Because Aiko was low-spirited, the commander of Aiko’s exclusive bodyguards; David, and her student; Yuka, called out to her. In her surroundings were the familiar Knights and students. They were also severely worried about Aiko and tried to talk to her.

One of the classmates, Shimizu Yukitoshi had disappeared for a little over two weeks. Aiko and the others had tried to search for him, leaving no stone unturned. However, his whereabouts were still unknown. There had been no sightings in this town, so they had sent messengers to the other towns and villages in the vicinity, but in the end their efforts were still in vain.

Although, at first they thought he was involved in an accident, Shimizu’s room was clean. Shimizu himself was a “Dark Magician,” a class that possessed high aptitude toward dark magic. He also had high aptitude in other magic systems, that was why he couldn’t be done in by the neighborhood thugs. A lot of them thought he left voluntarily.

Moreover, Shimizu was an obedient indoor type who had low sociability. Even among the classmates he didn’t have an especially close friend. It was also surprising that he wanted to be Ai-chan’s bodyguard. Because of that, other than Aiko, the students were sure of his safety. They were more concerned about Aiko, who became more low-spirited as the days passed. There was no need to say how worried her bodyguard Knights were.

Incidentally, they had reported it to the Kingdom and Church, and it seemed like a search party they had organized was coming. Shimizu was a summoned one with talent in magic, unlike the episode with Hajime in which the top management didn’t even take an optimistic view. The search party would arrive in another two to three days.

Because words of concern came one after another, Aiko mentally hit herself. Whether he was involved in an incident or voluntarily disappeared, didn’t matter, it didn’t change the fact that it worried her. However, she must put it aside for now. Now her duty was to cheer up the other students at her side. That’s why, “I am these children’s teacher!”. Aiko took a deep breath then slapped her cheeks with her hands to recover her spirit.

“Everyone, I am sorry for worrying you. It’s just as you said. Nothing would be solved by brooding over it. Shimizu is an excellent magic-user. He’ll surely be okay. Now, let us believe he is safe. Now, for today’s dinner! Let’s eat our fill and prepare for tomorrow!”

Although they knew she was overdoing it, the students obediently replied to her with a shout “Ye~s”, as they cheered up. The Knights were also pleased with her appearance.

KARANh KARANh

When that sound rang out, the door of the inn Aiko and the others were staying at opened. It was the number one inn in Ul. Its name was “Water Fairy Inn”. A long time ago, a pair of husband and wife fairies stayed in Uldeia Lake, and that was the origin of its name. Uldeia Lake was the lake boasted as the largest in the continent, and located on the outskirts of Ul town. Its size was about four times that of Lake Biwa in Japan.

The first floor of “Water Fairy Inn” was a restaurant. It served dishes that were also Ul’s specialty products. The interior was calming, there were tables and bar counter that gave out a dignified atmosphere. Their ornaments were made with detail in mind, but did not stand out. Moreover, there was a modest chandelier on the ceiling, and flowers were arranged to add onto the calm atmosphere. It made one remembered the words “well-established”, an inn where one could feel its history.

In the beginning, Aiko and her students weren’t able to calm down because the inn was too high-class. It was impossible for Aiko and her student to stay at an ordinary inn because of their reputation, since people began to called them “God’s Apostles” and “Goddess of Good Harvest”. After some persuasion from the Knights, they agreed to stay at this place while they were in Ul.

In fact, they had spent time in one of the luxurious rooms of the Royal Palace, so Aiko and her students had gradually become accustomed to it. Now the inn had became a place where they could truly relax. For Aiko and the others who came back exhausted from farmland improvement and in search of Shimizu, this inn’s dishes were their only daily enjoyment.

All of them were seated in VIP seats in the innermost section of the inn, as they enjoyed today’s dinner.

“Aa, it’s always delicious~ I never thought I’d be able to eat curry in this other world.”

“Well, it looks like stew though… … No, is it white curry?”

“No, there is also the bowl of rice topped with tempura, remember? Even the sauce is superb, right? Won’t Japan lose?”

“That, isn’t it because Tamai-kun only eats the premade ones? It’s not good to compare it with Hokaben’s.”

“Well, I’ll choose the fried rice-like things. So, let’s stop this.”

The student’s tension was raised every night because of the dishes closely resembled those from Earth. Although there were slight differences in appearance and taste, the concept itself closely resembled their counterparts on earth. The abundance of ingredient was one of the reasons that increased the quality of Ul town’s dishes. Other than the rice, there were fishes from Uldeia Lake, in addition to herbs and spices from the mountain range area.

While Aiko and the others ate the delicious dishes happily, a splendidly mustachioed male of around 60 years of age, approached them with a smile.

“Everyone, what do you think of today’s meal? If there is something you want to say, please tell us without any reserve.”

“Ah, Owner-san.”

The one who talked to Aiko and the others was the owner of the “Water Fairy Inn”; Foss Selo. He straightened his back, his eyes were gently narrowed, and gray hairs were mixed on his swept-back hair. He was a man who suited the calm atmosphere of the inn.

“No, today is also delicious. It heals us everyday.”

When Aiko replied with smile, Foss gladly said, “Thanks for the compliment”, and smiled. But, in the next moment, his expression was clouded as though he wanted to apologize. It was an expression unbecoming of Foss who always smiled gently. Wondering what had happened, everyone stopped eating and focused on Foss.

“Actually, although it’s regrettable… I can only serve this much for the dishes that uses spices today.”

“Eh!? You mean, we can’t eat Nilshisseer (the version of curry in this other world.)?”

Sonobe Yuka, who favored the curry, was shocked and tried to ask again.

“Yes, I am sorry. Anyway, no matter how many ingredients were used… it would be enough if it were the usual… However, there’s an unrest in the northern mountain range this month, so the number of people going to harvest the ingredients have sharply declined. Even a few days ago, a party of Adventurers who came to investigate the situation had gone missing. Thus, even more people don’t want to go there. It became a situation where this store doesn’t know when the goods will arrive.”

“Umm… What do you mean by unrest?”

“Something like the sightings of groups of demonic beasts… It’s a comparatively safe place as long as you don’t go into the mountains of the northern mountain range. Although there seems to be strong demonic beasts inside the mountain, they never come near on purpose. However, there were sightings of groups of demonic beasts in the mountain where there shouldn’t have been any.”

“That’s truly worrisome…”

Aiko frowned. The others were somewhat depressed and mutually looked at each other. Foss said with an apologetic expression, “It isn’t the right topic to talk while eating, huh?”, then he continued to speak with a bright tone to recover the atmosphere.

“However, that disaster should be solved soon.”

“What do you mean?”

“Actually, today there were new customers who just arrived before the sunset. It seems they are going to the northern mountain range in order to search for the Adventurers who had gone missing. They were appointed by the Branch Head of Fhuren guild, so it looks like they are some serious big-guns. They might be able to determine the cause of this disaster.”

Although Aiko and her students were still seated, the bodyguard Knights commanded by David and currently eating with them let out “Hou”, with a half admiration-filled and half-interested tone. Even among the guild’s staff members, the Head of Fhuren branch was considered first class. For someone to be appointed to accept a request from that Branch Head meant that they were capable of clearing something only powerful people could accomplish. Their curiosity was aroused because they wanted to fight in the same battle as such people. Inside the Knights’ heads, they were listed the famous “Gold” class Adventurers.

Aiko and her students were looking at the unusual chatter of David and the Knights, then they began to hear voices from the stair connected to second floor. They were the voices of a boy and two girls. It seemed like one of the girls was complaining to the boy. It was Foss who reacted to those voices.

“Oya, speak of the devils. It is them, Mr. Knights. If you want to talk to them, please do it now because they are going to leave tomorrow morning.”

“I see, I understand. But, those are fairly young voices. Are there any “Gold” class that young?”

David and the Knights had already memorized the famous “Gold” class in their minds, but because there was no one with such young voices. Some of them looked at each other with perplexed expressions.

While they were in a state of confusion, the trio were approaching while talking.

The seats where Aiko and the others sat were the innermost seats enclosed by walls on three sides. It was a place where they could look anywhere inside the restaurant. For now, it was made into a private room with the use of the curtain. Needless to say, inside was the conspicuous Aiko’s party, was Aiko; the one hailed as the “Goddess of Good Harvest”, which made them even more conspicuous. It was why they often used the curtain whenever they ate their meals. Even today, they closed the curtain so they wouldn’t be seen.

From the other side of the curtain, they could hear the conversation of a boy and two girls.

“Mou, how many times I must say it until you understand. Please stop leaving me alone and create a world with just the two of you in it. It makes me feel really, really lonely. Did you hear me? “Hajime”-san.”

“I heard, I heard you. Just stay in another room if you don’t want to see it.”

“Nmah! Did you hear what he just said, Yue-san? “Hajime”-san just said something coldhearted.”

“…”Hajime” …Bad!”

“Yes, yes.”

Within their conversation, the name the girls said instantly rattled Aiko’s heart. What did the girls just say? What was the boy called? This boy’s voice… isn’t it similar to “that boy”?, were the question that immediately floated into Aiko’s mind. She stiffened as though something had tied her down, so she could only stare at the curtain.

The same thing happened to Sonobe Yuka and other students by her side. In their minds, thoughts of a certain boy who had disappeared into the abyss four months ago resurfaced. He was a boy who the classmates strongly believed to have “died in this other world”. A boy they wanted to forget, a boy who stood out for better or for worse.

Because of the abnormal expression on Aiko’s and her students’ faces, Foss and the Knights tried calling out to them with dumbfounded gazes, but no one reacted. The Knights were wondering what on earth had happened as they looked at their faces. Then, Aiko blurted out a name.

“…Nagumo-kun?”

Because of the word she unconsciously let out, her body which had stiffened because of the unbelievable situation had regained its freedom. Aiko immediately stood up and her chair fell to the ground. She then pulled the curtain opened, so hard it might tear.

SHAAAA!!

Because of the unexpected loud sound that came from when the curtain was pulled, boy and two girls trio were only able to look with stupefied expressions.

Aiko shouted without confirming who the other person was. It was the name of her important student.

“Nagumo-kun!”

“Ah? ……… Sensei?”

In front of her, with his eye wide open in surprise, was an eyepatched, white-haired boy. He looked completely different from the Nagumo Hajime in her memory. Not only his appearance, his atmosphere was also completely different. Nagumo Hajime Aiko knew was a boy who always daydreaming, gentle, and quiet. Actually, Aiko admitted that a wry smile fit him, but it was her secret. However, the boy in front of her eyes had sharp eyes, clad with an unapproachable atmosphere. He was too different from her memory. If she passed by him inside the town, she was sure she wouldn’t recognized the boy in front of her as Nagumo Hajime.

But if she looked carefully, his voice and face were the same as the one inside her memory. Above all… it was how the boy in front of her called her. That’s right, it was “sensei”. Aiko was convinced. Although his look and atmosphere had greatly changed, the boy in front of her was certainly her own student, “Nagumo Hajime”!

“Nagumo-kun… You’re Nagumo-kun, right? You’re alive… You really are alive…”

“No, you got wrong person. Bye.”

“He?”

To meet the student who was thought to be dead, was a miracle. Being deeply moved, her tear glands loosened, and Aiko eyes became teary. “Where was he until now? What on earth happened? I am truly glad that you were safe.” Were only some of the many things she wanted to say, but couldn’t. Even so, the reply to her desperate words was a completely unexpected answer.

She unconsciously let out a stupid voice, and Aiko’s tears were also withdrawn. She could only blankly stare at Hajime who had begun to suta suta, walk towards the exit. ‘HAH’, she returned to her senses, and panicky ran after him while gripping onto his wrist.

“Please wait a second? Aren’t you Nagumo-kun? Didn’t you just call sensei sensei? Just how is that the wrong person.”

“No, you heard it wrong. That was… Right, it was a dialect meaning “small”. Un.”

“Even so, that’s extremely rude! Rather, there is no way such dialect exists. Why are you trying to deceive me? That appearance too… Did something happen? What are you doing in this place? Why, why didn’t you immediately come back to everyone? Nagumo-kun! Please answer! Sensei won’t let you deceive her!”

Aiko’s angry voice resounded inside the restaurant. Several people and guests looked at the rumored “Goddess of Good Harvest” as she caught and shouted at a man. “Suwah, is he Goddess’s man!?”, as they misunderstood, their eyes sparkled with curiosity. The students and the bodyguard Knights were also came out from the interior.

The students who had seen Hajime’s appearance had shocked expressions as they couldn’t believe what was in front of them. Half of it was because he was alive, while the other half was because of the drastic change to his appearance and atmosphere. However, they didn’t know what should they do, so they could only blankly looked at Aiko and Hajime.

On the other side, although Hajime looked calm, his mind was attacked by petit panic. In the town he came to, after accepting the request from the guild’s Branch Head he got acquaintanced by chance, he never thought there was a chance he would meet Aiko and his classmates again.

Because it was such a sudden event, he inadvertently muttered “sensei”, he even thought, “That can’t be~”, as he tried to deceived himself. His lifecards after Aiko’s angry barrage of questions were to “run away”, “continue with the mistaken person act”, “became a suspicious foreigner”, and “let’s just kidnap Ai-chan”, were all the cards that came to his mind. He especially didn’t know how the last one came up.

Then, Hajime was saved by his reliable partner. Of course it was not the regrettable rabbit ears character, but the Vampire Princess. Yue, came in between Hajime and Aiko, then she forcibly shook off Aiko’s hand which was gripping Hajime’s arm. On their side, the bodyguard Knights were letting out slight bloodthirst.

“… Let go, Hajime is troubled.”

“Wh-What are you? Currently, sensei have an important talk with Nagumo-kun…”

“… Then, calm down a little.”

Because the beatiful girl stared at her with cool eyes, Aiko slightly flinched. There wasn’t much of a height difference between the two. Normally, it would be labeled as a fight between kids. However, Aiko was actually younger by age, and Yue wore a bewitching atmosphere despite her appearance. No matter who saw it, they looked like an adult (Yue) and an angry child (Aiko). Aiko was wary of Yue, so she quietly back away from Hajime with blushing cheeks because of her own words and the way she got mad at him. As she straightened her back to show her dignity as an adult, although it was too late, Aiko was… just like a child doing a stretch.

“I am sorry, I was distracted. Let’s return from the beginning, you are Nagumo-kun, right?”

This time, Aiko said it quietly, but her voice was filled with conviction as she tried to ask Hajime, and matched her glance with him. Having seen such Aiko, Hajime was convinced no matter how he tried to deceive her, she wouldn’t change her conviction and she would chase after him no matter where he go. Thus, scratched his head and replied with a profound sigh.

“Ah. Long time no see, sensei.”

“As expected, you’re Nagumo-kun after all… You’re alive…”

Aiko’s eyes became teary again, but Hajime didn’t think anything about it as he shrugged his shoulders.

“Something like that. After a lot happened, I’m somehow still alive.”

“I am glad. I truly am glad.”

After he took a glance at Aiko who was unable to say more than those words, Hajime went to the nearest table and sat down. Having seen him, Yue and Shia also sat. Shia was somewhat perplexed. Aiko and the others were astonished by Hajime’s sudden action. Hajime had regained his composure and he ignored the surroundings, only to beckon towards Foss who had watched how the situation progressed while he stood behind the students.

“Umm, Hajime-san. Is that okay? Aren’t you acquaintances? Although it was just my guess… the other world’s…”

“That thing doesn’t matter at all. I was just surprised when they suddenly appeared, well, that’s all. We are originally came for dinner, so let’s order now. I have been truly expecting this. Don’t you know? This curry… Ah, you didn’t know it. The spicy dish was called Nilshisseer. I am happy just by imagining the taste…”

“… Then, I’ll order that, too. I want to know what taste Hajime like.”

“Ah, to casually appealed him… just a expected of Yue-san. Then, me too. Clerk-saa~n, we want to order~”

In the beginning, Shia was timidly sneaking glances at Aiko and the others, but changed her mind after Hajime said those words. Then Foss came by to take their order with a troubled smile.

However, naturally, there was no time for them to wait. Aiko, who was dumbfounded again by how Hajime seated himself at a nearby table and began to order, returned her to her senses and she approached Hajime’s table. She said, “Sensei is angry!”, with a truly angered expression as she pishi, hit the table.

“Nagumo-kun, our talk isn’t over. Just how can you start to order as if it were the most natural thing in the world. In the first place, just who are these girls?”

What Aiko had said represented the feelings of everyone around them. The Knights who guessed Hajime was Aiko’s student, who they heard had died four months ago, the students who waited behind Aiko, and everyone else were, “Un un.”, nodding and they waited for Hajime’s answer.

Hajime frowned because of it would be an annoyance. Because he thought he couldn’t have a calm meal thanks to Aiko, who would keep waiting until he answers her questions even as they ate, he reluctantly turned his glance toward Aiko.

“I have come here in just a single day, without stopping, because of a request. That’s why I am hungry, so just let me eat my meal. Also, these are…”

Hajime turned his glance towards Yue and Shia. And these two, before Hajime could say it, began an impactful introduction towards Aiko and the others.

“…Yue.”

“I am Shia.”

“” I am Hajime(-san)’s woman.””

“Wo-woman?”

Aiko somewhat stammered said, “Eh? Eh?”, as she alternately looked between Hajime and the two beautiful girls. It seemed she couldn’t processed the information. The students behind her were also perplexed. Well, the male students’ expressions said, “That can’t be!”, as they restlessly looked between Yue and Shia. Gradually, their face reddened as they were charmed by their beauty.

“Oi, setting Yue aside. Shia, aren’t you different?”

“That! Hajime-san so cruel. Even though you stole my first kiss!”

“No, just how long you want to drag that thing. That was lif—”Nagumo-kun?”…What is it, sensei?”

Because of the remark that he “stole Shia’s first kiss”, it seemed her thought process had finally caught up. Then, Aiko’s voice dropped an octave. Inside Aiko’s head, it seemed she imagined the scene where Hajime was laughing loudly while being attended by the two beauties in each arm. Her expression said everything.

Blushing, Aiko interrupted Hajime’s words. Her face was filled with determination to return her misconducting student into the right path. Following that, a large thunder called “Sensei’s anger” fell into Ul town’s number one and first class inn.

“To steal a woman’s first kiss, and even t-two-timing! So, you didn’t immediately return because you wanted to play around! If so… that’s unforgivable! Ee, sense will absolutely not forgive it! It’s time for scolding! Just wait there, Nagumo-kun!”

Hajime looked at Aiko with a skeptical gaze, who yelled “kyan kyan,” as he let out a deep, deep sigh thinking it was going to be troublesome.

Volume 6 Chapter 6


Because of Aiko’s roar, Hajime and his party were guided to a VIP seat, away from the eyes of the other guests. Then, Aiko, Sonobe Yuka, and other students bombarded him with questions. However, Hajime was focused on the Nilshisseer (other world’s version of curry) in front of his eyes. He answered them in a daze.

Q : You fell from that bridge, what happened afterwards?

A : I did my best.

Q : Why did your hair turn white?

A : The result of me doing my best.

Q : What happened to your eye?

A : The result of me doing my ultra best.

Q : Why didn’t you immediately return?

A : No reason to do so.

After hearing that much, Aiko yelled angrily with her cheeks puffed, “Please answer us seriously!” Indeed, her being unable to show any intensity in that action was a sad thing. As usual, Hajime looked like a willow when the wind blew. Without matching her gaze, he deliciously enjoyed the Nilshiseer, while sometimes listening to Yue and Shia’s quarrel. His face was full of satisfaction.

Angered by his appearance, was the commander of Aiko’s bodyguards, David. He couldn’t endure the woman he fell for being ignored. That’s why he threw his fist onto the table and a loud sound rang out.

“Oi, you! You’re being asked by Aiko! Answer her seriously!”

Hajime took a glance at David, then “Haa”, let out a sigh.

“Aren’t we eating now? Behave yourself.”

His protest was completely ignored. However, David has great pride because, as a Temple Knight, he was entrusted as the commander of an important person’s bodyguard, so he couldn’t endure it and his face turned red. Following that, because Hajime wouldn’t give him a clear answer, he changed his target as he turned to look at Shia.

“Hmm, did you say behave? That word, I return it back at you. To have a dirty animal share the same table as humans, you are the one who has no manners. Won’t you at least chop off those ugly ears? She will look more human like that.”

Shia’s body trembled as she was stared at with eyes full of disdain. In Brook town, from her impression of the inn, having been close to Catherine, added to Hajime’s existence, it was full of amiable people. Although there were lots of discriminating eyes in Fhuren, and even though they recognized her as a slave, no one made fun of her by directly saying that.

In other words, since the beginning of her journey with Hajime, this was the first time she had directly received discriminating words as a demi-human. Although she wanted to think nothing of it, she was slightly surprised by the attack, even after she had got accustomed to the outside world, she could still feel the damage. Shun, Shia looked down depressedly.

If she looked carefully, she could see that it wasn’t limited to just David. Chase and the other Knights also looked at Shia with the same eyes. No matter how intimate they were with Aiko and her students, they were Temple and Imperial Knights. They were men from the Church of Saints and the Kingdom, so their discrimination towards the demi-human race was strong. After all, the source of discrimination were the Church of Saints and the Kingdom. Even though David and the Knights were influenced by Aiko and could think for themselves, they wouldn’t have changed after only a few months because this sense of value was not so shallow-rooted.

Because it was something unreasonable, Aiko instinctively tried to protest. But before that, Yue who grasped the downcast Shia’s hand, directed a glare as cold as absolute zero at David. A cold gaze that seemed to be able to freeze one’s body came from the highest class, bisque doll-like beautiful girl. David flinched for a moment, but became enraged when he saw that the pressure was coming from a girl with the appearance of a child. Usually, he wouldn’t easily lose his temper, but the words he’d just spoke, and looking at his dear Aiko, he had lost it.

“What, what’s with those eyes? That’s rude! Even though you aren’t a God’s apostle, you are trying to oppose a Temple Knight!”

David spontaneously stood up. Although the vice-commander Chase tried to stop him, faster than that, Yue’s words clearly rang out in that uproar.

“…A small man.”

Those were words of ridicule. Words that ridiculed how small his vessel was, to shout just because of a difference in race, and lose his temper when glared at by a girl. David was already lost in anger. As a man, being called small in front of Aiko drove him over the edge.

“… You pagan. I’ll send you to hell along with that animal.”

As he quietly muttered that without any expression, David reached for the sword by his side. Because the carnage appeared all too sudden, the students were flustered, while Aiko, Chase, and the Knights were all trying to stop him. However, as though he didn’t hear the surrounding voices, David finally slightly pulled the sword from its sheath.

At the same time,

DOPANh!!

A dry, explosive sound echoed inside “Water Fairy Inn”. At the same time, David, who was about to pounce at any time, was hit in the head and got blown away. As it were, the back of David’s head hit the wall behind him, hard, and a terrific sound resounded. His eyes turned white as he collapsed. The sword was released from David’s hand and gashan!, it fell to the floor.

No one was able to comprehend what had happened just now, and were all stunned. Their gazes turned to David who collapsed with the whites of his eyes showing. Then someone was curious as to what had happened to emit such a large and explosive sound, it was Foss, who pulled the curtain. Following that, he became wide-eyed as he was stunned by the disastrous scene in front of him.

On the other side, Aiko and the others were finally able to regain their senses when Foss entered. Their gazes which were then directed toward David, were naturally drawn to the source of the explosive sound.

In that place was something Aiko and her students had knowledge of, but had never actually seen. It was something from the other world, something completely unknown to the Knights. There was the figure of Hajime holding a “gun” while seated. White smoke came out of Donner. At least the bullet he shot was a non-lethal rubber bullet.

Although they didn’t know the details, the Knights had guessed it was Hajime’s attack, so they simultaneously put their hands on their swords while letting out killing intent. However, what immediately followed, was by a violent killing intent incomparable to the Knights’. It was as though they were attacked by a hammer that fell from heaven, as the Knights who began to stand were forced to sit back down into their seats.

Although they weren’t submerged in the killing intent, having felt the pressure Hajime emitted, Aiko and the others turned pale as they trembled.

Hajime put Donner on the table and gotoh, it made an unnatural noise. Its purpose was to threaten them. Following that, he clearly declared his standing and asked where Aiko and the others would choose to stand.

“I have no interest in you lot. I have never thought of wanting a relationship with you guys. Moreover, I won’t say anything about what had happened to me or what I want to do. I am only here for work, so I’ll resume my journey once it’s over. That’s where we say good bye. Also, let’s not intervene with each other. No matter what kind of selfish things you want to do, just don’t obstruct me. Just like now, if you become hostile… I’ll likely kill you.”

Understand? Was what Hajime’s eyes asked, but no one said anything. Immediately, he turned his gaze towards Chase and the Knights, who desperately endured the Pressure, and all they could do was slightly nod.

Next, Hajime turned his gaze towards Aiko and her students. Aiko didn’t say anything. No, more like she couldn’t. It was not only because of the pressuring feelings that gushed out, but also because of Hajime’s words, and how her student change without her knowing. Those were not something Aiko’s pride could allow.

Hajime sighed as he shrugged his shoulders and canceled the “Pressure.” Although there was no answer from Aiko, Hajime could somehow sympathize with her feelings, so he didn’t force her for an answer. The other students were obviously frightened, so he guessed they wouldn’t dare challenge him.

With the tremendous feeling of oppression vanished, the Knights collapsed and let out deep sighs. Aiko and her students were also exhausted and sat deeply on the chairs. As though nothing had happened, Hajime resumed his meal, and talked to the depressed Shia.

“Oi, Shia. That’s something normal “outside.” There is no need to take it seriously, okay?”

“Yes, that’s right… Although I understand that,… as expected, for humans, these ears are disgusting.”

With self-derision, Shia patted her ears with her hands and let out a bitter smile. To such a Shia, Yue whispered words to comfort her with honest eyes.

“…Shia’s ears are lovely.”

“Yue-san… Is that so?”

Even so, Shia was still unconvinced about it, so this time Hajime followed up with a somewhat amazed expression. Because Yue often said “Bad!” to him, Hajime’s attitude towards Shia had softened little by little, and he tried to comfort her with the utmost of his ability.

“You know, their education was practically brainwashing from the Church and nobles of the Kingdom, so it’s just their feelings of aversion. Don’t you know that the Rabbitman tribe are the number one most popular pet slaves? In other words, no one thinks of you as disgusting in general.”

“Th—… that’s so… …U-umm, by the way Hajime-san,… Umm… what do you think… about my ears?”

Having guessed that those words were Hajime’s own way of comforting her, Shia felt slightly happy. Then she asked him with an upward gaze with blushing cheeks. As if saying, “I want to know, but at the same time don’t want to,” her rabbit ears completely drooped, and sometimes they twitched towards Hajime.

“… I don’t think anything about them…”

Stealing a glance at the rabbit ears, Hajime returned his gaze towards his meal as he tried to deceive her, and replied snappishly. The rabbit ears drooped even more as though they regretted asking. However, with the next line from Yue, they immediately regained their energy as they stood up;hyupa!.

“… They are Hajime’s favorite. He cuddles them when Shia’s sleeping.”

“Yue!? Didn’t you promise not to tell her that!?”

“Ha-Hajime-san… you like my rabbit ears… Ehehe.”

With her cheeks dyed red, Shia tried to suppress her grin with both hands, and as if saying “Wa~i!”, her rabbit ears above were moving, expressing her delight.

The awkward and strained atmosphere of massacre that floated in the air until now had dissipated as if it were an illusion. The atmosphere had mysteriously turned pink-colored, so Aiko and her students, even the Knights were blinking in amazement. For a while, they watched Hajime’s love-comedy interaction, then one of the male students; Aikawa Noboru muttered.

“Huh? How strange. Although until just now Nagumo was truly scary, now it isn’t killing intent that’s gushing out…”

“You too, huh. Rather, those two, although they are dangerously cute,… although they’re totally in my strike-zone,… but, to flirt in front of my eyes is torture for me…”

“… It’s just as Nagumo said, those things don’t matter at all. But, having the skill to get along with girls from another world… I want to ask him how!… Noboru! Akira!”

“”Heh, we are going to hell together, Atsushi!””

With their eyes boiling with envy, they stared at the Hajime who made them shudder until just now; it was the unison of three males from Ai-chan’s bodyguards. The serious atmosphere was completely blown away. The female students began to regain their original demeanor, and they looked at the male students with terribly cold eyes.

Chase, having realized the atmosphere had calmed down, started to heal David. At the same time, with his caution and hostility were subdued, he asked Hajime with a smile. Apart from Hajime’s circumstances, there was something he had to hear by all means.

“Is it okay to call you Nagumo-kun? About before, my commander had been rude. No matter what, we are Aiko-san’s bodyguards after all, so we become oversensitive if it concerns Aiko-san. Somehow, I would like for you to forgive us.”

Although Hajime wanted to interrupt him and say, “How can oversensitivity turn into murder?”, but the word ‘murder’ itself made him unable to say anything. That’s why he just silently waved his hand to tell him to stop that. Because of this perfunctory attitude, Chase’s eyebrows slightly twitched, but his poker face-like smile didn’t crumble. Following that, with quick thinking, because he couldn’t just leave it at that, he cut to the case about Hajime’s artifact-like thing in front of him.

“I assume… that’s an artifact. Although I can’t be sure with my limited knowledge, I can see that it’s quite a powerful one. It’s much faster than a bow, it also didn’t need chanting or a magic circle. Just where on Earth did you get it?”

Although he was smiling, Chase’s eyes weren’t. Judging from his words, since there wasn’t the presence of magic being used, he thought it had a bow-like pure physical mechanism and could be mass-produced. If so, it’d be a great help for the sake of dominating against enemies before war breaks out. However the Knights weren’t a match for Hajime, so he at least wanted to get information out of him.

Hajime stole a glance at Chase. Following that, before he could say anything, he was interrupted by an excited voice. It was a male classmate; Tamai Atsushi.

“Th-That’s right, Nagumo. Isn’t that a gun!? Just, how did you get ahold of that!?”

Chase reacted to Tamai’s shout.

“Gun? Tamai, do you know anything about that?”

“Eh? Ah, that’s right, I know of it. It’s a weapon from our world.”

Chase’s eyes shone because of Tamai’s words. But afterwards, he stared at Hajime.

“Hou, in other words, it isn’t an artifact from this world… If that’s so, it must be made by someone from a different world… and of course the maker is…”

“It is me.”

Hajime easily answered that he made it. Chase, because he held the impression of Hajime as a secretive person, was surprised by how easily he admitted it.

“You admit it so easily. Nagumo-kun, do you know what it means to hold that weapon? That…”

“It could completely change the situation of the war in this world,… right? That’s if you can mass-produce it. Mostly, you want me to return with you and teach you how to make it, or something like that? Naturally, I reject it all. Just give up.”

Hajime’s words had left him completely helpless. Those words seemed to be prepared beforehand. But, Chase didn’t give up. That’s how attractive the gun was.

“But, the Soldiers with low levels can have high offense if it could be mass produced. When that happens, we can make use of a lot of people in the upcoming war, and our chances of victory will also greatly increase. If you cooperate, doesn’t it mean you also help your teacher and friends? If so…”

“No matter what you want to say, I won’t cooperate. If you try to take it, then it means you’re my enemy. At that time… be prepared to be annihilated even before the war breaks out.”

Hajime’s quiet words sent a chill toward Chase’s whole body and he shut his mouth. Then, Aiko managed to intervene there.

“Chase-san. Nagumo-kun has his own intentions. Please don’t force my student. Nagumo-kun too, please stop saying such extreme things. Be more peaceful… Nagumo-kun, are you seriously not coming back?”

“Ah, I don’t want to return with you. Tomorrow morning, after I complete the request, I’ll leave as is.”

“Why…”

Aiko looked at Hajime with a pained expression, she wanted to know his reason, but Hajime rose from his seat before she could ask. Unbeknownst to them, Yue and Shia had also finished their meals. Although Aiko tried to stop him, Hajime ignored her and climbed the stairs to the second floor, accompanied by Yue and Shia.

At the time Aiko and the others were left behind, a subtle and indescribable atmosphere was in the air. They were glad the classmate they thought was dead was actually alive. But, for the person himself, they seemed to have not even registered in his eyes. Moreover, he had become strong to the point, that it was impossible to compare him to his past self. He was not the same as the one who was once called “incompetent” in contempt as they looked at him from above.

Moreover, about the contempt, they had pretended not to notice Hiyama and his friends bullying him. Followed by that “friendly fire” incident, they could only feel more indebted because of Hajime’s ambiguous attitude. As a result, no one could proactively reach out to Hajime.

Aiko herself was greatly shaken by her student’s change and angered by the current development in her mind, so she was unable to stop Hajime.

Chase, while he looked at the currently recovering David at the side, seemed to think of something.

With their meals completely cooled, their appetites also disappeared. Without looking at the food in front of them, all of them began to deeply think about how “Hajime survived” after he left them.

Just what on Earth could completely change a person like that, what did Hajime think at that time when the “friendly-fire” incident happened, what the current Hajime thought of them… Most likely, he held a grudge against them. With those thoughts making revolutions in their minds, all of them became depressed, and the day was over.

* * *

In the middle of the night. Surrounded by the night, they were completely exhausted. Both physically and mentally, thanks to the unexpected development. All of them fell asleep, but Aiko wasn’t able to sleep even now. Aiko’s room was a single room, so it was not a large one. A table set and bed with carved wooden feet, a small fireplace, and a leather sofa in front of it. In the winter, the flame would surely brightened the room, and the inn guests would be warmed just by seeing it.

Aiko was thinking about what happened earlier today, she watched the unlit fireplace while deeply entrusting her body to the sofa. The insides of Aiko’s head was like an unarranged bookshelf, with all of that information in disorder.

Even if she couldn’t think about it, she wanted to think. And from then on, her head that ran round and around in circles didn’t give out any constructive opinions at all. She recalled smiling when she found out her student was alive, then she could only knit her eyebrows because of his unamicable attitude.

She had seen a glimpse of Hajime’s power through David’s speech and conduct, she thought he wouldn’t have been able to survive if he didn’t change, and how much hardship Hajime must have experienced. At that point she could only let out a sigh because she couldn’t help him at all. However, she recalled his interactions with the two girls, she thought he must have found companions he could trust, and she smiled again.

And, suddenly, a voice rang out inside the room where there should be no one but her inside.

“Why do you keep changing your expression, sensei?”

“Kh!?”

Aiko turned around to the source of the voice while wide-eyed. There was Hajime who stood at the entrance door with his arms folded. Aiko was so surprised that she became tongue-tied, but somehow managed to speak.

“Na-Nagumo-kun? Wh-Why are you here, how…”

“Even if you ask how, I just came through the door, no more no less.”

“Eh, but the lock…”

“My class is transmutation master, you know? Unlike the locks on earth, I can open this kind of lock mechanism.”

Hajime lightly answered, which stunned Aiko for a while. Her heart loudly throbbed in surprise and that somehow managed to calm her down. She frowned, then criticized him.

“At such a time, moreover it’s rude to suddenly barge into a woman’s room without even a knock. To purposely open the lock… just what do you want?”

For a moment, the word yobai came into Aiko’s mind but she immediately erased the thought. She slightly shook her head as she recalled the fact that the other person was her student. Hajime only warded off Aiko’s scolding like a willow blown by the wind, and he told her the reason for this thoughtless visit.

“Well, I am sorry about that. I just didn’t want anyone to know about this visit. I wanted to talk to sensei, but before, there were the fellows from the Church and the Kingdom, so I couldn’t do it. After all, the contents of this talk might have angered those guys.”

“A talk? Nagumo-kun, it was okay to talk to sensei and the others…”

By chance, she thought he wanted to return with them, and Aiko’s eyes shined in expectation. If it was a consultation from her student, then it was as though the room was a teacher’s office. But her expectations were immediately denied by Hajime.

“No, I don’t want to return, you know? So stop looking at me with those eyes filled with expectation… What I want to talk about now is something I thought sensei would be the most calm to listen to it. After this talk, I’ll leave what you want to do to your own.”

Having said that, Hajime began to talk about the story of “Liberators” and the Mad Gods he heard from Oscar.

Hajime obviously had his own reasons for telling Aiko this story. According to the Gods’ intentions, the heroes; Kouki and the others, were made to dance in their game, and the Gods never intended to return them to their own world. To save the human race from the demon race, in other words to win the upcoming war, is the result of the Gods pulling the strings behind the stage in the first place. The heroes themselves were only interesting pieces they had gathered without any real reason. Rather, they only thought it was more appropriate to start a new game using the heroes.

However, for Hajime, there was no reason to pointedly explain this to Kouki and the other students. He wasn’t interested with what his classmates wanted to do, and it would also only be a hassle for him. Even if he told him, that man who believed that justice always laid with the majority wouldn’t believe him.

Because he was alone, between the words of a boy who had changed drastically and words that requested to save the majority, he didn’t even need to think about who they would trust. Rather, because many people believe and worship “Ehito-sama,” he’d only be mocked and criticized. Because of that, Hajime didn’t want to become related to Kouki in the least.

However, by coincidence upon coincidence, it resulted in him meeting Aiko. Hajime himself knew Aiko’s main principles always centered around her students. In other words, regardless of the circumstances of this other world, she would calmly make a decision for the sake of her students. Following that, judging from the attitudes of his classmates today, and how they yearned for Japan, if it was Aiko, surely her words would be able to influence them. Those were Hajime’s thoughts.

Although, he didn’t know how her influence would change their actions. With this information, if the movement of Kouki and the others became different from what the Gods intended, they’d surely put much more attention towards Kouki and the others. Hajime already knew that his existence would stand out like a sore thumb when he journeyed to conquer the Great Dungeons, and there was the possibility of receiving interference from the Gods. That’s why, by indirectly passing the information using someone they trust, he could rearrange the actions of Kouki and the others. Thus, he could delay being noticed by the Gods. His only objective was to draw attention away from himself.

In addition, without relying on the Gods, Hajime’s aim was to search for different ways for them to return. Furthermore, just like the “Liberators,” he wanted to show Kouki and the others how their original allies became manipulated enemies, it’s his intention to plant the wedge of distrust towards those Gods.

In the first place, he was only able to think of this idea because of the coincidental meeting with Aiko, so Hajime never expected anything out of it. For Hajime, there was no grudge nor hatred towards his classmates. He was just indifferent towards them. If they could be used, then he’d used them, and he’d leave them alone if they didn’t seem useful. That’s why he didn’t disclose this information only by chance.

Having heard the truth of this world from Hajime, Aiko was dumbfounded. It was not known if she truly understood it. Processing this information, no matter what kind of ideas she got, it still took her more time.

“Well, that’s all. That’s what I came to know from the depths of the Abyss. I’ll leave what to do after knowing this to sensei. It’s okay to think of it as just nonsense, and it’s also okay to move into action if you think it’s the truth. Just do as you want to.”

“Na-Nagumo-kun, don’t tell me, to deal with those “Mad Gods”… you began your journey?”

“Hah, that can’t be. I feel from the bottom of my heart that it doesn’t matter what happens to this world. I am only searching for a method to return. That’s why I went on a journey. The reason I’m telling you this is because it seems like it’d be convenient to do so, that’s all.”

Aiko wore an indescribably subtle expression because he snorted at her question. Although she was relieved he didn’t rashly poke his head into danger, she couldn’t help but frown as a teacher because of how easily he said he could cast the others away. But, she herself also made her students her first priority in this world, so she couldn’t say anything back. As a result, she tried to change the topic with a subtle expression.

“Do you believe in that?”

“That’s so. The Great Dungeons are the keys. It’s okay if you search for it if they interest you. Once you exceed the 100th level of Orcus, you’ll happily find the real Great Dungeon. First of all, by looking at your appearances today, you’ll immediately die when you go there. It’s out of the question if you can’t ignore “Pressure” of that level.”

Aiko was reminded of the pressure that gushed out from Hajime at dinner time. Following that, she opened her eyes filled with complex feelings of sympathy, admiration, and other various feelings when she thought again about the harsh conditions he must have lived through.

For a while, their silence continued. The room was filled with silence. Hajime was certain the information was received after looking at Aiko’s appearance. And because he had no more business, he immediately turned his heels and walked towards the door. Behind him, Aiko told him about a certain student she remembered when they talked about the Orcus dungeon.

“Shirasaki-san still hasn’t given up on you.”

“…”

Hajime stopped walking because of the unexpected words from Aiko. Then, Aiko spoke softly with Hajime’s back in front of her.

“Although everyone believed you were dead, she is the only one who didn’t give up on you. Before she confirms it with her own eyes, she believes you are still alive. Even now, she’s still fighting in the Orcus Great Dungeon. Even though Amanokawa-kun and the others are only going to the dungeon for training, her only purpose is to search for you.”

“… Is Shirasaki okay?”

After a long silence, Hajime asked Aiko. Hajime who took an indifferent attitude towards them, began to ask about another with words of concern. Aiko, who discovered that the original Hajime still existed, displayed a joyful expression.

“Y-Yes. Although the Orcus Great Dungeon is a dangerous place, her ability has developed well, and she continues to conquer the dungeon. Sometimes letters come from her. Are you curious about her? Nagumo-kun and Shirasaki-san got along after all.”

Aiko talked with a bright smile, but Hajime only expressionlessly looked back over his shoulder without denying or affirming anything.

“Although I didn’t mean it like that… it’s good if you tell her this when you exchange letters. What she should be cautious of is not the demonic beasts in the dungeon. It’s her companions.”

“Eh? What do you…”

“Sensei, I can already guess the situation from the attitude of Tamai and the others today. The cause of me falling in battle against the Behemoth, you think it was just an accident « … », right?”

“Th-That’s… Yes. Some magic went out of control and resulted in accidental friendly-fire… Nagumo-kun still holds a grudge against everyone after all…”

“I don’t think of anything like that. The thing I want to say is this. Friendly fire? That’s wrong. That was a magic bullet clearly specifically cast with me as target.”

“Eh? Specifically cast? Targeted, you say?”

Aiko’s expression said she couldn’t understand what he meant. But, Hajime left words that mercilessly pushed Aiko’s worry further.

“It means, a classmate was trying to kill me.”

“Kh!?”

Aiko was stunned and her face paled, “I only know that the culprit is someone related to Shirasaki, it’s someone who’s able to kill another person out of envy. Because she is still okay, it’s good to advise Shirasaki to be careful of an attack from behind.” After leaving this message, Hajime went out of the room.

Shin, there was an illusion of cold wind blowing inside the room, and Aiko embraced her own body with both arms. There was a possibility that one of her precious students tried to kill a companion. Furthermore, they used a cowardly method by aiming at his back when he was at the brink of death. For Aiko, who treasured her students, it was something she couldn’t accept easily. But, she couldn’t deny Hajime’s words without any evidence. Her mind that wanted to believe her students clashed with each other.

With her worries deepening, Aiko’s sleepless night increased.

Volume 6 Chapter 7


Daybreak.

With the waning moonlight, the eastern sky began to lit up. Hajime, Yue, and Shia, these three people completed their travel preparations, and soon they would leave the “Water Fairy Inn.” In their hands were packaged riceballs that could be eaten as they move. Even though it was still early in the morning, no one wore unpleasant faces as Foss prepared their breakfast. It was just as expected of a high-class inn. Its management was admired even by Hajime and his party, as they thanked him without reserve once they received the breakfast.

Within the morning mist, Hajime and his party faced towards Ul’s northern gate. There was a highway that stretched from this place to the northern mountain range area. It would take at least a full day by horse, but they would arrive in three to four hours using the magic-driven two-wheeler.

It was the fifth day since they had lost contact with Will Kudeta and his party, who had gone to investigate northern mountain range area. Survival was hopeless. Hajime also thought Will and his party’s odds of survival were low, but there was still a chance. Ilwa’s image of Hajime would climb to a pinnacle if he brought him back alive, which was why he began searching as soon as possible. Fortunately, the weather was good. An ideal day to search for someone.

With sounds of activity beginning to resound inside the buildings, they advanced towards the northern gate, and could finally see the gate. He narrowed his eyes because he could sense signs of people near the northern gate. They didn’t move or anything, but only hung around the gate.

What he saw through the morning mist… … were Aiko and the six students.

“… … Although I can guess what you want, let me hear it anyway… … What are you doing?”

Hajime and his party looked at Aiko and the students with half-opened eyes. For a moment, Aiko twitched from the pressure in the atmosphere, but she still faced Hajime with a firm attitude. After having a discussion, the students; Sonobe Yuka, Sugawara Taeko, Miyazaki Nana, Tamai Atsushi, Aikawa Noboru, and Kawahara Akira, drew near Aiko.

“We are also going. You’re searching for missing people, right? It’s better to have more people.”

“No. I am okay with you going. But, I refuse to go together.”

“Wh-Why?”

“Simply because our pace is different. I don’t want to match your slow speed.”

If one were to look closely, they would notice that there were several horses readied behind Aiko and the others. For a moment they thought, “Was it because he cannot ride horses?”, as they doubted Hajime. Since it was trivial, he just let it go through their heads. No matter whether he could ride it or not, its speed couldn’t compare to the magic-driven two-wheeler, after all. However, the virtual leader of Ai-chan’s royal guard who loved her; Sonobe Yuka, snapped at Hajime’s objection. Apparently, she had forgotten her debt and intimidation from Hajime yesterday because of the strength of her love towards Ai-chan.

“Wait, how could you say that? Even if Nagumo doesn’t think well of us, there’s no need to involve Ai-chan sensei.”

Because of the incredibly irrelevant objection, Hajime let out, “Haa?”, with an amazed expression. Hajime thought it’d be a hassle to explain, so he silently took out the magic-driven two-wheeler from “Treasure Box”.

Suddenly, a big bike appeared from the void, Aiko and the students could only let out stupefied looks.

“Do you understand now? Yesterday I said that I absolutely don’t care about whatever you guys want to do. That’s why there’s no need to snarl at me. It’s just like I said before, our speed is different.”

The magic-driven two-wheeler’s profound form, and maybe because it was an existence that didn’t belong in this different world, made Aiko and the onlooking students speechless. There, the bike-lover in the class; Aikawa asked Hajime while somewhat excited.

“D-Did Nagumo make this just like the gun from yesterday?”

“Something like that. We are going now, so move aside.”

Hajime answered him perfunctorily as he was about to embark, but Aiko kept standing still. Aiko wanted to tag along with Hajime and his party no matter what it took. She had two reasons. One was to search for the truth about what Hajime said last night. Aiko couldn’t just overlook the words, “A classmate was trying to kill him”, so she wanted find out if it was the truth or just Hajime’s misunderstanding. If it was the truth she wanted to know what Hajime was going to do. She wanted to hear more details from Hajime for the sake of avoiding any accidents that might happen in the future. Once the search ended, she didn’t know when she’d be able to meet Hajime and his party again, so she mustn’t miss this chance.

The other reason was, because Shimizu Yukitoshi was currently still missing. Although they had tried to find any scrap of information without leaving even a stone unturned, there were no sightings of him in any of the nearby towns and villages. However, because there was no one living in the northern mountain range area in the first place, she remembered there was no information gathered there. Even if it was on his own accord or by accident, she naturally never thought he’d enter the northern mountain range area. But with the thought he’d left on his own, she thought of searching for Shimizu’s trail while Hajime and his party looked for the missing people.

By the way, it was partly a coincidence that Sonobe and the other students were here. Aiko had wanted to go to the gate earlier than Hajime, in order to ambush him, so she tried to leave the inn before dawn, only to be seen by Sonobe Yuka who was going to the toilet. Because Aiko equipped herself with travelling gear and tried to leave at such an unreasonable time, Sonobe Yuka of Ai-chan’s bodyguards questioned her without letting her tell a lie. As the result, because they couldn’t just leave Ai-chan to the changed Hajime. Sonobe woke up all of the students and tried to join the search mission. It should be noted that they had left a letter to the Knights, telling them to watch the house, since it seemed like they would only strike up more trouble if they went with Hajime and his party. Though it wasn’t known how they’d react…

Aiko drew near Hajime and whispered her decision to him. Hajime moved his face close to Aiko’s because he didn’t want the contents and only the contents to be heard by others, but when he looked carefully he noticed she used thick makeup to conceal dark shadows. Surely, she was hardly able to sleep having heard Hajime’s story.

“Nagumo-kun, because sensei is a teacher, it’s necessary to hear the details from Nagumo-kun. That’s why, I won’t let you go until you tell me everything, I’ll chase you if you try to run away. For Nagumo-kun, won’t that be troublesome? I don’t care if you tell me while we are travelling or when we are searching, so will you spare some time? If you do that, then it’ll be as Nagumo-kun said, it’ll be good bye after this town… … for the time being.”

Hajime could see the light of determination in Aiko’s eyes, and he slightly regretted his last words from last night resulted in this failure. He understood Aiko’s ability to take action (Although she’s often idle). If he tried to deceive her or run away, she’d likely use the Guard Knights to search for him.

He averted his gaze from Aiko and looked up at the sky, which was becoming more and more bright. Without throwing away the possibility of Will’s survival, he regretted time had passed while they argued. Hajime let out a deep sigh. He admitted that he’d just reaped what he’d sown, and faced Aiko again.

“Okay. I’ll let you go with us. Even though I say that, I don’t have time to speak with you…”

“I don’t care. I only want to hear it from Nagumo-kun’s mouth.”

“Haa, geez, sensei won’t give up at all. Whatever and wherever, always a teacher, huh.”

“Of course!”

Aiko, “Munh!”, stuck out her chest with a joyful look when Hajime gave up. Because it seemed the negotiations had gone well, the students showed relieved looks.

“… … Hajime, are you going to bring them?”

“Aa, this person is a “teacher” even here. She will not compromise anything regarding her students. If I just leave her, it’ll absolutely become troublesome in the future.”

“Ho~, she is a good teacher who thinks of her students~”

Because Hajime had given up, Yue and Shia were surprised and asked him. Following that, having heard Hajime’s words accompanied with a bitter smile, the eyes with which they looked at Aiko, had changed slightly. They were filled with some respect. Even Hajime thought Aiko’s attitude as their “teacher”, which couldn’t be shaken at all was not a bad thing. For example, she didn’t find any value in categorizing the classmates and students, so he thought of her as an adult who should be respected.

“But, this bike can only hold three people, right? What should we do?”

What Sonobe pointed out was the truth. It was out of the question in regards to time, to match the horses’ speed, and it was impossible to leave Yue or Shia behind to bring Aiko instead. Reluctantly, Hajime put the magic-driven two-wheeler into “Treasure Box”, and pulled out the magic-driven four-wheeler in its stead.

Pinpon, Hajime made it vanish and at the same time a big object appeared, probably because they knew he’d used an artifact, Aiko and the students were not surprised at all. Having seen the current Hajime, who on Earth could imagine he was once called “incompetent.” Sonobe and the students received the message “Those who are unable to get on will be in the carrier”, looked at Hajime who quickly got on the driver’s seat with complicated expressions.

* * *

They moved forward on the road expanding straight into the northern mountain range area using the hummer-like magic-driven four-wheeler. Even though the highway was a bad road, thanks to the suspension and ground transmutation feature it shared with the two-wheeler, most of the impact was nulled. Naturally, the male students, aboard the hard metal luggage carrier attached to the back didn’t seem to be in discomfort.

By the way, although there was the “Treasure Box”, the reason he specifically installed the carrier was because it was a set with the gatling that’d be used while driving, it was his aspiration. A small commitment from Hajime.

For the seating inside the vehicle, Hajime naturally sat in the driver’s seat, while Aiko sat at his side and Yue was next to her. Aiko sat beside Hajime for the sake of hearing his story. Although Aiko seemed to not have told it to the other students, she wanted to hear about it sooner.

Originally, the seat next to Hajime belonged to Yue, but Yue already knew the contents of the story Hajime would tell, so reluctantly, she gave her seat to Aiko. But, Aiko and Yue were small, so there was still a considerable amount of space in the seat.

In contrast, Shia who was seated in the back seat looked slightly cramped. Shia aside, Sonobe and Sugawara had voluptous bodies, so they took up a lot of space. The slender Miyazaki looked so uncomfortable.

But, the one who felt the most uncomfortable was Shia. She had been placed between Sonobe and Sugawara for a while now, and they interrogated her about her relationship with Hajime. Love between different races in another world was something female high schoolers wouldn’t miss hearing. They were so curious that they repeatedly asked Shia, and the flustered Shia tried her best to answer their questions.

On the other side, Hajime and Aiko’s conversation also reached its climax.

Having heard the situation in detail about that time from Hajime, while she knew the possibility of magic being fired intentionally was high, Aiko was still unable to believe it and was troubled by it. When he heard her, Hajime only snorted as his reply.

For now, he already guessed it was someone like Hiyama, and although Hajime’s guess was closest to the right answer, he only said this was one of the possibilities. After all, Aiko wouldn’t be able to arrive at such a conclusion, and even if the culprit could be specified, how could she restore the mind of someone who attempted murder? How could one compensate for that? She was troubled, with those thoughts on her mind.

She groaned because she was troubled by this, but due to the soft seat and vibrating vehicle inviting her to sleep Aiko started off on her journey to the world of dreams before she was aware of it,zuruzuru, her body slipped until she fell onto Hajime’s lap.

Normally, he’d send her flying because it’s a hindrance, but because he felt it awkward to act rude toward Aiko, he hesitated over what to do, then he decided to leave her as is. After all, Hajime’s information was the main cause of Aiko’s sleep deprivation. So if it’s just this, he felt that it couldn’t be helped, as he displayed unusual generosity.

“… … Hajime is gentle to Aiko.”

“… … Well, it is someone I’m indebted to, so something like this is okay.”

“… … Fu~n.”

“Yue?”

“… …”

“Yue-san, please don’t ignore me.”

“… … Next, I will also use the lap pillow.”

“… … Okay.”

Even though Aiko was still lap pillowed, Hajime and Yue were able to enter a world of their own. In the back seat, the female high schoolers watched them while going “kya kya,” followed by a sulking rabbit-eared girl. From now on, they were entering a dangerous zone where unknown accidents might occur but no one thought about it as they made such a noise.

* * *

The northern mountain range area.

Several mountains extended with altitudes ranging from 1000 to 8000 meters. Plants and trees were somehow able to grow there. It was a mysterious place with a scattered environment. The colour would make one remember the mountains of Japan in autumn, and the other area was filled with trees with fresh green leaves, just like in mid-summer, but there were also places with withered trees in contrast.

Moreover, even if one could see past the mountain range, another mountain range stretched out beyond it. There were more and more of them to the north. Currently four such mountain ranges were confirmed, and beyond that was a completely unknown area. As to how far it went, a certain adventurer aimed to cross the fifth mountain range, however, demonic beasts got stronger and stronger with every passing mountain range, and in the end, there was no sign of success.

Incidentally, the highest mountain was the “God Mountain”. Currently, the place Hajime and the others had first arrived in when they came into this world was 1,600 kilometers east of the God Mountain. The vivid colors of red and yellow of the fresh leaves on the trees made them easy on the eyes. If a knowledgeable person were to look carefully, he would find spices and edible plants in the area. They were what enriched Ul town, a truly bountiful mountain.

Hajime and the others stopped the four-wheeler at the foot of the mountain, and were charmed by the artistic display of nature’s magnificent colors for a while. One of the girls let out a “Ho~”. Some time ago, Aiko was apologizing while blushing, after making the blunder of sleeping in a student’s lap. But having seen the fresh scenery, she succeeded in placing the ‘black history’ into the far recesses of her mind.

Hajime also wanted to slowly appreciate this, so he put the four-wheeler back into the “Treasure Box”, and pulled out certain things in its stead.

Those were, imitation models of birds which spanned 30 cm each, and a ring with a small crystal embedded on it. Each of the models had a gray crystal buried in a part of their heads.

Hajime put on the ring, took out four identical models, and slowly threw them into the air. With that, one would assume they’d fall due to gravity. However, these fake birds were floating in place. Aiko and the students let out an “Ah”.

The four mechanical birds began to turn around on their spots and flew towards the mountain.

“Umm, those are….”

Having seen the model birds flying away without any sound, Aiko represented the other students and inquired something of him.

Hajime answered her with “Unmanned Reconnaissance Planes”, and just like the vehicles and gun, they were items that were out of place in this different world..

The imitation model of birds called “Unmanned Reconnaissance Planes”, were something Hajime made in reference to the remotely operated Golem Knights from Raisen’s Great Dungeon. They were also produced using the materials he got there. Using Creation magic, he granted minerals Gravity magic because he didn’t have the aptitude for using the magic himself, and they became minerals capable of neutralizing gravity as they floated. And thus, gravity stones were created. Furthermore, the induction stones which used to control the Golem Knights were used. In addition, Farsight crystals were also installed in each part of their heads. The mineral used in the eyes of Golem Knights were Farsight stones. Similar to induction stones, it was a mineral capable of reflecting scenes witnessed by other fragments of the crystal, regardless of distance, so long as the same type of magical power was supplied to them. It seemed this was what Miledi used to determine the detailed position of Hajime and his party. Hajime installed the farsight crystal inside his magic eye, and he became capable of seeing scenery the “Unmanned Reconnaissance Planes” could see.

In the first place, there’s a limit to the processing performance of a human’s brain, using four simultaneously was the limit, allowing them to move around in the sky. It’s a complete mystery as to how Miledi was able to operate 50 Golems at once.

Tentatively, His brain’s processing performance had been boosted when he awakened the”Light Speed”, if he only had to control one plane, he could do precise movements. Moreover, when he uses “Light Speed”, he could make seven planes do precise movements within a certain time limit.

This time, he took out the Unmanned Reconnaissance Planes because being able to search from the air is useful, since the scope of search was too vast. Having watched the Unmanned Reconnaissance Planes fly far away, Aiko and the students tried to stop being surprised by Hajime’s actions, however, it was a vow that might never be fulfilled.

Hajime and the others advanced into the mountain using the same path used by the adventurers. The sighting information of demonic beasts were just slightly beyond the other side of mountain path. It’s in the vicinity of the sixth and seventh mountain. Because of that, Will’s party of adventurers should be investigating around those parts. Having thought of this, they quickly advanced through the mountain path at a high pace, after Hajime released the Unmanned Reconnaissance Planes in that area.

Hajime and the others reached the sixth mountain in almost an hour, and stopped. The reason was because it was necessary to search for any traces around the area…

“Haa haa, i-is it a break… … kehoh, haa haa.”

“Zee— zee— Are you okay… … Ai-chan sensei, zee— zee—”

“Ueppu, is it okay to rest now? Haa haa, it’s okay, right? I’ll take a break now, kay?”

“… … Hyuu— Hyuu.”

“Geho geho, Nagumo-kun and his party are monsters….”

Aiko and her students had less physical strength than what he had expected, so it was necessary to take a break. Naturally, Aiko and her students’ statuses were originally several times higher than the average people of this world, so they didn’t get exhausted until they climbed the sixth mountain. It’s just that the movement speed of Hajime and his party was just too fast, that’s why they climbed the mountain using all their might, and when they noticed it, their physical strength was exhausted and their legs became wobbly.

Aiko and her students desperately gasped for breath on all fours, and Hajime glanced at them with a somewhat troubled look. In any case, he had decided it was necessary to search the surroundings, as they went to the nearby river to let them rest. He was able to determine the location because of the information from the Unmanned Reconnaissance Planes. After stating the location to Aiko and her students, who were still breathing roughly, he and his party advanced towards the river. The probability of Will’s party having rested there was also high.

With Yue and Shia in the lead, they strayed from the mountain path and onto the mountain. Rustle, rustle. The sound of fallen leaves was enjoyable as they continued to walk between the trees, and before long they could hear the sound of a river. It was a sound pleasing to the ears. Shia’s ears swayed happily.

Finally Hajime and his party reached the river. It was at a bigger scale compared to a small river. Shia, who held the highest search ability, observed the surroundings while Hajime once again used the Unmanned Reconnaissance Planes to search for any presences, and there was no sign of demonic beasts nearby. They relaxed for now. Hajime and the others were sitting on the rock in the riverbank, then they talked about their search plans. Yue took off her shoes and put her feet into the river after saying “Just a little”. It was her selfishness to enjoy the moment. Hajime overlooked it because Aiko and her students still hadn’t caught up to them. He’s a man who spoiled Yue. Shia also took this chance.

Having thought of a possibility, they moved upstream along the riverbank. Hajime moved the Unmanned Reconnaissance Planes upstream while he looked at Yue, pasha pasha, playing with the river water with her bare feet. Although Shia was also barefooted, she only put them in the water. The feeling of the river flowing seemed to tickle her.

Aiko and her students, who finally regained their breaths, arrived. They stayed in place as they stared at Hajime and his party. However, the three male students shouted “Is this Heaven?”, with sparkling eyes as they saw the barefooted Yue and Shia, while the female students returned to look at them with cold eyes. It made the male students shudder. When they noticed the gazes from Tamai and the others, Yue and Shia got out of the river.

Aiko and her students were diligently replenishing their moisture in the riverbank. Because of the displeasing gazes from Tamai and the male students a while ago, Yue and Shia returned slight glares, and the male students trembled as they averted their gazes. Having seen such a spectacle, Aiko and the female students looked at Hajime with warm eyes. Especially Sonobe and the female students. Since they had heard various things from Shia, they wore very annoying expressions.

“Fufu, Nagumo-kun truly treasures Yue-san and Shia-san.”

Aiko said such things while smiling. Hajime wanted to say something, but stopped and just shrugged his shoulders when he saw the depressed Sonobe and the other male students. Yue was the one who took action in his stead. As if it were the most natural thing in the world, she suddenly sat on Hajime’s lap.

“… Nn.”

She was so pleased that she entrusted all of her weight to Hajime. It could also be called her proof of trust. Seeing that, Shia, who looked lonely, embraced Hajime from behind. Aiko’s cheeks immediately blushed because a pink-colored space was generated. Sonobe and the female students were shouting, “Kya— kya—”, in excitement. Tamai and the male students ground their teeth.

Hajime being Hajime, without shaking the two off, just averted his gaze. He seemed to be slightly embarrassed. However, Hajime’s expression suddenly sharpened in the next moment.

“… … That is.”

“Nn… … did you find something?”

Having heard Hajime’s muttering while he was looking far into the distance, Yue asked him. Because of his appearance, Aiko and the others blinked their eyes wondering what happened.

“On the river’s upstream… … is that a shield? Also, there are bags… … it looks like they’re still new. It might be a hit. Yue, Shia, let’s go.”

“Nn….”

“Yes!”

Hajime and his party harmoniously stood up and began to prepare for departure. Aiko and the students actually still wanted to rest, and although they knew they were overdoing it, they couldn’t just stand still once they saw that Hajime had found some clues. They laborously raised their still exhausted waists and once again desperately tried to follow Hajime and his party, who were advancing upstream with blistering speed.

At the location Hajime and his party arrived at, just as he confirmed with the Unmanned Reconnaissance Planes, small round shields made of metal and bags were scattered around. However, there were dents on the round shields, and the bags were torn up in the middle with their strings pulled out.

Hajime and his party carefully examined their surroundings. Then they found some nearby trees with their barks peeled off of them They were roughly at the two meters of height. It was apparent that the bark was in such state because something had scratched it off, and at that height, it clearly wasn’t the work of humans. Hajime instructed Shia to use her search ability to the fullest, while also using his own perception skill as they approached the barkless trees.

Advancing ahead, they found signs of combat one after another. There were trees and branches that were broken in half. There were also plants that had been trampled, and furthermore, there were fragments of blades and blood scattered around. Everytime they found such traces, the expressions on Aiko and the students’ faces stiffened. For a while, they chased after the signs of combat, and Shia suddenly found something shining.

“Hajime-san, this, isn’t this a pendant?”

“Nn? Aa… … it’s probably something they left behind. Let me confirm it.”

After he washed off the dirt from the pendant he had received from Shia, he noticed it was not just a pendant but also a locket. He removed the clasp and saw what was inside, it was a woman’s photograph. Perhaps, she was someone’s lover or wife. Even though it was not a significant clue, it was not an old one but a recent one… … it could belong to someone from the adventurers’ party. That’s why it’d be kept for now.

Afterwards, they found more articles of the deceased or so they called them, but they only collected items that would allow one to identify their owners. Having searched around for a while, eventually day turned into night, and the time for them to set up camp was approaching.

Even now, there were no signs of life aside from the wild animals. Although they were cautious because of how Will and his party encountered and were attacked by demonic beasts, there were no sign of demonic beasts in their immediate surroundings. Their current location was between the eighth and ninth mountain. From what was said about crossing the mountains, usually, they would encounter one or two demonic beasts, so Hajime and the others could feel the eeriness of this situation.

After a while, the Unmanned Reconnaissance Planes once again found a location with abnormalities. There were leftovers of great destruction 300 meters to the east. Hajime urged everyone to rush to that location.

There was a big river. A small waterfall could be seen upstream, and the volume of water was immense, with a violent current. Originally, it was likely to flow straight towards the foot of the mountain, but currently, there was a large and small river branching along the way. It was as though it was gouged by a laser or something, from the flank.

The reason they had such impressions was because the gouged part was a straight line, while the surrounding trees and ground were scorched. Furthermore, as if they had received a big impact, a lot of trees were partly broken and thrown tens of meters to the side. On the riverside, there were big footprints measuring more than 30 centimeters.

“It seems the real combat happened here… … These footprints were of large bipedal demonic beasts… … Surely, there were demonic beast called Brutal beyond the second mountain after this. But, the way the ground was gouged….”

What Hajime described as Brutals were something similar to the Orcs and Ogres in RPG. Although they didn’t have high intelligence, they took action as group. Because they had a weaker version of the peculiar magic; “Vajra”, called “Strong Wall,” they were recognized as quite powerful enemies. They usually descend into the second mountain of the mountain range, but these demonic beasts never came into towns. In addition, they didn’t have any attacks that could make such river tributaries.

Hajime thought of the Brutal as he observed the footprints, he hesitated whether to go upstream or downstream. Although Will’s party had likely to escaped upstream, he thought it would be hard for them to run upstream after such combat. He doubted that they would physically and mentally run further from town.

Hajime decided to direct the Unmanned Reconnaissance Planes upstream while they head downstream. Even though the Brutals’ footprints were on the riverside, the possibility of Will and his party jumping into the river was high. If so, he thought they’d likely be swept away because of physical exhaustion.

The others also agreed with Hajime’s speculations, and descended towards downstream on the riverside.

Afterwards, they encountered a much more splendid waterfall compared to the one from before. Hajime and the others nimbly descended from the cliff on the side of the waterfall and landed on the vicinity of the basin. The refreshing wind peculiar to a waterfall healed their minds and bodies which were exhausted from a day of searching. Then, Hajime felt a reaction from his “Sign Perception.”

” ! This is….”

“… … Hajime?”

Yue immediately reacted and asked him. For a while, Hajime concentrated while closing his eyes. Following that, while slowly opening his eyes, he let out a surprised voice.

“Oi oi, seriously. The Sign Perception picked up something. From the feeling, I can say it’s a human. The location is… … in the interior of waterfall’s basin.”

“You mean there are survivors!”

Hajime nodded towards Shia’s words of confirmation. He answered, “Only one person”, when Yue asked for the number of people. Aiko and her students were also surprised. It was something natural. Although the odds of survival were not zero, they actually didn’t expect any at all. It was the fifth day since Will’s party had gone missing. It was a miracle for even one of them to remain alive.

“Yue, please.”

“… … Nn”

While watching the waterfall basin, Hajime called Yue. Yue was able to guess Hajime’s intentions from just those few words, and she shook her right hand as the magic’s trigger.

“”Wave Castle,” “Wind Wall”.”

Then, the water in the waterfall and its basin began to split in two just like the Red Sea in Moses’ legend. Moreover, the scattered water was perfectly brushed off by the wall of wind. It was the result of water magic making a high-pressure wall of water called “Wave Castle,” and wind magic called “Wind Wall.”

Without chanting, magic of two different attributes were activated at the same time. Having seen how they were used, Aiko and her students, although they didn’t remember how many times they had done it, dropped their jaws in astonishment. Surely, the Hebrew people also displayed such expressions.

Because her magic power was not infinite, Hajime urged Aiko and the others on, as he led them into the interior of the waterfall basin’s cave. The cave they entered immediately curved upward, and they arrived at quite a large cavity. Water and light poured down from the ceiling, and the fallen water flowed into the water pool below. The reason it didn’t overflow was surely because they continued flowing inside.

They discovered a man lying down in the innermost part of the cave. When they arrived at the man’s side, they confirmed that he was a young man, around 20 years of age. Although he looked like a noble, he currently looked pale and displayed the complexion of a dead person. However, there was no large injury, and because there was food remaining inside his bag, he was simply sleeping. His bad complexion was surely related to how he was the only one here.

Having seen the anxious Aiko, and because Hajime wanted to immediately identify the young man’s identity, he used his artificial arm, while restraining his power to the limit, to flick the sleeping young man’s forehead.

BACHIKONh!!

“Guwah!!”

He screamed as he woke up, the young man writhed while covering his forehead with both hands. Aiko and her students shuddered because of the powerful and merciless forehead flick. Hajime ignored Aiko and the students, and approached the young man with teary eyes to ask his name.

“You, are you Will Kudeta? The third son of Count Kudeta.”

“Ah, eh, you are, just how on earth did you guys get here…”

Because the young man only blinked as he couldn’t grasp the situation, Hajime once again made a stance to flick his forehead and slowly aimed at it.

“Answer my question. I’ll increase the power by 20 percent every time you say something other than the answer.”

“Eh, eh!?”

“You, are you Will Kudeta?”

“Umm, uwah, yes! That’s right! I am Will Kudeta! Yes!”

For a moment, when the young man hesitated in answering, Hajime’s eyes gave off a dangerous light, and he immediately thrust out his left hand. The panicked young man immediately announced his name. Apparently, he was truly the person in question. He seemed to have miraculously survived.

“I see. I am Hajime. Nagumo Hajime. I have come here on the request of the head of Fhuren’s branch guild, Ilwa Chang. (For my convenience) It’s good that you’re alive.”

“Ilwa-san!? Is that so. Once again… … I am indebted to that person… …Umm, I am thankful to you. You must be a remarkable person to receive a request directly from Ilwa-san.”

Will voiced gratitude with respectful eyes. It seemed he didn’t mind the forehead flick with unbelievable power from a little while ago. If so, he might be an unexpectedly good person. A great difference than a pig from somewhere. After that, having introduced everyone, they heard the story of what happened to Will.

This was the summary.

Five days ago, Will’s party came to the vicinity of the upper part of fifth mountain using the mountain path just like Hajime and the others. Suddenly, they encountered ten Brutals. As expected, they couldn’t win against the number of Brutals they encountered, so Will’s party tried to withdraw. But, the number of attacking Brutals kept increasing, and they were by the river of the sixth mountain when they noticed it. Then, the Brutals encircled them, so for the sake of escaping from the encirclement. Two people; trifling and unimportant soldiers, were sacrificed After that, when they arrived at a big river, despair appeared.

It appeared to be a jet-black Dragon. As soon as Will’s party came along the river bank, the Black Dragon let out breath, and Will was blown off into the river by the attack. From what he saw while being swept away, one person vanished because of the breath, while the other two were attacked from both sides, by Brutals from the back and the Dragon from the front.

Will fell into the basin of the waterfall after he was swept away as is, he went into the cave he had found by chance, and he seemed to have been hiding here ever since.

Somehow, it sort of resembled what may or may not have happened to a certain someone.

Will, as he told them that, was feeling proud of it, and then suddenly started to sob. It was not something unreasonable, the senior adventurers taught him the know-how for adventurers and took care of him even though one of them wore a displeased face. Without confirming their safety, the pathetic him was only able to tremble in fear and wait for help to come, the him who felt relieved because his rescue came while his companions were dead, various feelings continuously emerged and his tears overflowed.

“I-I am d wost. Wuu, aljo evyone ish ded, I din’t ju anyching. Hikk, fer me chu be d cole curvibor… oso, sniff… chu fil relif… I—!”

(I am the worst. Wuu, although everyone is dead, I didn’t do anything. Hikk, for me to be the sole survivor… Also, sniff… to feel relieved… I—!)

Will’s wails echoed inside the cave. No one could say anything to him. Toward the Will who blamed himself with tears flowing down his face, they didn’t know which words would be good for him. The students looked at Will with sorrowful expressions, while Aiko gently patted Will’s back. Yue was expressionless as usual, while Shia looked troubled.

But, at the moment Will found himself at a loss for words, an unexpected person moved. It was Hajime. Hajime, approached Will and gripped Will’s collar. He used his inhuman strength to hang him mid-air. Following that, towards the Will who was in pain because he couldn’t breathe, Hajime spoke with an unexpectedly permeating voice.

“What is wrong with wanting to live? What is wrong with being glad because you’re alive? That wish and feeling are something natural and inevitable. Even more so because you’re a human.”

“B-but… … I was….”

“Even so, if you’re worried about those who died… … then continue to live. From now on keep living as you struggle, and struggle as if you’re going to die. If you do that, someday… … there might come a day when you understand the reason why you survived today.”

“… … Keep living.”

Even while crying, Will repeated Hajime’s words in blank surprise. Hajime violently threw Will down, he tsukkomi’ed himself with, “What have I done,” his words just now, more than half of them were directed towards himself. Will’s situation was a little similar to his, and for him to belittle his own life was like saying, “It’s wrong for you to survive,” towards Hajime, so he was inadvertently angered.

Of course it was just his persecution complex. More than half of it was said on an outburst of anger, so it wasn’t different from a child’s tantrum. Even though he had seen through various things, Hajime was still a 17 year old boy, and there was still more for him to learn. Hajime knew he had fallen into slight self-loathing. Having seen such a Hajime, Yue came to his side and grasped Hajime’s hand tightly.

“… … It’s okay, Hajime isn’t wrong.”

“… … Yue.”

“… … Live to your best. Keep living on. Together with me, right?”

“… … Haha, ah of course. I’ll keep on living no matter what might happen… … so, don’t leave me alone.”

“… … Nn.”

They left Will who was still talking to himself, then Hajime and Yue created a world with just the two of them. He couldn’t match Yue, and Hajime gently stroked Yue’s cheek, while Yue was also being spoiled and let his hand stroke her cheek. Not understanding what happened to cause such a development, Aiko and her students could only blink, while Shia watched Hajime and Yue with half-opened eyes.

The chaotic situation continued for a while (thanks to Hajime’s recklessness), and somehow everyone managed to regain their senses. The party then decided to immediately descend the mountain. There was still more than an hour before sunset, so if they hurried, they would likely reach the foot of the mountain by the time the sun set.

Although they were concerned about the Brutals and the jet-black Dragon, those were outside Hajime and his party’s mission. It was unthinkable to continue the investigation while having to protect those with low combat potential. Will also understood that he would just be a hindrance, so he understood that they must withdraw. Although the students insisted on continuing the investigation because of their slight sense of justice that came from the troubled townspeople, Aiko stubbornly refused to investigate because of the great danger the Black Dragon and Brutals posed. In the end, they descended the mountain.

However, nothing proceeds smoothly. Once again, they were passionately welcomed when the party got out of the waterfall basin with Yue’s magic.

“GUuRURURURU.”

Letting out a low groan, with its whole body covered in jet-black scales, its golden eyes glared at them in mid-air while fluttering its wings… … it was the “Dragon.”

Volume 6 Chapter 8


The dragon’s length was at least seven meters. With its whole body covered in jet-black scales, there were five sharp claws on each of its long forelegs. Big wings grew from its back which were slightly shining as they were clad with magic power. Every time it flapped the wings an unbelievable gust of wind appeared, even after taking the size of it’s wings into account. However, its most impressive feature was its golden eyes that floated in the night like moons. Its eyes that closed vertically like a reptile’s, were dangerously narrowed as they released beautiful light.

The golden eyes were glaring at Hajime and the others from the air. A low groan was leaked from the Black Dragon’s throat. Its overwhelming power couldn’t be compared to the Hyveria he saw at the bottom of Raisen Grand Canyon’s ravine. Although Hyverias themselves were generally recognized as troublesome, high level demonic beasts, when compared to the Black Dragon before them, it was as if they were small birds. Its majestic appearance made it suited as the king of the sky.

Just like a frog being stared at by a snake, Aiko and the others stiffened. Will was especially pale faced and gatagata, trembled as if he would collapse at any moment. Inside his mind, he might be having flashback from when he was attacked.

Hajime had already seen the claw marks from the Black Dragon’s attack that created branches off the river. He thought it must be a very strong demonic beast, but feeling the magic power and pressure from the Black Dragon in front of his eyes, he revised that it was three times of what he had imagine. Remembering the demonic beasts in the Abyss, it was not as strong as the Hydra, but he could feel that it had the same power as class of demonic beasts from 90th floor.

The Black Dragon confirmed Will’s appearance and girori, sharpened its glare. Following that, in front of the stiffened humans, it slowly lifted its head and concentrated its magic inside the opened jaws where sharp fangs lined up.

KYUuWAaAAA!!

A mysterious timbre began to dye the sunset and reverberated throughout the mountains. Inside Hajime’s mind, he remembered the Breath attack that erased the adventurers on the river.

“Kh! Evacuate!”

Having issued the warning, Hajime immediately leaped away from his location to evacuate. Yue and Shia followed after him. However, some people were unable to react to his warning, no, in this case it could be said most of them.

Aiko, the students, and even Will were stiffened and didn’t move from their spots. Aiko and the students’ bodies were unable to keep up with such a sudden event, while Will was bound by fear that made him unable to even avert his gaze.

“Tch!!”

“Hajime!”

“Hajime-san!”

Hajime issued an order to Yue and Shia using “Telepathy,” then he suddenly returned to his previous location using “Ground Shrinker” and stood between Aiko’s party and the dragon. Normally, he’d just leave. He didn’t feel bad about abandoning Aiko, rather, he didn’t understand why she came here to search for Will who miraculously survived. But, his “job” was to bring him back if he was alive. That’s why Hajime couldn’t abandon him.

Hajime took out a two meters, coffin-like, large shield from the “Treasure Box” into the empty space, he thrust his left arm and linked it to the shield. As he poured his magic power, on the lower part of the shield gashun!, a stake appeared. Following that, it mightily pierced the ground.

Immediately, a straight, black, laser-like Breath fired from the dragon. The Breath didn’t let out any sound and immediately reached Hajime’s large shield. The impact accompanied by a tremendous roar and the heatwave released melted the ground around the large shield.

“Guu! Ooooo!!”

Hajime let out a roar filled with spirit as he resisted the Breath’s pressure. Before one was aware, Hajime’s body and the large shield let out bright red light. It came from Hajime’s “Vajra.” However, the Breath seemed to carry greater power, so after he resisted it for a while, his defense was penetrated as the large shield received a direct hit.

Even so, the large shield still endured the Breath. Power that penetrated Hajime’s “Vajra” and heat gradually melted its surface, and it’d fall apart at any time, but Hajime used “Transmutation” to restore it. He wouldn’t let any more breakthrough than this.

The stake that penetrated the ground to fix his location was defeated by the pressure, as he gradually pushed back. Hajime transmuted his soles into spikes, and once again, Hajime used Vajra to resist the Breath. The large shield was connected to his outstretched left arm, and he also affixed his right arm to it.

The large shield Hajime took out was using Taur ore as its main material while Star ore was placed in-between and the exterior was coated with Azanthium. Because Hajime was a Transmutation Master, even with an attack that exceed Azanthium’s durability, it’s possible to restore it if it could endure even for a few seconds. Even if that was penetrated, the Star ore in the second layer had a nature to strengthened if supplied with magic power, and Hajime’s magic power wouldn’t allow anymore penetration.

That’s why, the Breath that could exceed Azanthium wouldn’t be able to destroy the large shield. However, it couldn’t be said that power wouldn’t be able to blown the large shield’s user away. In fact, Hajime who possessed inhuman power was gradually pushed back. On the ground were the gouged out marks from the large shield’s stake that pierced it and Hajime’s feet.

If this keep up, Hajime who equipped with large shield and “Vajra,” along with his inhuman endurance wouldn’t receive considerable damage. But if Hajime lost the shield, Aiko and the others would fall prey to the breath, and disappear from this world without even leaving a speck of dust behind.

When Hajime became somewhat impatient, an unexpectedly soft feeling was transmitted to his back. As he stole a glance over his shoulder, somehow, Aiko had jumped towards his back and supported him desperately. Apparently, while Hajime was resisting the Breath, she regained her senses and jumped to support Hajime who was gradually being pushed back. Having seen that, the students and Will also jumped to support Hajime, in panic.

The Breath continued even now. The surrounding water in the river was evaporated by the heatwave, the soil and stones on the riverbank were blown away by the impact and in awful state. From the time he received the direct hit from the Breath, a little time had passed. Hajime felt it had happen for an eternity, but actually no longer than ten seconds had passed. While he grit his teeth and thought about it, finally, he heard the long-awaited voice.

“”Cursed Sky”.”

At the moment the magic’s name was announced, a black, swirling orb of four meters in diameter appeared above the Black Dragon. The deep darkness that could suck in anyone who saw it, immediately fell and crushed the Black Dragon into the ground.

“GuuRUaAAA!?”

A roar came as the Black Dragon sprawled on the ground, and its Breath was interrupted when it raised a scream from the impact. However, the swirling orb, as if saying that’s not enough, didn’t disappear and exerted extreme pressure on the Black Dragon, sinking it into the ground.

“Cursed Sky”

It was Yue’s Gravity magic. By creating a swirling gravity ball, it crushed its target using supergravity that was proportional to the amount of consumed magic power. It was a convenient magic that could change its direction using the gravitational force.

The Gravity magic didn’t consume much magic power if targeted towards the caster itself. However, if the gravity ball was used to attack things, space, and other people, just like what happened just now, it consumed huge amount of magic power and Yue at the least need ten seconds to prepare it. Because Yue herself still hadn’t completely master this magic, the invocation time and magic consumption could still become much more efficient by training.

The sky king was crucified on the ground, it painfully braced its limbs to somehow escape from the pressuring attack. But, immediately following that were the rabbit ears that came fluttering from the sky and Shia was shouting, “Stop~!”, as she fell together with Doryukken. Holding the sledgehammer which was further accelerated by outburst, she used the high-stance aimed at the Black Dragon’s head.

DOoGAaAAA!!!

The impact was incomparable to any impact that had happened before. At the moment of impact, the ground burst and flew radially, accompanied by a thundering sound, it created a crater that looked like a result of a bombing. That was thanks to Doryukken’s remodelling by Hajime. Gravity magic was granted to the compressed Azhantium that was the main material. However, it was not the one that “neutralized” like the ones in the unmanned reconnaissance planes, but the opposite where the ore could “increase its weight.” The weight increased according to the amount of magic power supplied. The current Doryukken was just like *****ton Hammer!, just like the one inside the manga.

Furthermore, those who received the ultra-heavy blow wouldn’t be able to escape from serious damage. That’s right, if it was directly hit….

“Guruaaa!!”

Together with the Black Dragon’s roar, a flame bullet approached Yue at tremendous speed from inside the dust that scattered by Doryukken. Yue immediately did an emergency evasion by “falling” to the right. However, the gravity ball magic was canceled instead.

The dust was cleared up as the after-effect of the previous flame bullet, and there was the Black Dragon who managed to evade Doryukken which sunk to the ground by a paper-thin margin. At the moment of impact, it seemed to somehow evade using the peculiar strength of a dragon. Having its restraints removed, the Black Dragon did one rotation in high-speed as if trying to dispel its grudge and its large mass of a tail hit Shia who was just pulling out Doryukken.

“Agh!!”

By a hair’s breadth, Shia used Doryukken as a shield and jumped back to kill the impact, because she was greatly blown away at the same time, she disappeared into the trees.

The Black Dragon used the momentum from the rotation and recovered its posture, and its golden eyes were glaring at Hajime… … not, just passed towards Will behind him. Hajime immediately put the large shield back into “Treasure Box,” then pulled out Donner-Schlag and fired them. Many roars resounded, accompanied by flashes that cut through the sky and attacked the Black Dragon. Without being able to evade, the Black Dragon received direct hits from the storm of destruction, blown away from its spot, and thrown into the river with a tremor, creating a magnificent sprays.

Because Hajime thought it’d be bad for Will to be in its line of fire, he charged at the Black Dragon. Using gunspin in mid-air to reload Donner-Schlag in his hands, he repeatedly fired in succession just like before. However, the Black Dragon got up accompanied with roar that scattered the river’s water, somehow, it ignored Hajime and fired a flame bullet that was aimed at Will.

“Kh!”

Because it aimed at Willl, Hajime dared to approach it and tried to attack furiously to gain its attention. But, the Black Dragon acted as if it didn’t even care if Hajime was there, continue to target Will.

“Yue!”

“Nh “Wave Castle”.”

“Hih!”, was the miserable scream that came from the cowering Will, and in front of him was high-density wall of water. The flame bullet was obstructed by the rampart-like wall of water created by Yue and disappeared. And, at that time, the students finally regained their senses from this raging development and began to chant their magic. They were trying to support the party. Quickly, fire bullets and wind blades rushed towards the Black Dragon as they created archs.

However….

“GOoAAA!!”

The impact from the dragon’s roar dispersed the attacks. Moreover, having heard the tremendous roar and stared by the golden eyes, Will let out similar “Hih,” scream as he backed away and fell on his butt, reaching the female students’ spot.

Hajime, who completely judged her to be outside of the combat assets, shouted at Aiko to escape. Aiko was hesitating. Hajime was also Aiko’s student after all, so to left him in front of this powerful demonic beast made her hesitate as a teacher.

At that time, the Black Dragon began to flap its wings and flew into the sky while blowing the surroundings river water away. In addition, it rapidly shot flame bullets at Will.

Although Hajime had fired the railguns in quick succession, he couldn’t get its attention at all. The Black Dragon’s scales, similar to scorpion-like thing that boasted its hardness in the past, was only slightly scratched even after receiving direct hits from the railguns.

The Black Dragon stubbornly targeted Will. It was as if it was being manipulated by something. It faithfully obeyed the order like a robot. It kept trying to kill Will even after being restrained by gravity before, it seemed to think nothing of those who tried to obstruct it.

Although Hajime didn’t understand why it obstinately targeted Will, it was a convenient thing, since its target was already decided, so he gave out an instruction to Yue.

“Yue! Protect Will! I’ll defeat this guy!”

“Nh, leave it to me!”

Hearing Hajime’s instruction, Yue immediately “fell” towards Will, and stood in front of him. When she snuck a look at her back, irritation surfaced when she saw Aiko and the students who couldn’t move well in this situation and she muttered in displeasure.

“… … If you don’t want to die, hide behind me.”

The students were trivials, but regarding Aiko, Hajime was at least concerned about her, so she let out those words to not let her die. Incidentally, she had already forgotten how Aiko became a hindrance to them.

The students moved closer to Yue without particularly reacting to Yue’s cold words. They realized by Yue’s side was the safest place, thanks to the rampart of ice that chantlessly constructed using the surrounding moisture.

Normally, they’d have the ability to fight some more. But, no matter even if they knew Hajime was alive, the day they were almost killed by the Behemoth and Traum Soldiers as well as how Hajime fell to his “death” into the abyss still traumatized their minds. They followed Aiko because even if they couldn’t join the hero group in the dungeon, they couldn’t just half ass things.Even so, their magic was ineffective against the Black Dragon, coupled with the roar filled with killing intent, made their heart completely withered. Their mental state was completely unsuited for combat.

Because Yue was there, Hajime was assured of Will’s safety, and concentrated on attacking. The flying Black Dragon was concentrating on destroying Yue’s defensive wall, as it targeting Will on the other side of the wall, even now. However, flame bullets were incapable of penetrating the wall, then it raised its head in an arch again as it realized it. It began to focus magic power inside its mouth.

“Hah, it’s the first time I’ve been ignored this far… … that’s why, I’ll do anything to make you not ignoring me!”

As Hajime put back Donner into its holster, he took out Schlagen from the “Treasure Box.” Immediately after he activated “Lightning-clad,” the three meters weapon with an atrocious form let out bright red sparks. As expected, the Black Dragon realized Hajime’s next move was a dangerous one, and it turned its mouth, aiming at Hajime. It was just like Hajime had predicted: it couldn’t ignore him.

At the same time the Black Dragon fired the death spreading Breath, Hajime’s Schlagen finished the loading and fired.

They let out the same extreme flash. They became a storm of death. Black and red aurora were clashing against each other. At the moment of collision, a terrific shock wave was generated and the surrounding trees were blown away. Just by power alone, they were probably equal. However, the two auroras clearly divided between the victor and the loser from their nature. Although the Breath continued to let out an excellent aurora, Schlagen was specialized in penetrating through a single point. Therefore, the Breath was inevitably broken through, and that power reached the Black Dragon.

The head of the Black Dragon which fired the Breath suddenly curved upward. The full-metal jacket made out of star ore penetrated the Breath and hit the dragon’s opened mouth. However, the wound was far from a mortal one. With the bending of the Breath’s trajectory and power, several of its sharp fangs evaporated and as it nearly passed through the side of its head, it stopped before one of its wings on its back was blown off.

“GURUaAAA!!”

The Black Dragon fell as it spun towards the ground and let out a pained scream. Hajime was fortunately able to evade the Breath using “Aerodynamic,” and while he was upside down in mid-air he used “Aerodynamic”‘s “Ground Shrinker.” As he dived at high-speed, he used “Grand Leg” to attack the Black Dragon’s abdomen.

ZUDONh! The lower abdomen let out a roaring sound from the impact, and the Black Dragon’s body folded. The ground was radially cracked by the impact. It couldn’t be said that the damage was considerable even though the Black Dragon let out a scream. Its armor was capable of enduring the Railguns after all. However, having assumed that, Hajime attacked further as he greatly held out the artificial left arm. KIiIIIII!!! Machine-like sounds came from the artificial arm. The “Oscillation Smash” he used before fell down.

It was Hajime’s fist of destruction that was thrust in high speed and was capable of pulverizing a large boulder in a single blow, and it mercilessly attacked the Black Dragon’s abdomen.

DOoGUuUU!!
